This is a wonderful album, that evokes memories of the 60's folk boom, yet contains original songs. I was amazed at the fantastic harmonies and musical arrangements.Anyone who loves the movie "A Mighty Wind" and who loves folk music will fall in love with this album. I know I did</review_text>
On one hand, this CD is a straight ahead instrumental rocker, but Johnny A really shows how great he is with ballads, such as his covers of "Wichita Lineman," and "Yes it Is."  In fact, those two ballads alone are worth the price of the CD by themselves.But Johnny A can flat kick your ass, too.  He's a biker and his tunes like Oh Yeah, In the Wind and Two Wheel Horse are named for his other hobby.  And they rock, but there's nothing cliched or tired in his style.  He always seems to be looking for new ways to say something.I saw him in person at the Triple Door in Seattle sometime in February 2005 in a power trio format and he played most of the tunes on this album.  The guy is one amazing guitar player.  He played his signature Gibson hollow body, fitted with a vibrato tailpiece (Bigsby? It was like the old Chet Atkins "country gentleman" model) and he utilized a battery of foot pedal effects, coming eventually through a pair of Marshall combo amps.  The guy had some of the best clean tones I've ever heard from anyone, anywhere.Basically, Johnny A is a guitarist who has complete command of the instrument.  And he's got a rocking soul that cuts loose on originals and covers alike in a style that's all his own, and that's saying something these days.  If you love great rocking/rockabilly guitar, combined with really cool ballad playing in the power trio format, this CD is just what you're looking for.  In fact, I guarantee you'll be knocked out.Five stars.</review_text>
this band reminds me of the thrill i first got when i listened to an Atreyu Album. It dies today rip off the former bands style, but they are still a very good band.  In the over-crowded metalcore market of today, that is a rarity.  My only complaint, is that the vocalist has a beautiful singing voice (as heard on "The Radiance), but more often then not goes for the screams and growls that are associated with this type of music. still 5/5 material though.Favorite songs: "The Radiance," "Freak Gasoline Fight," "Our Disintigration," and :THe Caitliff Choir:Defeatism</review_text>
Like I said I would, I finally got around to purchasing this CD. I especially like tracks 9-12. Cheap Trick is solid as always. I have been a long time fan and enjoy all their releases. If I do have any criticism at all, it is the fact that some songs sound like recycled Trick riffs. I guess it's hard to create new stuff after 30+ years. Anyway, there are some great tunes on this. Buy it like I did!</review_text>
Ok good CD. im not suprised. Ok jaheim may not have the b best voice but his music is good and it goes will with the voice that he has.  Yes yall this album does use profanity but the songs actually have meanings. I like that daddy thing song, and like a dj. This album looks at issues from a mans  point of view. Ya know we've heard the angry woman and how the man did t his and that now jaheim looks at it from a males view. Ok yall i know he is not the first one to do this but he did it well. Also this is a break from that [...] that is played on the radio.</review_text>
Review by Mike Watson:With the recent slew of Victory Records releases, not to mention the wide variety; one can be to say the least skeptical of any of their assortment of new releases.  However, picking through all of the less notable releases from the label, the up-and-coming band, The Forecast, have stepped to the plate and scored a home run on Late Night Conversations.  The Forecast are a perfect blend of male and female vocals over a very modern rock soundtrack, executed flawlessly over a ten song full length.Late Night Conversations is an album confronting different topics ranging from relationships to the teen trend of mutilation and loathing.  The harmonies arranged by both vocalists are undeniably catching and well written and the music follows closely in suit leaving your head bobbing back and forth to the beat and your feet tapping almost involuntarily. The Forecast is not only a great recorded band, but bring the same toe tapping energy to the stage, with both great stage presence and cohesion as a band.  The Forecast will defiantly be one of the new big bands in poppier rock music, and checking their Victory Records debut out is a must for fans of the genre.</review_text>
great anniversary present. fav song... I love the way you love me... my husband loves to listen to it in the car</review_text>
As we all know by now, Lil' Jon is not known for his lyrical capabilities, but for his platinum productions and ability to find guest artists perfect for his songs.  He is truly the king of crunk.  Many of the songs on the album are much like the hit single, "Get Low" feat. The Ying Yang Twins- strong pumping dacefloor beats, lots of swearing and yelling constantly Yeeah!, Whuut?, and Okaay!  Buying the edited version (if there is one) would be a total waste.  This album is not for the meek or faint hearted!  Much of the songs hardly have many words from Lil Jon himself, mostly from the featured artists.  These include Petey Pablo, 8Ball and MJG, Chyna Whyte, Pastor Troy, Jadakiss, Styles P., ect.My faveorites1) Throw it up w/ Pastor Troy- a 'hood representing song with a thumping beat2) Get Low3) Rep Yo City w/ Petey Pablo, Bun B- a very good song with talents all around4) Knockin' Heads Off- again Jon struts his stuff5) I Don't Give A...- perfect for before game pumping musi</review_text>
Relationships and drug use are major themes.  This album starts off with two absolute killer tunes, lets down some but has a joy thoughout.  I can't believe this is going to be his only album.....what a shame.  From someone who has been listening to rock for a long time, I tell ya, this is a blast.  Pure fun.  Something you might want to give to someone you have broken up with as its full of a broken heart and the joy of being in love.....mostly rather quickly paced.  One of my favorite albums of the 90s.  More people should listen</review_text>
I didn't think it was possible for the Delays to top their debut release - but they have. While "Faded Seaside Glamour" is more immediately catchy and refined, "You See Colours" comes at you in a much more intense manner. The songs are more mature, the musicianship is top-notch and the recording sparkles with fat bottom-end and soaring harmonies. The high points for me are Valentine and Winters Memory Of Summer, but there's honestly not a bad track on this release. The Delays put it all together - great songwriting, strong musicianship and excellent production in a genre-bending mix that has something for everybody. It's a shame these guys don't get more recognition here in the States. Buy it</review_text>
Just lay back and listen. Brian Wilson never misses a note. His voice was one of the natural wonders of sixties pop. His composing and arranging skills are without peer and he even plays some awesome bass (the slow middle eight section on &quot;Wouldn't It Be Nice&quot;)on this album. These songs are the sound of former teen idols settling into adulthood and feeling  both excited and uncertain. Recorded with a large selection of musicians and sung heartbreakingly well by the Beach Boys themselves, this is a true pop magnum opus. The best tracks are the gorgeous &quot;You Still Believe In Me&quot;, &quot;Don't Talk (Put Your Head On My Shoulder&quot;), the title cut, and the tear inducing &quot;Caroline No&quot;. Instead of trapping you outside his pain and insecurity, Brian Wilson invites you into his world and lays his soul bare with a suite of songs that haven't aged a day since 1966. The more you listen to &quot;Pet Sounds&quot;, the more it's beauty envelopes you</review_text>
If you like vocalese, then this cd is for you.  The song selection and performances are excellent.  In my opinion, it stands up with the best Lambert, Hendricks, and Ross stuff.  It is clear that a lot of love and effort went into the making of this record.  Buy and enjoy</review_text>
I can honestly say that when I first heard Scarling's "So Long, Scarecrow", I was less than impressed. I've been into Scarling for a few years now, and when I heard their first record,"Sweet Heart Dealer", I instantly fell in love. I somewhat held it above everything else, I was so impressed by it. So when I heard the progression from SHD to SLS, I was a little bit let down.But after three solid listens, from first to last, I was totally amazed by this record. It was like something clicked and I was able to see the beauty each track held. I seriously listen to this CD almost everyday. Although I prefer some tracks to others [(Northbound on) Cauhenga!], I really can't think of one track that I just don't like. It now takes place in my favorites over SHD.I feel that this record can really appeal to anyone; it's very versatile. And, as always, Jessicka's beautiful vocals compliment the indescribable amazingness of the music wonderfully. If you're indecisive about purchasing this record, I say bite the bullet, give it a few solid listens, and promptly be blown away</review_text>
This is a wonderful, fun and soothing CD!  It will relax children and parents will enjoy it even after the 100th listen!!  My husband is a musician and he loves both of the Dan Zanes CDs we have.  This will now be a gift I give to all my friends and family when they have a baby</review_text>
There is a saying in the construction industry "Tripping over dollars to pick up nickels." Or in the regular world "Can't see the Black Forest for the trees."I doubt if there IS an definitive rendition of all of Beethoven's symphonies. Even the composers own conducted versions changed over time and from performance to performance depending on the players or his intentions. Instruments were constantly changing and you know this guy was never satisfied, always stretching. We can only guess what his EXACT intentions would be today or tomorrow.What you want to remember is:1) The first version of anything you seriously like will color your listenings of subsequent versions. You'll be listening for qualities that aren't there and missing qualities that are there.2) Different versions bring us different views. Isn't that a good thing? Sound in all it's forms is preferable than a useless search for the best sound. I'd rather have that kind of an attitude than the bickering negative perfectionist snob attitudes of some of the reviewers here.Having said that... I love these versions. I've had them for some time. I have at least 4 versions of the symphonies. These are clear, well recorded, dynamic and straight forward. Beethoven's passion, mental range and personal warmth are within. You can easily hear the information that Beethoven wanted you to hear. Probably better than he could. No make that clearly better than he could. Ha ha!These are solid, lovely, beautiful, and astounding. Listen to them</review_text>
This album sparked the so-called "Neo-Soul" movement years before it was adopted by other artists. Back in early 1986 everything was about synthesizer overkill and Prince broke the music back down to its roots. This concept was later used by Tone Tony Toni, Brand New Heavies, and D'Angelo.</review_text>
Dylan...along with late Nobel prize winning Czeslaw Milosz...may someday be recognized as preeminent prophet-poet of decadent PM West. Milosz[in tradition of towering European mystic/gnostic intellectual poet/philosophers(Blake-Swedenborg to Solovyov and Dotoyevsky)]ranks amid a Brotherhood summoning mankind to recollection-in-reckoning and hopeful REPENTANCE where The GOOD may be rescued,reaffirmed and rejuvenated for all.America's modern ISAIAH, Bob"Dylan"Zimmerman THE JOKERMAN'S Jokerman is unique to the USA(and the world)as Post-Modernism's John-the-B prophet minstrel.The SLOW TRAIN is Apocalypse Now!COMING at warp speed.Our political-circus clown NEROES(TWEEDLE DEEs &TWEEDLE DUMs)continue  fiddling as UNION's SUNDOWN "Auto de-Fe of the USA" feeds maws of Moloch with aborted children;Orwellian schools and inbred culture of spiritual,moral and pseudo-intellectual manques who celebrate DEATH as ultimate freedom and anti-salvation.INFIDELS pulls no punches:The JOKERMAN's final battle with THE MAN of'PEACE'has begun. PC "Neighborhood Bullies"have begun worldwide assault from the Middle East to local American classroom...[New York based COLLEGE BOARD will now purview and judge every single ADVANCED PLACEMENT course syllabus for every high school in the United States(ca:2007;cf:apcentral.collegeboard.com)THE ACADEMIC COMISSARIAT is here!]...If you want to study "real" Da Vinci Code,listen to America's recognized-but-hardly understood(I & I)genius who deserves"ears to hear".(It's too late for Wilson's SMILE; McGuinn may be"Going Nowhere" again)DYLAN's master works(SLOW TRAIN COMING & INFIDELS) are tocsin summons: Look into the FIREY FURNACE:see RICH MEN(& WO's)without any names who with concupiscent greed;self-"LOVE AND THEFT";plot SELF-APOTHEOSIS and our ultimate enslavement.(777 Nova super stars)</review_text>
This has to be one of the most beautiful CDs ever recorded. Damien's vocal range is vast; his musicianship excellent; but it's the crafting of songs at which he truly surpasses most artists. Haunting, sensitive, flowing, crashing...  (If I have one criticism, it's the mixing levels - at times, his vocals are drowned. In concert, when he lets rip, you really feel the power of his vocals/music, which, unfortunately, doesn't come over quite as well on the album.) A truly magical album.</review_text>
A friend loaned me her CD and I absolutely loved it......but I could not purchase it ANYWHERE.....my daughter suggested I contact you.....results, results!!!! Thank you!  A most outstanding seasonal soft listening CD</review_text>
I had tears in my eyes when I first heard this album. I get emotional over music I really like, and this album got to me.So many great standards so well delivered by the duo. They deliberately chose slower ballads for this album so don't look for uptempo,snappy songs in this one.Not that Harry Warren could not write faster stuff like Jeepers Creepers,Shuffling Off to Buffalo etc. This album is to sing along with softly or hum.I kept thinking of Bogart in the rain in Casablanca and other lovers in W.WII.I know the main tune in that movie was not by Harry Warren;it simply reminded me of great love tunes from that era by Julie Styne[Time After Time] and the grossly underrated Harry Warren.Grab someone you love, some good wine and savor one of the great popular composers and a great duo.They should do more Harry Warren albums,Michael and George.I thank them profusely</review_text>
Poison the Well are one of those bands that I was really big on right when I first started listening to them, but which faded a lot pretty quickly.  I can't really say why.  I like their work, but it doesn't inspire me the way it used to.  Still, I do like them, and this album particularly.  Maybe not as much as Opposite of December, but whatever.  Yes, this isn't as 'hardcore' as their older stuff, but I've never been hardcore kiddie.  (I'm a metalhead)  And frankly, being a modern hardcore band ain't much of a compliment in my book.  It's funny, lotsa tech-metalcore and other 'core derived bands are good, but most straight hardcore/metalcore is staggeringly boring.  So, while old PTW was semi-technical metalcore, this album is pretty much just extremely loud emo.  But, they now how to be 'emotional' and not come across as sissies,(well, most of the time) and Jeff doesn't sing in an unbearably affected manner.  Course, the 'extremely loud' part helps a lot too, and Jeff's growls/screams are absolutely devastating.  Way  better than on their previous albums, and some of the best extreme vox from anyone, ever.As an extremely heavy emo album, the instrumentation here is pretty bland.  There isn't much real riffing going on, not in the metal sense anyway, mostly just a single  note/chord repeated a great many times, than another one etc.  But, the vox and atmospherics carry the day.  The standout track is 'Crystal Lake', an absolutely bestial piece of deathcore.  I've listened to quite a bit of death metal in my day, but this has got to be one of the most devastating tracks I've ever heard, largely because of the absolutely impassioned vox.  Lotsa extreme vox lack emotion, but never Moeria's (probably spelling that wrong, sorry)  That, and the instruments are more noteworthy, very nasty and chaotic.  Also, it earns points for taking some of the seriousness out the genre with its jokey lyrics. (For the culturally backward, this song is a first-person narrative from Jason Voorhees, killer of most of the 'Friday the 13th' films.  Hence the name 'Crystal Lake'.)There are no truly weak tracks here.  'Ghostchant' is a good opener, nicely displaying the extreme tonal dichotomy of the album, mixing the fierce screams with some nice melodic vox.  'Loved Ones' is one of the very best tracks, again carried almost entirely by the powerful  vox.  Tracks 5 is a cool two part thing  mixing the rather pleasant, harmonica and bass driven intro with one of the more hectic, grinding main songs.  The album takes a turn for the lighter at about track 8.  'Apathy is a Cold Body' is a very emo-y track, but it's got a lot of nice melody to it, so it works.   'Sound like the End of the World' is another strange one.  It's a slow doomy piece with oppressive atmosphere and a thick layering of vocal lines.  Not the best thing here, but it works and it earns some points for being different.Yes, a solid, if not great album.  Check it out</review_text>
this cd is really really good. warped tour never fails to please.  the best songs are by these people...the used, YELLOWCARD, story of the year, matchbook romance, the early november, avoid one thing, taking back sunday, audio karate, simple plan, maxeen, coheed and cambria, and mest.  BUY THIS C</review_text>
Wonderful instrumentals and lyrics.  A Shenandoah Lullaby is simply beautiful.  I love the way the ending segues into Brahm's lullaby.   His version of Arkansas traveller is refreshing.  Teddy Bears' Picnic is a quaint song that few people have heard.  There Ain't No Bugs On Me is my two-year-old daughter's favorite, judging from the way she belts out this song and giggles from time to time.  I like all the songs on the CD.  A breath of fresh air for parents who prefer real instruments to synthesized pop.</review_text>
I rarely write reviews of music but feel that I must share my impressions of this CD.  I have long heard some of my favorite singers praise the songwriting prowess of Townes but somehow never got around to buying one of his records.  I finally picked this one up because it had two songs that were covered by two of my favorite singers--Lyle Lovett-"Lungs" (among others) and Steve Earle-"Tecumseh Valley".  I was blown away by the sheer beauty and poetry of every song on this recording.  Other reviewers seem to be comparing this to other Townes' records.  I come from a different angle.  As someone who has long heard Townes sopken of with the highest praise, I can say this disk does not disappoint and will influence me to fill out my collection of his recordings.  I will also say that I am deeply frustrated that I never took advantage of the chance to see Townes perform while he was alive.</review_text>
Without a doubt, the highlight is the DVD of the 1975 show in London.  "Born to Run," the album, had put him on the cover of "Time" and "Newsweek" the same week in October, 1975, one of the very few times that has happened for a non-news story.The publicity and hype generated by Columbia records was so overwhelming that there was a backlash:  "Nobody can be that good."So here we see his first show ever in the UK, playing to an audience of professional critics and amateur skeptics, people thinking, "hey, 'Rock and Roll Future,' this is the land of the Beatles, the Rolling Stones, The Who - who do you think you're kidding.  No unknown kid from America deserves 'Time' and 'Newsweek.'"The show begins in almost total darkness, a piano softly plays, then harmonica, and a soft spotlight lights the kid from New Jersey who sings "Thunder Road," accompanied by only piano.  An unknown song at the time, "Thunder Road" has become a Springsteen classic.  IMHO, especially given the expectations, it is a perfect understated opening.The DVD has the entire show, including everything from the hard rock of "She's the One," and "Born to Run," the song, to a much slowed down version of "For You," an underated sleeper on his first album, "Greeting From Asbuty park, NJ."  Bruce accompanies himself on the piano and I swear, this version of "For You" is so beautiful it could be the scruffy New Jersey kid channeling god.Any skeptic who walked out of this show thinking Springsteen was merely hype has no ears, no taste, or was xenophobic.  The show gives more than a big hint that this Springsteen guy is for real, as a songwriter and performer, and that "Born to Run," especially, is an extraodinary album. There are only eight songs, but none are fill.  Repeated listenings of the four corners of the album (before CDs) "Backstreets," "Jungleland," Thunder Road," and the title song are so good they become... well, addictive, works of genius, and lead to still more listening.  "Tenth Avenue Freeze Out," "Night," and especially "She's the One" could each be the centerpiece of almost any other album.  Even the whispered "Meeting Across the River," fits and helps the album become a coherent whole.  The songs taken together are more than the sum of the parts.As a footnote I'll offer the opinion that Bruce only wrote one other album that is as good as "Born to Run" and that is his next one, "Darkness on the Edge of Town."  Everything he has released is good;  a good bit of it is great, but I don't think anything else matches "Born To Run" or "Darkness."  I don't know if two other back to back albums this good have ever been released.The DVD of the show gives us a big early peek at the guy who would develop into rock's greatest performer.  By 1985 he would be the biggest rock star in the world, selling out multiple nights at football stadiums.The remastered CD is nothing special to my ears.  Perhaps an audiophile could hear improvement.  The DVD, "The Making of 'Born to Run,'" is interesting, but will probably appeal mainly to fans.However the DVD of the 1975 London show ought to appeal to anyone who likes Bruce, or rock & roll, or showmanship, or history.  Its a treat</review_text>
Thoroughly enjoyed the CD.  Have some of the songs as performed by other artists, but it's nice to hear them as performed by the writer.  I'm always impressed by one with that kind of creativity.</review_text>
This outstanding effort by Prince consists of mostly spare jazzy R&B tunes, driven by incredibly loose, free-flowing live instrumentation.  I could only begin to tell you about the stylistic variety on this album.  With the three disc format there is a lot to absorb, and the third disc really can largely be done without, but the first two truly do rank amongst his best work.  It should also be noted how especially romantic Prince is on this album.  This album was made around the time that he entered into his first marriage, and it shows because this c.d. is overflowing with outstanding romantic ballads.  Most of his albums only contain one or two ballads, so if you've been longing for an album that includes more, then this album should really appeal to you.  This c.d. does not fit into the "standard" Prince "mold" ( I know that it is perhaps a bit oxymoronic to speak of a "Prince mold" but his personal signature is not quite as bold on this album as it is on many of his other works, even those that are admittedly not as good).  The reason for this is that Prince follows rather than leads on a good portion of this album.  The fact that there are two covers on the first disc alone shows that Prince was in the mood to do what was being done instead of doing something new (he covers songs by Bonnie Raitt and The Stylistics) which is unsual for this constant innovator, but this album is so great because he is so skillful that he does it better than almost anyone else.  One minor problem that I notice is that it seems that on a few songs particularly on the first disc, Prince just doesn't pay much attention to the lyrics.  There are too many generic R&B come-ons and cheesy cliche 90's catch phrases such as "gettin' your groove on', and Prince is much too clever, witty, and creative to resort to such things. But, really that is just a minor quibble because the music truly is consistently outstanding throughout the first two discs.  And then, he has songs such as "Soul Sanctuary" and "Let's have a baby" which are two of the most well-written ballads that I've heard from him.  "In this bed I scream" is just magnificent both lyrically and musically.  He takes the lead again on this track and he does it in a major way.  This clever, poetic, and romantic track has an infectiously catchy both rhythm and melody that would easily pack any dance floor.  Other highly impressive moments include the high powered funk of "We gets up", the absolutely brilliant and stunning arrangement on "Curious Child", and the sincere, pure passion of the just so perfect R&B/gospel blend of "Savior".  "Joint 2 Joint" is impressive just for having so much variety in terms of sounds and elements, with each part so effectively enhancing a different part of the story. The first two discs are really solid overall.  The third disc however finds Prince trying his hand at techno and other forms of conventional dance/club music, and the results are not very impressive.  But, I don't see how they could be, even coming from Prince.  Techno for the most part is insanely repetitive, monotonous, and downright drone-like.  There are only three songs on disc three that were really worth it (Slave, My Computer, and the title track).  Well, maybe four, his cover of "La la (means I love you)" is actually really good too.  Those songs could have been put on the first two discs and the 3rd disc really could have been omitted.  The most impressive feat that he manages to accomplish on this entire album is making a great chorus and a great song out of the line "www 'dot' emale `dot' com" on "Emale" :-).  I was unaware of this feat for a while because I used to always skip this song because it started off with that really annoying 90's G-funk whistle.  So overall, this album really does rank amongst Prince's best work, and it should especially appeal to those who would like to see him do more ballads and dive into more R&B</review_text>
Rap music today is a tragic lack of creativity. Its not real hip hop. This album, brings back the good feeling that is real hip hop. Honestly, The Light is a song that never gets old, thats real. If you don't have this album, get it.</review_text>
This CD is a confusing mix of punk bands, from pop-punk's Sum 41 &amp; Good Charlotte to punk favorites Alkaline Trio, Vandetta Red, &amp; The Casualties to bands that I've never even heard of such as Unsung Zeros, Ozma, &amp; Destruction Made Simple.  I reccomend this CD if you're looking for new bands to like &amp; listen to.  Although it's a confusing CD, it gives you new ideas of just how deep you're going to go in the punk underground</review_text>
I would say that this is the closest that Cheap Trick ever got to making a perfect album. There are only two songs on here that I'm not one hundred percent crazy about...the slow and gloomy depressing title track and ' On the Radio ', which I think kisses up to radio D.J.'s too much. I love the rest of this.This album was my introduction to Cheap Trick and I would definitely recommend it to anybody as introduction to them. ' Surrender ' is an out and out classic and possibly my favorite Cheap Trick song of all time. Like most of the rest of the album, it's heavy, it's catchy, has great singing and interesting lyrics, and it says all it has to say in three to five minutes. ' Auf Weidersehen ' is another favorite tune of mine...it may be one of the heaviest tunes C.T. has ever done. I particularly love Bun E.'s energetic drumming on it. Zander really rips his vocal chords to shreads on this tune! Another great hard rocker is 'Stiff Competition'.Of the more pop oriented songs, I would say ' Taking Me Back ' is another personal favorite of mine. Probably should have been a hit, dang it! ' How Are You ' shows off the band's terrific sense of humor...I particularly like the reference to one of their earlier songs! The other tunes from the first half that I didn't mention are also terrific, particularly ' On Top Of The World '.My only complaint about this newly remastered version is that it doesn't include the lyrics, which WERE included on the original LP version. That is but a minor complaint. I don't think Cheap Trick ever made another album quite as great as this one.</review_text>
I was waiting for this cd for a very long time, i mean i love all Greg's album, they are intense, passionate, but Amber Headlights is giving me back the soul of the Afghan Whigs, somenthing i missed a lot for a long time . I love his voice, the way he sing, the way he loves his music. You can t explain the beauty of this cd, there are great rock-blues-love songs:the first time i heard "So Thight" it makes me jump up and down my room (i haven t done it for long time since Black Love "Going to town"), then Cigarettes (what a great song, this time i only remember i was singing the chorus with "Gentleman" in my hand), then "Domani" that in italian means tomorrow, kind of Greg's jazz slow song in which his voice is so low that you can t even try to sing like that.Then song after song i realized is the best cd i ever bought after so many years. If you don t know anything about Afghan Whigs and Greg Dulli then it is time to start to listen one of the best alternative artist of our time.</review_text>
nice CD cool beats songs like Welcome To Atlanta pick it u</review_text>
For a true Christian Spirit that glows through Ms. Winans, you'll always find her music sung straight from the heart. A Precious Pearl in the Gospel community, "Purified" continues in the CeCe tradition, of lifting our souls to a higher plain</review_text>
I picked this up in a bootleg store in Korea a few years back, since it was cheap, and I had loved the movie (perhaps more so than any other of Mallicks's others, even - speaking of which, if you get a chance to see Badlands on the big screen, do yourself a huge favour and do so).As I recall, I didn't really enjoy it on first listen. But then, somehow, I got sucked in. Almost as much as the film itself, this is a hypnotic, haunting slice of poetry. Nothing happens for about a minute, and then it builds and builds.Unforgettable, otherwordly and quite beguiling.The structure of the soundtrack (especially the songs toward the end featuring Polynesian gospel-style singing) is strongly reminiscent of the Mike Oldfield cd, 'Songs of Distant Earth'. Highly recommended, but do give it a couple of listens, because it might take a while to make its charms felt</review_text>
I was a music director at a college radio station when this came out, and along with a ton of other albums this one commanded my attention.Shoegazers??? I am sure all the label slinging yahoos are still wiping the egg off their faces. Its as if the band heard they were pigeonholed and gave them all the big finger.Just buy it...and all the rest</review_text>
WOW!  What a great collection of great classic songs!  We highly recommend this to anyone with any age kids who want to have fun and have fun without the TV!  Hokey Pokey Baby...that's what it's all about</review_text>
These guys and this album rocks.  Just because the songs force you to move other parts of your body beside your head, doesn't 'demote' it to pop.  Props to the great use of two bass guitars.  Released amid the misery/grunge rock explosion of the early 90's, this was a great escape into rock that just simply made you feel good again. This album is highly recommended.  Kill Your Television, Grey Cell Green, Cut Up, Throwing Things, Happy, and Until You Find Out are just an awesome experience.  If you can find the Grey Cell Green single release, I highly recommend that for the track entitled 'Trust.'</review_text>
I just want to put it out there...Audra McDonald is an absolute genious. Everything she touches turns to gold, and I just want to smack some of you for saying that she failed in her attempt to make a great record. This may not be the audra that we are used to, but if you listen closely she's near by. So this CD is a little less difficult vocally. So what? My favorite quality of Ms. McDonald's is that she is emotionally connected to whatever she is singing. She could record twinkle twinkle little star and I would want to listen to it over and over again because she tells a story. So if you buy this CD, listen to it more than once. Let it grow on you. Let Audra do her thang children. Let her do her thang.</review_text>
It's been a while since someone has sang the praises of this album.  This is a timeless work.  It never gets old no matter how many times it is played.  I've had this album for 5-6 years and I pull it out every summer.  Great music for boating or BBQ's on the deck.  I promise you will love it.  Something everyone should have in their collection</review_text>
I've gotten a copy of this cd for every friend I have so they can know what I'm talking about when I crack a random joke.  My mom even loves it and she would not be considered the 'target market'.  For Mitch check out his first cd, if you can find it in stores, if not, go online</review_text>
There are some amazing moments on this record.  I find myself freaking out to three songs in a row, and waiting for the fourth song to end.  The De La collaboration is weak; it's got the great Wild-Style instrumental but the chorus is obnoxious.  Some of the more R&B-toned tracks fall flat in my opinion.</review_text>
I was a big fan of this band's song "Rock'n'roll highschool", and I recently saw the documentary about them, so, when I saw this anthology selling for around $15 in Australia, I thought I'd take a punt by buying it. My thoughts on this album are similar to the ones I had for the 3 CD Johnny O'Keefe collection [reviewed at this site by me]. Namely, overall, the album is very listenable, with some standout tracks. As with the JOK album, this album is/was great value for money, considering how many songs you get for the price.Of the songs I PARTICULARLY like on this album, and the ones I have been listening to quite a bit, are:Rock'n'roll High School. This song still rocks after all these years.Do you remember rock'n'roll radio? Good song, though it never got the airplay that the previous song seemed to get here in Australia.Chinese Rock. An Easter Egg song!! Never heard this song before, but it is an instant classic. Very catchy.Danny Says. Another Easter Egg song. Takes some repeated listening to get into, but once you do that, it gets high rotation on your cd player.To me, I can see why The Ramones are considered founders of Punk. At least as far as the music is concerned. However, The Sex Pistols truly DEFINE Punk for me. They have the whole package which I identify with Punk...namely, the punk sound, and the incendiary, anarchistic lyrics.The Ramones are more middle-class sounding, to my ears at least.I'm surprised at how poppy/boppy The Ramones are. To me they sound like a Punk Motown band. One of the songs on the 2nd cd, I think, has that classic punk sound, but I didn't make a note of the title. Might have to edit that song in later...could be "Endless Vacation"?Lastly, the song Danny Says, almost comes across as a Punk Beach Boys song.Overall, the anthology is often 'samey', but listenable nonetheless, with a handful of songs that I consider 'high rotation' worthy.Just remembered, "Endless Vacation" seems a terrific song too. Will have to listen to that some more-I've currently got the 1st cd in my cd player. P.S. Listened to this song last night. Really good-the fast talking bit in the song reminds me of the equally good, if not better song by Australian act TISM [or This Is Serious Mum]-"[He'll never be an] ol' man River", about River Phoenix, amongst other people. TISM, like The Ramones, can do bad taste well.</review_text>
This is one of my favorite releases from Common. This chi town warrior crafted an underground release that will bring a vibrant smile to the hardcore hip hop head and even awaken the minds of some of the fake commercial rap artist lovers. Songs like I used to love h.e.r and ressurection start the classic album and take you on the road to classic chicago hip hop. Not only the lyrics are dope but also the beats and the hooks. This is a pivotal album that needs to be in everyone's collectio</review_text>
Wow, this album takes me back to the fall of '79,around the same time as MJ was taking overthe world with his scorching solo debut "Off The Wall"!!Both of these albums got heavy rotation on my turntableand were house party essentials when I was a 15 yr oldkid spinning the hot joints of the day!At this time, Prince was still a virtual unknownto the mainstream, but to a hip urban audiencecomprised mostly of blacks, gays, and ultra-hip whiteswho really knew what time it was,this LP served as notice that a "new thang" wasbrewin' in Minneapolis that was going to takethe pop world by storm in a few short years!From the opening track, "I Wanna Be Your Lover",his first big single (gold) to the rockin'"Why You Wanna Treat Me So Bad?", which also wasa single and a true fan fave!--To "Sexy Dancer" which was sure to bring everybodyto the dance floor and into a frenzy!Prince then cools down the mood with"When We're Dancing Close and Slow",which is just beautiful with its sparse pianoand acoustic 12-string guitar--one of his manyunderrated slow jams of all time!Then Side 2 opened with the pretty "With You"and into the scorching rockalistic ode to femalebisexuality.."Bambi", which still knocks me for a loop!I've had the pleasure of seeing him perform thissong live twice down through the years..once in 1980 during his "Dirty Mind Tour" andagain in 1992 during his "Nude Tour"while I was overseas!--Awesome!!Then there's what I call "The Great Triplicate"..."Still Waiting" (another underrated slow classic!),followed by what is to me, the definitive versionof "I Feel For You"(no disrespect to thegreat Chaka Khan!), followed by anotherunderrated slow jam masterpiece"It's Gonna Be Lonely", which still sendsme today at 41 the same as it did whenI first heard it at 15!This album was Prince's first Platinum album,proving that he (at only 22) was indeed ahitmaker and one to watch!This album and the next one, "Dirty Mind",served as a changing of the gaurd from the olderestablished innovators of that day likeStevie Wonder, Earth,Wind & Fire andParliament / Funkadelic, etc. &is an essential if your collecting Prince classics!In fact, you can't go wrong with this katbetween his debut, 1978's "For You" to1987's "Sign O' The Times"...it just doesn'tget any better!</review_text>
Growing up with Classical Rock and having enjoyed rock music by Rod Stewart, I didn't think I'd like this CD. One evening I was having dinner at a friend's home and they had this one playing. It was beautiful. Being a little older now (in my early 40's), I enjoy more mellow music than the head banging variety that is heard now. This CD of Rod's was nostalgic, romantic and extremely easy to listen to.</review_text>
These guys are the best group out right now. Every single rapper is AMAZING even Bizarre who is not great so far as flow but probably has the funniest lyrics. This album brought me some of my favorite songs to date including Sh*t Can Happen, Pistol Pistol, Ain't Nuttin' But Music, American Psycho, Fight Music & Revelation. My favorite rappers are Swifty & Eminem but the fact is every one should have a solo album out by now (besides Em, only Proof (R.I.P.) & Bizarre do... which are my least favorite rappers in the group) Every song is great even the skits are enjoyable. If you don't have this yet, you are missing out on one of the best cds ever</review_text>
Joan. You don't love me. Because I'm a guy. But I have loved you since 1976. Ok so I'm an old man (age 43). So what. She's just the best rock and roll female on the planet. I like the young ones like Sahara Hotnights and the Donnas as well but they just don't measure up to Joan Born To Be Bad Jett. This album - like most of her other albums - consists of a mix of old and new songs. Doesn't mattar. I love it. And the video... well it confirms what we have always known. Not that it matters. The music matters</review_text>
The series of "Golden Age of American Rock & Roll" released byACE couldn't have a better end. During the past 15 years theyhave delighted us with a series of 10 CD's with 30 songs eachremembering the Rock & Roll era mostly with minor top hits between 1954 and 1963. One reason for their tremendous successis the superb quality of all the recordings no matter fromwhat year the original song was. Now besides these series of 10CD's from the R&R era they have launched another 2 specialeditions with the same title: one with the special noveltyedition and another with the special country edition. Bothdeserve more than 5 stars.The song selection on the novelty edition is just out of sight!Most of the songs brought back memories from a long long timeago since these weren't available after the time they weretop hits. I never found them back on what compilation so everuntil ACE put them all together 45 years later. And with asound quality better than in their original version on 45rpm.Therefore don't hesitate. Buy it together with the countryedition and you will have 60 songs for utmost pleasure; 60songs we grew up with and now with no scratches on them.</review_text>
Nothing at all like boy-band CDs (InSync, Backstreet Boys, etc like editorial compared it to).  While some of the songs are over-processed and don't allow Clay's strong, clear, and beautiful voice to shine through enough, it is overall a very good CD. It has some catchy tunes on it.  His second CD, Merry Christmas With Love, allows his wonderful voice to shine through even more</review_text>
this is the soundtrack that led me into the wonderful world of glam rock!  it is outstanding and i could just play it again and again....  it is certainly one of the most brilliant albums out there and probably my favourite soundtrack of all time.</review_text>
This album is absolutely beautiful. The full musical sound and talent of Calexico together with the soothing warm vocals of Iron & Wine make the perfect match.It's almost unheard of that I love EVERY song on an album, but this one makes the cut. Each song wraps you in a warm trance, a coccoon of well-being. It has a really positive emotional effect on me. It creates an ambiance of gentle strength.Wonderful. I really hope to see a these two bands getting together for more albums</review_text>
I was at the Brighton concerts that these recordings were mostly taken from and as a reminder of two stunning nights of music they can't be better. Standout tracks include the two by Martha Wainwright, the two by Teddy Thompson, Perla Batalla's "Bird on a Wire", Rufus' "Chelsea Hotel"  and (from the Sydney concert) Antony's  "If it be your Will". Two major disappointments though; the inclusion of U2 as backing band for Leonard Cohen's own version of "Tower of Song" seems done for purely commercial reasons and doesn't work,  and the nonsensical ommission of Linda Thompson's sublime take on "Alexandra Leaving". Here's hoping it's included on the dvd release</review_text>
This is not only Brian Eno's best album, but one of the finest albums ever made--a work of simple beauty, complex intelligence, and imagination..</review_text>
...because it felt like it predicted that I'd be listening to the cd someday.  I'm referring to the line "The kids of AD 2000 will draw from the music much the same sense of well being and warmth that we do today."  Now I admit that I was 18 in 2000 so I guess I technically missed the literal kid description by a year, but the more general prediction of the inter-generational, timeless appeal of the Beatles was right on.  I didn't see them on the Ed Sullivan show.  I was born almost twelve years after they broke up, and about a year after the tragic shooting of John Lennon.  But I, like many, many other people born too late to have experienced Beatlemania as it was occuring, have since become a huge fan of all their work.This album has my favorite of all the Beatle's songs:  I'll Follow The Sun.  That song alone is worth the five stars, but thankfully the rest of the album is great too.  This album gets a little bit too much grief, and it may not be quite as amazing as something like Abbey Road, but it's still better than just about anything else out there.</review_text>
Call it American folk, call it alt.country, call it what you like, but if you heard this Aussie trio on CBS or NPR earlier this week, suffice to say their in a category all their own.  Love that harmonica.  Up All Night by the Waifs is appropriately titled.  I'll be up all night listening to it</review_text>
It's sometimes hard to think there are really anymore pleasing melodies out there, but thank Halstead & co. for proving me wrong. I am happily pleased with their latest, and very eagerly awaited, effort. Instead of the depths of melancholia and loveliness on, say, OUT OF TUNE, they give us 41+ minutes of what seems like basically "it's good, everything's going just way OK..." It's happy. Maybe I'll hear a lyric later that says something else, but for those for whom music is the priority, you can't go wrong with this considered and experienced and artful pop. Four and a half stars</review_text>
I bought this CD on a whim after I heard Joaquin Phoenix was directing their "Tired of Being Sorry" video.  Whoa!  I was addicted!  I couldn't stop listening to it...I had to get a 2nd copy for the car just so I could stop carrying it back and forth.  GREAT driving music!  The songs are catchy and have a great beat...I haven't heard anything this good in a long while.  I had to have more immediately and luckily found some earlier stuff of Scott Thomas'....more on the acoustic/indie side, but awesome!  I highly recommend Lovers & Thieves (CDbaby.com)  My faves from Ringside are "Struggle", "Trixie", and "Dreamboat 730". You will not be disappointed</review_text>
you definetely gotta own this. After an 11 years break from the music scene, Seger's back full-force. Already 400.000 copies sold. More info on Bob at [...</review_text>
Jon Brion does such a great job capturing emotion with great music. hes also so damn great and fitting sound witht the mood of a movie. if you liked this movie, by all means, buy the soundtrack. you will not be dissapointed. Eevery time it listen it not only reminds me of the amazing movie, it makes me feel.. just.. good.Also, be sure to pick up his solo record, Meaningless.IF YOU LIKED THE MOVIE, BUY THIS CD, YOU WONT REGRET IT</review_text>
Attell is one of the few decent comics out there right now. I wasn't that big of a fan until I saw this in a record store and decided to give it a shot. I'm running out of comedy albums, there's not that many good ones out there. So I bought it and I was impressed. The audience is obviously drunken college kids who were very familiar with the show "Insomniac". They would laugh and scream if just slammed the microphone into his forehead the whole night. He has very good timing and delivery though and his jokes have very unpredictable punchlines for the first time you are hearing them. You never see the punchline coming a mile away. He is vulgar so if you are sensitive in any way to graphic sexual scenarios and profanity, stay away. He is one of the few that I enjoy now, tragically Mitch Hedberg died in March because he was another. The increasingly popular Dane Cook doesn't do it for me. Cook's Retaliation CD has broken all sorts of records for a comedy album. I think Cook is very marketable to the college, 20something crowd, guys like him because he's the loud obnoxious drinking buddy from the frat, chicks think he's cute. I recommomend Attell myself, he is vulgar but is just a better comedian</review_text>
umm...I don't think you quite got the point of this album. It is not about the artists that you like, it is about the artists that inspired Moore. Your ignorance forces me to do nothing but laugh. I find it funny that you feel you are making a point by saying "F*ck you SOAD" and so on. Have some respect for other's opinions. Unfortunately, you are a steriotypical "ignorant American".So with all that said, and with all due respect, I say, F*ck you pal</review_text>
I'm a huge Matchbox fan and I listen to a collection of all 3 albums ALL DAY long.  I never get tired of it!  Rob Thomas has such a powerful voice that it just beckons to me.  His lyrics are soul searching and speak directly to me.What a great band!  What a great album!  What a great musical ride!</review_text>
This album is incredible.  For me this is one of those few albums that defines a time in my life.  An album that for months I played over and over.  An album that I've played countless times, that I have passed out to when I came home after a late night, that I have ran to, and worked out to, that I play at work for a pick-me up.  It's great.  It's filled with so much emotion and passion, from beginning to end its just brilliant, the entire album.  The songs are composed more like classical music with sweeping scores that start off slow and steady and then build up and explode into these intense jams.  I love it.  You have to buy this album.  Then buy their next self titled album.  Then play it and play it, and play it.  It grows on you.  I can't wait to see them live...</review_text>
One of the best Doobie collections out there "Greatest Hits" lives up to its name focusing on the singles the band recorded and that charted in their long career. Some of the songs here are the single versions (meaning they were edited and are shorter than the album versions)and this might be a problem for some fans as they may want the full length versions of songs. Maybe it's because they were trying to squeeze more music onto the CD. Either way fans may want to be aware of that.In fact even on the boxed set we get "Listen to the Music", "Nobody" and "Rockin' Down the Highway" in their single incarnations. Perhaps its because that was the way fans originally heard them on the radio. Either way, fans looking for the full length versions of these songs would do well to pick up one of the import "Greatest Hits" collections or wait for the remastered CDs coming out later this year. This set does have one track not on the boxed set--"Without You" a great rocker. The CD booklet is exactly like the larger booklet that comes with the boxed set just laid out a bit differently.This definitely covers the highlights of the band's career whether it be the Tom Johnston rockin' years, Michael McDonald's blue-eyed soul stage or the band's reunion phase this has a bit of it all.  Personally, I would love to see a two disc distillation of the band's "Greatest Hits" with a second disc of album tracks such as "I Cheat the Hangman", "Losin' End", "The Captain and Me" and "How Do the Fools Survive?". In the meantime this single disc compilation will have to do for most fans.The sound is terrific pulling from the remasters produced by Bill Inglot for the boxed set. Detail and clarity is remarkable and puts the previously issued "Best of" pair to shame. This is the only place to get their singles from their first in 1970 "Nobody" to their last (when this compilation was put togetherin 2001) "Dangerous" released in 1991.</review_text>
Okay Bryce nickelback yells not screams BIG difference and wtf sum 41 your kiding right sum 41 does not scream at all and you say "I like music" well you dont know any thing about music and another thing you poser is that Limp bizkit is NOT METAL they rap so how can you say that they scream ALL the time...limp bizkit is the WORST band out their they give a bad name to music itself and as for you dont write anymore reviews until you know more about music wich with the information i just got from you that will take a LONG tim</review_text>
The Sundays come out with a CD once a decade, thus putting me in constant cravings for new material. Though Camera Obscura is very original and very much their own band, they satisfy the cravings that only Harriet Wheeler could touch. Truly vast and intimate at the same time, and a voice that speaks to something very deep, sad and lovely inside you</review_text>
I used to listen to a friend's copy of the original "Metal Box" of EP's, when it first came out.Years later the "Second Edition" came out on LP's for those of us who hadn't sprung for the Metal Box before it sold out.Eventually the Second Edition came out on this CD. So I finally could own a digital copy myself. Pristine, audio quality at least as good as the original Metal Box in my opinion, if I remember correctly.You do need to listen to this. You do need to buy a copy and get other people to listen to this too</review_text>
Michelle Branch carved out a place for herself in the young female pop singer market serveral years ago with a brilliant debut and a successful if derivitive duet with Carlos Santana.  This record is her first with friend Jessica Harp.   The ladies mine the borderline between the singer/songwriter and country genres for quality songs that should fit well in the americana format.Highlights include the opening track Leave the Pieces, Way Back Home, The Good Kind, and the title track Stand Still Look Pretty.  Of special note is the presence of producer/multi-instrumentalist John Leventhal on many tracks.I recommend this record for folks who like songs that don't sound like formula country</review_text>
What a great album this is, not only is the music a real pleasure to listen to, but the lyrics are a hoot! Wayne is not afraid to experiment, he skillfully combines old school elements with new in such a natural way. The songs pull you right in as if your listening to an old favorite you haven't heard in a long time. This album instantly became one of my favorites. I bought two more to give as gifts.</review_text>
As with her second album, I love "Thankful". Kelly Clarkson has a beautiful voice and has a lot of talent.I especially like "Whats up lonely", "you thought wrong", and "just missed the train". Although the whole album is very good.</review_text>
Just wonderful, wonderful!  Even if you haven't seen the movie buy the music...so lovely and refreshing...of course, there is no one like Van Morrison (always and forever a 5-star), he tops the all-time charts for me...Kevin Kline is so smooth with La Mer...and the rest of the music is soulful and enchanting...you just can't miss with this one</review_text>
The album is straight raw. Kurupt's lyrical abilities are unmatched and go hand in hand with Daz's Delivery. The G-Funk beats are the best they've ever sounded. As a whole, you will not skip one song at all. A+</review_text>
cool CD...haven't heard it in probably 15 to 20 years...It was fun to hear it again....Funny though, it's a bit different than the way I remember it</review_text>
I was waiting in anticipation for this cd to arrive and was not disapointed.  Etta is the bes</review_text>
1978 the stage is set for an album to emerge out of the crumbling decay that is the city of  Cleveland. Just like their other fellow Ohion's DEVO, the guys in PERE UBU obviously saw the world in a slightly different way.I have owned this recording in various formats since 1980 and I have never grown tired of this album. I find this album to have an almost timless quality in that even though it was recorded over 25 years ago,  if the original band itself tried to go back into the studio and re-record it, it  just would'nt happen. There is just a certain magic that they  captured in 1978, as to the music itself I tend to break - up this  album into 2 distinct parts. Side One being the more accessible "drunken" side with more garage style sounds almost punk rock in its leanings guitar wise, but a little too intelligent, just listen to the lyrics.Side 2 is definately the "drug" side like a bad acid trip vocalist David Thomas takes you on a journey thru the seedy back streets of Cleveland(I have never heard smashing bottles sound so creepy or atmospheric) and the rest of the band help to re-inforce this craziness by going off in a million different directions.I could give you a track by track anylisis of this record but suffice to say that music is somethig you should anylize, experience and consume at your own leisure, and then form your own opion of what each of the songs on this album  mean to you. So if you loved things like Throbbing Gristle's song Hamburger Lady then u will surely love Pere Ubu's album the Mordern Dance.As another reviewer mentioned before Black Francis of The Pixies fame must have almost certainly listened to these guys.I also hear there influences in recent  bands such as Portishead and Queens of the Stone Age just to name a few.So if you enjoy bold experimental music that is still as fresh sounding as it was in 1978 then give your ears a chance to have a listen to this album, even if you have to beg,steal or borrow it.</review_text>
this is my favorite ghostface slbum. it has a geat vibe to the cd and you could not get sick of hearing it. check it out and you wont be dissapointed.rating A</review_text>
I feel bad doing this becuase I love Iggy and the stooges but the quality on this set is pretty bad. All the live recordings are worth listening to and probably owning but the quality is very rough and can get frustrating. It's like the first Beatles Anthology set: the material is amazing but the quality is bad. On the plus side the studio outtakes are decent quality wise and amazing content wise. The packaging is also very nice. I just though I'd share this information before you drop all the money on the set. If you are a Stooges fan don't hesitate purchase now but if this is your introduction you should probably wait.</review_text>
The Four Seasons have always been one of my favorite groups. I think Frankie Valli has one of the best voices in the world and without the doubt the greatest falsetto in existence, and the rest of the group had harmonies that only The Beach Boys could match. nd for band that has had as any hits as them are destined to have a barrage of greatst hits collection. Up until now, I always felt the best way to obtain all the Four Seasons' best songs was by getting Rhino's single disc "The Very Best Of The Four Seasons". Well, I was wrong. "In Season: The Frankie Valli and the 4 Seasons Anthology" is the definitve Four Seasons collection.On these two discs, you find all the essential Four Seasons songs, including "Sherry", "Big Girls Don't Cry", "Walk Like A Man", "Dawn (Go Away)", "Rag Doll", "Let's Hang On (To What We've Got)", "Working My Way Back To You", "Opus 17 (Don't You Worry 'Bout Me)", "Tell It To The Rain" (an often forgotten Top 10 hit and my favorite Four Seasons song ever), "Who Loves You" and "December 1963 (Oh, What A Night)". But the majority of the cd is a wealth of rarities, including many songs that were either album tracks, uncharted singles or Frankie Vali solo singles. Plus, you get it for about $25.00, which I consider fairly cheap for a cd with 51 songs.The 30+ page booklet is excellent, filled with track information (chart positions, etc.), rare photos and an excellent essay written by Pat Sierchio. This is an absolute must have</review_text>
I got what I wanted in the time frame promised...the way it's supposed to work</review_text>
Dave Alvin's sublime new CD is a cadre of songs written by Californians either born and/or who grew up in this land. The lyrics talk about what it means to live and love in the land of dreams and broken promises. It is also a look at the story of the frontier in this large western state. Dave Alvin has a voice that is deep and smooth and like a friend of his said "infiltrates your brain like a shot of Jack Daniels."Dave Alvin says "We started with a list of 25 songs, from Steve Gillette to Captain Beefheart and everything in between. I was even thinking of doing 'Going Back to Cali' as a blues thing. In the end, though, it wasn't about choosing my favorite songs so much as choosing songs that I could sing well enough and arrange differently enough to make them interesting." He has picked these songs carefully and each of them fit his style and voice well. Of them all, and I like each and every one, my two favorite interpretations are "Here In California" and "Surfer Girl""California Bloodlines" is a sentimental rendition of John Stewart's fine work, which finds peace in knowing "There's California bloodlines in my heart / There's a California woman in my song ... And a California heartbeat in my soul.""Redneck Friend" the Jackson Brown less well known song was just right for Dave Alvin's style."Kern River" is a song Merle Haggard wrote after losing his best friend, and it is a melancholy rendition."Blind Love" from Tom Waits is sung in a bluesy style with some doo wops thrown in to give it style."Here in California" one of my favorites is sung  with Christy McWilson. He felt this song needed a woman's perspective."I'm Bewildered" is an old Richard Berry, the great guitarist's tune. Backed up by The Calvenes."Sonora's Death Row" written by Blackie Ferrell is a fable that examines the price of acting out of greed and anger and ends up a as gun fighter's tale."Down On the Riverbed" is an old Los Lobos song that is sung in Dave Alvin's old blues style."Between the Cracks" a song written by Dave Alvin and Tom Russell is a heartbreaking tale of young boy told by a loving woman, with a rollicking tune. This is the only Dave Alvin orignal song in this CD."Don't Look Now" a song sung by John Fogerty is an old Creedence Clearwater revival. Bluesy and fun to make it Dave's."Tramps and Hawkers" by Jim Ringer is a delicate country waltz, come dance with me, BK.  Lyrics are wonderful."Loser" by Jerry Garcia and Robert Hunter, is darker with more infused blues than Garcia's version. It couldn't sound less like a Deadhead song. Dave Alvin put in a psychedelic section  that is a tribute to the San Francisco sound"Surfer Girl" Brian Wilson's first song is done with doo-wops and again The Calvanes did background. This is my favorite of  Dave Alvin's interpretations, and he sings this surfin'song with some tongue in cheek.Dave Alvin gives voices of California to this CD. Voices from the California coastline and the surf music it inspired to the "brown earth of the state" to the frontier life and the lives won and lost. Dave Alvin had made his mark on this state, and the writers who loved their lives by writing and singing about the state they love. Play it often and pay attention to the subtle influence of this CD. "California Dreamin'?" Highly recommended. prisrob 6-04-06</review_text>
Before I review this classic Rolling Stones album, I just want to point out that Juke Box Hero and whirligig are one in the same person. A troll who likes to trash great music and praise Dire Straits(who are a good band but nit the greatest) and Green Day. I say CUT THE SHENANIGANS!Now that is off my chest, back to the review!The Rolling Stones' second album to be released on their own label fittingly called Rolling Stones Records, which was distributed by Atlantic at the time(now Virgin/Capitol), entitled Exile on Main Street was released in May of 1972.The album was the band's only double studio album but is one of rock's greatest double studio albums in history and ranks up there with other classic 2-record sets like The Wall, Quadrophenia, The Lamb Lies Down on Broadway and Tommy among others.Before guitarist Keith Richards' heroin addiction took over for some time in the mid-1970s, he was what the late producer Jimmy Miller called a workhorse.The album was recorded at Keith's home in France and at Olympic Studios in London and Muscle Shoals in Alabama and in Los Angeles.Keith's music and frontman Mick Jagger's lyric writing was arguably at its peak on Exile on Main Street.Songs like the opening rocker Rocks Off, the 50s sounding rocker Rip This Joint, the album's hit Tumbling Dice, the country-ish Sweet Virginia, Keith's classic rocker Happy(and it is his most famous track which he sang), the slow-ish Soul Survivor, the fast-paced blues rocker All Down the Line and the soul sounding Shine a Light are classics which sound like they could have been recorded yesterday.Ventilator Blues was another highlight as it was the only song that Mick and Keith wrote was co-written by guitarist Mick Taylor whom just tore the place up from 1969-74(his solos just rocked from 1969-74).Exile on Main Street was The Rolling Stones' second consecutive #1 album and another million seller.The tour in support of the album saw the band getting bigger and bigger. Almost 35 years on, this album is still a classic!This album is hugely recommended</review_text>
I had originally heard "Drive Away" on a radio station and I was instantly blown away.  Upon seeing the music video for it, I decided to buy the CD.  I was hardly disappointed.  The emotion that goes into the CD is amazing and it's definitly a CD to sit down and enjoy.  I saw the band in concert and met Jonah after the show and was amazed by how down to earth he was. Give Gratitude a chance and you won't be disappointed.</review_text>
A very proud and highly recommended production, it's a real pitty this cd is not available, i still have this one as a precious thing, i hear it all the time as well as i want. Nobody will forget Jeff Lynne as an excellent musician, ever</review_text>
It tiptoes through the years and delivers the punch, but as I wrote in my review, I never thought Shangri La was going to be the last, though it appears just that. But All in the Suit, man, they did that after Shangri la de and I wonder, if this was the direction to come, my god!!!!It's worth it for that track alone..5 stars is my own way of saying thank you, but it is not just sentimental, the only album in the short career that wasn't great was Tiny Music, but the quote "Trippin" made up for it.It's a shame it's over. I don't like revolver, it's not evolution for Weiland and I can't imagine him being happy there, it steps back and all I ever hoped was that someday this band, STP, would reign supreme and been given the praise and adulation they deserve. ALl i can do is give stars, but I would rather buy another STP album or go see them live...is rock dead? I think it is and it went with this band</review_text>
Well, here we are.  One of the true works of the electronic genre in the 90's, "Lifeforms" is true sonic adventure.  This is obviously some of the best work that FSOL ever did.  "Lifeforms" is a double album of electronic and ambient moments spliced together, interchanged and meshed.  For ambient work, it has a lot of randomness and bright detail thrown in at a rapid pace.  There is a lot of energy and terse grab to the songs, despite their being ambient.  It is very original, I praise originality in music.  Give it a try, put on some "Flower" "Bird Wings" or some "Elaborate Burn.</review_text>
I'm really not sure what the purpose of this Disc is, other than as an Adam Ant filler for those collectors who need to add more to their collection.  This is a slightly scaled down version of the truly best of "Antics in the Forbidden Zone" which detailed Adam Ant's career up until the bombastic "Apollo 9" album.  "Essential" adds the 1990 single "Room at the Top" from "Manners & Physique" album and "Wonderful" from the 1995 "Wonderful" album.  These two songs are not really worth the cost of admission and I think are probably the weakest songs on those two albums, anyway.  And of course "Essential" ignores the unreleased 1993 album "Persuasion" which had some really good songs on it.  If you want later period Adam Ant, "Manners" is really good and "Wonderful" is, well, less than wonderful, but still a worthwhile Adam Ant.  If you want an introduction to Adam Ant, the chronologically catalogued "Antics" is great and a more complete collection!</review_text>
I love jazzy hip-hop of the early '90s and if you do too,this is the album you must listen to! all the songs are wonderful but there are some of these which are something of supernatural like the famous (and the most beautiful of the entire cd!) "Award Tour", "Steve Birko(stir it up)" and "Midnight".enjoy this pearl of REAL hip-hop!!!</review_text>
...wandering through the dorms in the 1970's this was one of those albums that was in everyone's collection. It was usually very near the front of the record stack. Every time I hear that opening guitar riff from Reelin' in the Years I glide back to a very nice place in time. If you hope to understand the evolution of US pop/rock music you need to become intimate with this recording!</review_text>
This is some great music from a litte know movie. You won't be let down</review_text>
The more I listen to this album, the more I love it. What's sounds somewhat familiar even formulaic at first becomes totally captivating on further listening.  Like a girl you thought was nothing special at first glance but then becomes beautiful as you get to know the complete package. This is one cooooool CD.</review_text>
I love these albums.  Get all 3 cause they are great</review_text>
ahh this is a great cd. i listen to it every day. it's fun music, and the lyrics are wonderful. hope everybody enjoys it as much as i do</review_text>
Collin has done it again.  I didn't think I'd enjoy a CD as much as his &quot;The Walls Came Down,&quot; but &quot;Tracks&quot; is just great.  Every song is better than the last.  You can't go wrong with Collin Raye  and you can't find anyone with a better voice.  Buy this one</review_text>
The first time I read this book was at the age of 13. My mother had an old, worn, 1950s copy of the book on our bookshelf, and one day I just decided to give it a try. I think the first 50 pages were a bit of a mystery to me. I remember struggling with the language at the beginning, and having to look up several words in the dictionary. After 100 pages, I had finally "learnt the language," and managed to at last translate it into my native tongue. I enjoyed it, and over the years I returned to it again and again. Now, at the age of 35, I practically have numerous passages memorized, and reading the book is no longer a culture shock. Every word of this novel is an old friend, and I wouldn't remove a single one from the text. This is the book I turn to when I'm in the mood to read, but not in the mood to read something new.Every time I read it, I am struck by its relevance. I don't mean the morals or the need to marry well in order to win approval from society (although I think we still see a little of that to this day). I refer to the characters. Their personalities and basic code of principals are timeless. I can identify with every single character in this novel. When Lizzy and Mr. Darcy fell in love, their courtship could have taken place anywhere and at any point in time. That is why her novels are so well adapted into modern films.You cannot possibly do wrong by reading this novel</review_text>
Like many of the highly talented and innovative groups of the 1980's, The Pet Shop Boys were ahead of their time.  This album was purchased mainly for "West End Girls" and "It's a Sin."  Play this album from beginning to end without interruption - it's fantastic.  "Loves Comes Quickly" emerges for me as the best of The Pet Shop Boys remarkable and unique sound - a composition reflecting orchestral complexity and pulsating energy.  The great contributions of Great Britain and Australia to music in the 1980's in my opinion comes largely from their composers and performers effectively combining the power and harmonic complexity of some classical music compositions of the mid 1920's to the early 1950's (no doubt the origins of some great movie scores) with the emerging sophistication and always present upbeat effect of rock and roll.  You will love The Pet Shop Boys</review_text>
i recently saw them in san francisco just like one of the other reviewers, and i thought it was astonishing. i know a lot of people got mad cause they didnt move around or anything, i mean it couldn't be because they were trying to concentrate or anything like that! the great thing about this album is that all the instruments standout at the same time. farina(the lead singer)has calmed down after the last couple of albums and often times speaks his lyrics in a soft and heartfelt way that make you wish you could get into a conversation with him right then and there.and his guitar playing has even matures after the bed is in the ocean. the drummer just flat out rocks. his punctuality is a lot of the reason why these guys are so tight. the bass speaks just as well as the guitar does and sometimes takes over as the guitar holds it together and the bassist go off on his own little excursion. well, if you have a problem with a band not rocking out, i dont know what to tell you. it is jazzy, but let me be the one to tell you this is the best jazz i've heard. i think this is the only path they could of taken. you got to evolve. sometimes that cant always be a good thing but in this case ,karate is the exception. love this</review_text>
OMG!! This is Relient Ks best CD yet. You should buy it, even if you didn't care for their other CDs. Because....well...it ROCKS!!</review_text>
Brian Regan is simply a comedic genius.  This cd is especially funny after having seen him live--you can just picture his hilarious gestures and facial expressions!  He has managed to create a hysterical routine based on the silly stuff we've all said/done/thought.  While I too enjoy comedians who are more "cutting edge", I don't think a routine has to be peppered with profanity to be funny.  This cd is well worth any price; check out his DVD and his live show, too</review_text>
You can resume EDDIE COCHRAN very well with one cd.After all,when he died he was only 21 years old.This selection is almost the same if you except 5 songs of the LEGENDARY MASTER SERIES released in 1990.His best songs are there:SUMMERTIME BLUES was of course a favorite of THE WHO ,who often featured it in their concerts.I am particularly fond of JEANNIE,JEANNIE,JEANNIE,C'MON EVERYBODY and the marvellous SOMETHIN'ELSE with it's great shuffle,a trademark of EDDIE.If you are interested in rock's early days,you'll enjoy this cd</review_text>
If you were lucky enough to buy the soundtrack when first released in 1987 on Enigma Records, hang on to that out of print gem!  Straight To Hell is back on CD as Straight to Hell Returns, and may have a lot more tracks this time, but it also deleted two tracks from the original release and shortens another track.Not appearing this time are: "The Good, The Bad And The Ugly" by The Pogues, and my personal favorite "Money, Guns And Coffee" by Pray For Rain.  The track "The Killers" by Pray For Rain ran 2 minutes 55 seconds on the original, but on this new release was shortened to only 2 minutes.  This is rather perplexing considering Straight To Hell Returns runs a total of 55 minutes 7 seconds, which would have left room for those other tracks to be included (since CDs can run a total of 79 minutes 59 seconds).  I'm deducting a point from my rating of this CD because the missing tracks should have been included!On the plus side, this new release contains a lot of short instrumental tracks from the film that were not on the original CD release in 1987, as well as some brief dialogue excerpts.The film was a misunderstood classic, and the soundtrack of spaghetti western-style rock is wonderful: The Pogues, Joe Strummer, Pray For Rain, Zander Schloss, Elvis Costello's MacManus Gang, and even dialogue excerpts from Courtney Love before she was, well, I guess the word is "famous."  If you're a fan of any of these artists, you'll love this assortment of songs...those not familiar with the film may not be able to absorb the atmosphere these songs and instrumentals create, so get the film on DVD and you'll appreciate the works of these artists so much more.The liner notes claim this CD is to be considered the "official" soundtrack, while the first release of it back in 1987 was basically a "souvenir."  I enjoy both releases immensely, but since I was listening to those other deleted tracks for nearly 20 years now, it's sad to not hear them this time around</review_text>
This is Jewel's first CD and I enjoyed it especially Foolish Games and You Were Meant For Me. I can't wait for her latest</review_text>
linkin park are still together and they are making their next album, it is due out eairly next year. mike just did this for fun.look into things a little more buddy before you start saying things.Oh yeah, and if you like good hip-hop, you'll like this album. give it a shot. you dont have to be a linkin park fan to enjoy this record, since its nothing like LP.peace</review_text>
I'm just starting to become a true fan of Pigpen.  Earlier, I just didn't get him and I would constantly skip forward to more of the GD extended jams.  Lately, I've started to get what he was all about and what made him such an important part of the early dead shows.  I'm glad I picked up this set.It's Pigpen's night and we should all be happy for this nice memory.  Pick it up.Note: the rest of the band has some fine moments too!!</review_text>
At the end of the day, when you come home from school or work, one can't say &quot;I feel great.&quot; Rather than great, we are stressed and tired. The sounds of falling rain is evermore relaxing that this CD captures it it almost perfectly. I too, am always stressed at the end of a work day and have relaxed to the sound of falling rain; and it does work. It would also be helpful to listen to while sleeping. With quiet, natural sounds, it will have a soporific effect on its listeners and relax you</review_text>
If this is to truly be GYBE's last piece of work, then they've concluded their brief and dynamic catalog on a fitting note.While I still believe "Lift Yr. Skinny Fists..." is their masterwork, "Yanqui" is easily a close second.  Where "Fists" had a broader range of sounds and textures - elements of sacred and profane - "Yanqui" is more balanced and focused.  Although you could argue this point, I think "Yanqui" never gets as high or low as "Fists."The sound on "Yanqui" is entirely consistent with their previous releases.  As other reviewers mentioned, the only major change is the absence of field recordings, which actually helps to distinguish this album as the finale.  The lack of human voice adds a new aura of mystery to the work.Well, there is actually another surprising moment on this album: it happens during a movement about halfway into the album.  The guitars drop off, leaving only a small ensemble playing dissonant woodwinds over a steady tribal percussion.  For a few minutes it definitely doesn't sound like typical GYBE.  In fact, the dissonant horns sound almost like a Ligeti composition (although Ligeti probably wouldn't have used a steady rhythm of any kind).  Fear not.  Not only does it work, but it swells nicely into a full band tidal wave.But here's the most important point I want to make about Yanqui:  To me, it resolves some of the musical themes "Fists" introduced, which makes U.X.O. a fitting conclusion.  The last bit on "MFer=Redeemer P.1" slows way down, featuring one guitar with one violin (i think) playing together in fragile harmony, along with some distortion in the background.  When I listen to this, I can't help but think of the very beginning of "Fists," except the melody changes just enough to resolve the paranoia that  the "Fists" melody introduced.  In other words, it's like I can hear GYBE - at last - acknowledging that there does exist some...hope!...some goodness!....some peace!...in this world - the very place that's inspired them to make such dissonant music.  And, well, if GYBE can slow down and acknowledge something hopeful exists, well then, hope must exist.  Indeed, mother****er does = redeemer.Of course, they give us one last act on "Yanqui" just to kick our butts one final time.  Yes, it gets so out of control that, at one point, the siren that's blaring in the background seems appropriate.The very end, I love, as it builds and builds and builds with distortion and droning until the music finally--it suddenly ends."Yanqui U.X.O." is possibly the final act in a brief but brilliant catalog.  It's an awesome finale</review_text>
I have been a Barry Manilow fan since I was a teenager.  I have NEVER been disappointed with any of his work and this CD is no exception!  He is such a brilliant arranger and the remix of these classics is fabulous!  His voice is as good as ever!  Even my 7 year old begs to listen to the CD everytime we get in the car and she can sing all the words!</review_text>
I read some of the other reviews before I submitted this.  I don't see how someone could get upset over the liner notes.  Redd doesn't include Danny Gatton as an influence because he didn't listen to him.  As far as other reviews concerning tone and the lack of fire, well, I don't even know how to address that.  Redd has one of the best tones I've heard on the tele and his note selection is what sets him apart from other pickers.  Ever hear of diarrhea of the guitar?  Well, you won't get that on this CD because Redd doesn't play something to just play it.  This CD showcases Redd's versatility from country, to swing, to blues, to rock, it has it all.  If you like good pickin', then by this CD</review_text>
I was already a fan of Mike and the Jacksons, But when Motown 25 came on in 83, this guy set the standard for what music and performance could be and where it could go. Till this day in my lifetime that one performance at Motown 25 is the single most perfect performance I've ever seen. I remember the next day at school and the next month after that performance we had all kind of talent shows where all of the kids were trying to out moonwalk each other. The saddest and funniest part was watching the less fortunate kids who could not afford the Michael gear wearing tube socks with dress shoes and kids making home made glitter and rhinestone gloves. Hilarious. As an adult, I refuse to let the media and even Michael himself ruin my childhood memories of this untouchable piece of music.24 years later Thriller remains the album to beat</review_text>
Review no.77.A superbly/nicely done reissue of The Zombie's second 'actual' album(isn't it?).Total of 27 tracks,so since the first twelve(12)cuts were the original lp,I guess that means you get seventeen bonus tracks,wow!That's a lot,for a one-disc release.A fine CD to repeatedly play,plus keep in your 'current rotation' stack for a long time to come.It's PROBABLY just me,but these tunes SHOULD be in a different playing order.That's why I'll sometimes pre-program this CD before I listen to it.Loads of fabulous/memorable tunes to enlighten your evening with here,like "Care Of Cell 44"(three versions,but welcome),"Time Of The Season"(stereo and mono versions),the beautifully-done melodic "A Rose For Emily"(2 versions),"I Want Her,She Wants Me","Maybe After He's Gone" and a cut that I've certainly never heard before,but was quite impressed with it,"Butchers Tale".Obviously,The Zombies must've had hours of unreleased material that most of the world didn't take great notice of,until now.Simply,a must-have.Timeless top rate British Invasion rock&roll that'll never truly die</review_text>
Right, so by putting a review down for this album, I am getting labeled as an emo kid who wears his sweater too tight, cuts himself and cries over his girlfriend all day long, well too bad that's not me, I am just a normal person who can tell the diference between bad and good music. Hawthorne Heights is an emo band who are criticised by lots and loved by lots of others, I have to agree that their lyrics are quite simplistic and are used over and over, they might even sound gay at some points, although, "we are so last year" made me laugh "I should have known you better, i should blame it on the weather" wtf is that??? Anywyas so the lyrics are probably the reason why I'm giving this 4 and not 5. But here we're talking music not lyrics. The music has nothing very special to it and I can play every song on guitar, they often use the same chords except for a few songs "This Is Who We Are", but they have a lot of interesting melodies and don't just rely on power chords to make their music interesting. Even though these chord sequences are often re-used, Hawthorne Heights always manage to make their sound diverse and interesting and they are slowly imposing themsleves as the kings of knock-out choruses. The other thing I have noticed in this album is that there are much less screaming parts which is an improvement and the guitarist has finally learnt where his place is in the band (behind his guitar) but also when is a good time to scream and when it isn't. This makes them quite different from most other emo bands who literaly destroy their sound with high shrieks. Hawthorne have become a little darker and even tune down their guitars in some of their songs now adding a bit more heavyness. Also check out "Where can I stab myslef in the ears" to see how hawthorne have improved. Overall this is a step forward from their last album, it won't change the emo scene forever, but it will leave its mark in your memories and will give you a good moment when listening to it</review_text>
I am a lover of "greatest hits" compact discs but this one by far is the best one I have purchased recently.  This compact disc has almost all of the best tunes that Joe Walsh made and I highly recommend it to anyone who loves to rock!</review_text>
With his snarling, gritty guitar tones, swampy grooves, and scratchy vocals, C.C. Adcock makes butt-shakin' music that blends rockabilly, old-school Memphis R&B, New Orleans funk, Cajun dancehall tunes, and juke-joint blues. He's young, but no poseur: Having paid dues with Bo Diddley and Buckwheat Zydeco, Adcock knows rootsy textures like the back of his hand. But despite the tremolo guitar and slapped upright bass, this isn't a retro-sounding record. Adcock and his various producers bring a hip sonic edge to the music that keeps the moods fresh and the vibe ominous. Doyle Bramhall joins Adcock on two songs, and together they raise 6-string hell. Boasting richly layered guitars and heaps of attitude, Adcock's music is soulful, somewhat twisted, and deeply satisfying</review_text>
Too bad this group supported by Keith Sweat didn't go any further.  I bought it for one song, but the whole CD is great for listening.  Lyrics contain songs about love and such, and I like they way speak about it.  It gives you something to look forward to.</review_text>
I am just writing this review to correct Alexander from Russia, who cites this album as a Christianity peddler.  Leonard Cohen is a Jew, who unlike Bob Dylan (on John Wesley Harding) embraces his sense of Jewish heritage and religion within his music.  Alexander, you've brought your own interpretation to what is a distinctly Jewish artist and his work</review_text>
Hounds is an outstanding piece of work. Two outstanding pieces of work if you look at it properly. The first consisting of five individual songs, though all with a very similar feel and texture. The second is a conceptual set of songs called The Ninth Wave, which has had many meanings read into it.All five tracks from the first piece are excellent. The opening track, Running Up That Hill, is possibly Kate's greatest single of all time (up there with Wuthering Heights and Babooshka), it is a powerful song with simple but highly emotional lyrics. It has been reworked by Aussie outfit Infusion in recent years and become a big dance floor anthem for the likes of John Digweed and DJ Tiesto. It had lost none of it's appeal or sense of urgency over time.The title track is a beautiful, upbeat song. Again it has made a resurgence in the last year, thanks to mod-rock UK band The Futureheads.The Big Sky is my favourite (You want my reply? What was the question? I was looking at the big sky!). The extended mix is great and available on the 1997 EMI remastered release of Hounds.Mother Stands For Comfort is a little out of place, dark and eerie it would have felt right at home on The Dreaming. Kates vocals are, in my opinion, sublime on this track.The fantastic song, Cloudbusting, nearly deserves a review on it's own. A masterpiece in modern pop, it tells one of the best stories I've ever heard in a pop song, and combines it with one of the best video clips I've ever seen.The Ninth Wave is beyond review. You need to buy this LP and listen to it over and over again. It will mean different things to different people, and I think that is what makes it so amazing. Commonly interpretted as the story of a woman drowning, I have weaved several meanings through the story at various times of my life, but each ends happily - the whimsical The Morning Fog makes sure of it... Else, just put it on and lose yourself in the soundscape, read nothing into it and take the Ninth Wave for a musical ride. That's my favourite way to listen to it.Finally, if you ever need to test the ability of a piece of sound equipment, say the $2000 amplifier you're about to splurge on, take the remastered LP as your test. The percussion should be clear, the vocals crisp and the stereo separation precise. An outstanding LP in every way!</review_text>
Need to say more? This is one of the most beautiful and honest records western popular music ever seen. She sings beauty, so lovely, as some fairy enchanting gnomes in a huge yet peaceful forest, away from the horrors of humanity. That alien feeling you'll get it since its first five seconds and it will lasts till the end. Druids of the world unite</review_text>
what a beautiful album! one of the rare albums that  has no fillers or weaker cuts. i'd call it a classic but that makes it sound dusty. these songs could come out in 20 years and still sound fresh.</review_text>
REM has had a helluva lot of hits, and has remained a radio staple and has been a big influence on later bands.  This 18-track album does a good job for its length, but I really do feel a 2-CD hit package is warranted.  The biggest omissions are "Shiny Happy People," "It's the End of the World as We Know It," and "This One Goes Out to the One I Love."  It wouldn't surprise me if the band didn't really like these songs and would rather not include them in their greatest hits collection.  However, there are a few other more minor hits I know from them that are missing, like "Radio Free Europe."  I just can't think of other titles right now, but there are more than a few other omissions too.Many of the minor hits that are included here, thankfully, are very good and will grow well on you: "The Great Beyond," "Bad Day," "All the Way to Reno," "E-bow the Letter," and "Imitation of Life" are songs I haven't heard enough of and I'm glad they are on this collection.  Still, I hear REM is coming out with another compilation and I imagine it will be more complete; I suggest waiting for that album when it comes out</review_text>
I had been hearing "Always Thinking Of YOU."   But, I never got who it was.   I purchased XM radio and on the smooth jazz channel, I heard the cut again and got the artist name.  Purchased the CD based on that one cut.   Every cut is great on this cd.   I look forward to catching him live at some point and will continue to look for more from him in the future.   He has his own style.  But, not only do you hear hints of Benson and Brown..........I hear a little Doc Powell as well.   I will be introducing friends to this great artist............Keep it coming............</review_text>
Following the demise of Soundgarden in 1997, everyone was curious what Chris Cornell would do next. Would he immerse himself in another band where he could display his blood-curdling screams or would he surprise everyone with something totally different? He chose the latter. With Natasha Shneider on keys and Alain Johannes on guitars, Cornell found the opportunity to break away from his heavily Zeppelin and Sabbath-rooted musical background, and he also asked some other musicians to make an appearance on the record.The result is a very diverse album, highlighting Cornell's immediately identifiable vocals and relatively more simpler songwriting. That said, he had the chance to incorporate a multitude of other instruments, including tambourine, theremin, and timpani. Besides the trademark blues rock-ridden songs that helped Cornell make a name for himself, he also digs deep into psychedelia, best heard on "Preaching the End of the World", a song that finds Cornell opting for thick, Radiohead-like arrangements, lofty acoustics, and a strange mix of keyboard and guitar effects. Not too different is "Disappearing One", guesting Soundgarden drummer Matt Cameron with its moving vocal melodies, shimmering keyboards and even a vague clarinet addition.Surely, Soundgarden fans expecting a very heavy record with meaty guitars and lots of aggressive vocals will be sorely disappointed. But they need to realize Euphoria Morning was meant to be different way before Cornell started working on it. Solo projects serve the purpose of letting the artists express themselves in ways they are unable to in their own bands. And considering this, Euphoria Morning is a huge success. That said, there are still some songs where the band behind Cornell churns out some rocking riffs and rhythms, such as "Flutter Girl" and especially "Pillow of Your Bones" during the chorus. The former starts out in an almost poppy fashion but quickly picks up a playful funk bass line and is finished off with a cool blues lead; whereas the latter is more straightforward, employing lots of acoustic and electric guitars as well as weird percussion work. The final song "Steel Rain" is also a number that alternates between decidedly heavier parts and more haunting, ominous moments. The ethnic drumming (great tabla rhythms) on this track is quite experimental given Cornell's music with Soundgarden and later on with Audioslave."Follow My Way" and "When I'm Down" are the most moving songs, with the latter featuring a deft piano and organ melody beneath Cornell's heartfelt delivery. This is another song that embraces his love for bluesy guitar work and it also features some female backing harmonies during its pre-chorus. Similarly, the title track is a passionate piece where Cornell sings entirely a capella over acoustic guitars. There are no other instruments; Cornell plays his guitar and simply sings his heart out. A remix of the effect-laden "Mission" would later be included on the Mission Impossible 2 soundtrack while "Moonchild" became a minor hit with its eerie atmosphere along with the opening song "Can't Change Me", perhaps the most modern-sounding, upbeat song on the album. Despite being only three minutes though, its flow is majestic, borrowing harmonica, tambourine and shimmering keyboards that climax at the final second.My European copy of the album contains a very different version of the opening song, with French lyrics, accordion, mandolin, and female vocals backing Cornell. The song returns to its English chorus at one point, but the rest is all delivered in French and perhaps more engaging than the original version in some ways.Chris Cornell is one of the greatest voices in rock and this solo album is testimony to his greatness. When freed from any band restrictions, the man is capable of crafting some of the most moving and brutally honest songs ever.</review_text>
I heard the first Beat LP (&quot;I Just Can't Stop It&quot;) in a small town record shop in 1980 and instantly fell in love with this band's brand of ska/soul/rock.  For some strange reason, I never bought &quot;Wha'ppen&quot; and never got familiar with it.  I confess to reading some less than enthusiastic reviews and shying away.  Of course, I did buy &quot;Special Beat Service&quot; and found it to be par excellent.  So I ordered &quot;Wha'ppen&quot; a couple of months ago and it arrived a few weeks back and I've been wearing it out.  Damn!  How did I miss this?  This is a great collection of snaky sweet, politically smart songs.  &quot;Doors of Your Heart&quot;... I've loved that song for years... and &quot;Too Nice to Talk To&quot; has always been a favorite.  But every other single song on this CD, including the bonus tracks, is outstanding.  These songs are textural wonders.  Great stinging guitar work and the incredible Saxa on his horn make this a stunning recording.  I regret not discovering it sooner, but it sure is a nice find after-the-fact.  Oh yeah... one more thing... I had the pleasure of meeting Dave Wakeling in Nashville this past summer and he's a very nice fellow who cares about the people that support him.  If he comes to a venue near you, don't miss the show.  You'll get your money's worth and more.  Wear your dancin' shoes.  He is truly one of the great talents of the 80's and continues to make significant music.  He may be the most underrated recording artist of the past two decades.  Buy this CD.  You won't regret it. It sounds best in the early evening.  I'm the Big Oh and I gotta go</review_text>
I have seen Al Jarreau 20 times in concert (and recently saw Al and George perform at the Hollywood Bowl) and am a long-time fan from WAY BACK. There are a few Al CDs that you just play forwards and backwards (and back when they were cassettes, you wore out the tape) because they're just PERFECT. "Breakin' Away", "Jarreau" and "Heaven and Earth" come to mind. Well, add "Givin' It Up" to that list. If you're an old-school Al fan and you're wondering whether to buy this CD, BUY IT. It will live up to all of your Al expectations. There's a "Look the Rainbow" feel to it, there's a "Breakin' Away" feel to it, there's a "Jarreau" feel to it. There's even a "Glow" feel to it (when you think about tunes like "Milwaukee" and "Have You Seen the Child?"). Grassroots Al.It's got the production values of "Heaven and Earth" and "Tenderness". FABULOUS production, arrangements, gathering of talent. There is not one song on here that you will skip as you're listening to it driving to work or whatever. In fact, if you're throwing a party and want to instantly get people in a jazzy party mood, put on this CD because between everybody from Chris Botti to Jill Scott to a SOULFUL Paul McCartney, people will stop and say, "Wow, listen to Jill and George tearing up 'God Bless the Child.'" And "Is that Paul McCartney tearing up 'Bring It on Home to Me'?" [Yes, it is.] Meanwhile, Al and George are working their magic the entire time, and guests will say, "Listen to George right there." And, "Al is jamming right now." It's a conversation-stopper provided by the best thing that can stop a conversation at a party: fabulous music that people must comment on. Of course, that's where the conversation picks right back up, so you win either way. The blend is perfect: Just a touch of scatting, just a touch of voice-beat, with lots of fabulous jazzy vocals by both Al and George, tons of great music solos, and George playing a perfect guitar.If you're a George Benson fan, you will be THRILLED with this CD because George provides a fabulous through-line to every piece. He's ever-present with every wonderful thing he ever did on a guitar. He fronts many of the pieces, and he's not in any way relegated to "background guitarist." He IS the music in every piece, with few exceptions. As much as I love Al, this CD is MAGICAL because of the blend of George and Al. ONLY THESE TWO CAN PAIR UP TO MAKE THIS KIND OF CD. There IS NO OTHER TEAM who could have pulled this off. You need Al's voice and George's guitar. Period. In fact, I'm guessing much of the jazz music world is a tad jealous right now of how simply GENIUS this CD is, as in, "Dang. These two are GREAT together. Wow."Bottom line: This is a perfect blend of these two greats' talents. George takes care of the music, while Al provides the wide gamut of vocals he's an expert at (and that only he can provide). If you've been a long-time fan of either of these two, you won't be disappointed. It's not lopsided. And it's OLD-SCHOOL in every good way.My prediction: This CD will sweep the Grammys. If it doesn't, there is no justice. Like another reviewer on this page, I intend to buy this CD for about EIGHT people. It's just THAT perfect</review_text>
Hey Bret is one of the most tallented song writers of our time!  He will be in the rock n' roll hall of fame when he is done and his guitar playin' and singin' is very underrated!  Buy this</review_text>
I love this show so much!! IT just has so much passion and beauty and all the cast members sing so well!! Sutton Foster as Jo, was cast very well, its obvious she deserved that Tony nomination in 2005, and the sisters, even though they weren't the leads, they all had such great songs, especially Beth, whose song, "Some things are meant to be" always brings tears to my eyes,its just so touching. I would definitely recomend this CD to anyone who loves musical theatr</review_text>
I saw these guys live in the Twin Cities last week. They opened for Keane and The Zutons. These guys were definitely the best part of the show. They had great energy and actually looked like they were having fun. To top it off, they sounded great and their songs were well written. Give these guys a shot, unless you hate Rock 'n' Roll!!</review_text>
This CD is SOO cool!! I love all the songs! They are all good efforts. I especially like Mr. Coffee You Have gotta hear that song! Other than that this is a great CD!! buy it today!! You'll Enjoy i</review_text>
Unlike other classical-crossover artists minus Emma Shapplin, I believe Sarah Brightman works for art, not for money, or fame, or show off. Like what she said in an interview, she sees music a a whole--music is to be enjoyed (and categorization should never get in the way). That's apparent from this very endearing album La Luna.I think this album is as a whole better than any song in it although my favourites are still the mystical Figlio Perduto, the dreamy Serenade/How Fair this Place, the gloomy Gloomy Sunday, and the sweet La Luna.I read what a reviewer said about how any other sopranos could sing better than Sarah on La Luna/Song to the Moon. I think that's not true, at all. Just because the singing isn't wagnerish, it doesn't mean it's easy or lacking in technique or whatever he said. I think it's easier to just sing full out operatic like, say, Renee Fleming than singing with so much passion and being lilting without losing any of the voice's qualities (laid back with 'THAT' voice at the beginning and successively powerful at the end). And, duh, she sings classical properly, ffs.And tell me a name of a soprano who could sing How Fair this Place with such grace, without sounding like a screeching steel can.I've also listened to many other versions of Gloomy Sunday. Billie's is weird. Sarah McLachlan's is out of context. Sinead o' Connors' is shabby although the intelligence behind the singing is fine. Only Sarah Brightman's and Bjork's versions are best for my ears.I have introduced her music (from Phantom of the Opera to Dive to Timeless to Harem) to many people, and apparently they enjoy them very much! There is this radio that's a favourite of us where Gloomy Sunday and Time To Say Goodbye are played as much as Bon Jovi's It's My Live and Sophie Ellis Bextor's Take Me Home and Offspring's Pretty Fly. They're good music and enjoyable.Albeit I also like many other sopranos. I like Lucia Popp's interpretation of Richard Strauss' lieders, Christa Ludwig's of Schubert's, Natalie Dessay, Kiri te Kanawa, etc. :</review_text>
i'm a spanish fan of soul music of the 90's.these days is almost impossible to find a good soul/r&b cd to purchase.In the 90's i had to buy about 2 or 3 cds per week. Now, with all the rap & hip hop topping the charts,what kind of music could i purchase?  LUTHER, ANITA, LALAH, SMOOTH JAZZ & maybe, some Joe's cd. AND OF COURSE, THIS TERRIFIC CD BY mr.BENSON.If you're a fan of good r&b music and you hate the hip hop music, buy this cd NOW!!!!  You won't regret!</review_text>
I just bought this on CD as it was on sale through the CD club.  I have the original vinyl, but hadn't listened to it in years.This is one of the best works of music ever conceived, written and performed.  It is absolutely timeless and each song impresses you more than the last.  Put this one on repeat and let it play three or four times. It just keeps getting better.Stevie is an awesome talent and this may be his best.  Don't forget how great music was in the 70's.  This work is one of the major reasons for the resurgence of 70's music today by artists that weren't even born then.  You can see quite clearly the artists that followed Stevie.  Most recently Alicia Keys who would be the first to say his music is pure inspiration</review_text>
I just refreshed my ears listening to "Riot" again! Getting to to hear 1/2 Full, which clocking in at just over 4 minutes, is sheer electric blues magic. The price of this album is worth this one rocker alone.It was nice to see it on "Easy Street" (along with Lukin' Excellent!)any way this number totally kicks!   Definitely get this if you don't already own it.</review_text>
This is my favorite jazz album of all time.  Put simply, this was Miles Davis at his best.  The notes on this album simply float, and yet it flows together better than anything I've ever heard.  The composition is disorganized but in a way that it all makes complete sense.  Don't let the thirty second clips fool you.  I almost missed out on this because the clips are misleading.  I took a chance on it, and it was the best gamble I've ever made.  A must have for any jazz enthusiast</review_text>
Some of the catchiest melodies and harmonies ever from Curt. Lots of cool instrumentation. Pete Anderson did a great job with the production. This hasn't left my CD player since I got it 4 days ago</review_text>
Grew up on this group. Love them then and love them now. Own the &quot;Best of&quot; Collection but you can never compile the best on one CD. For those Winans fans you know what I'm talking about. These brothers are music genuises especially Marvin Winans. Like Stevie Wonder they were ahead of their time. My favorite song on this album shares the message of all times. &quot;Together We Stand&quot; opens up the eyes to all race,religion, and creed that its time to come together if we want to see a change in this world regardless of background. Entire album is great including the celebrity appearances such as Stevie Wonder, Teddy Riley, and Aaron Hall.  I like the flavor the cameos add to this album. If you're into mid-tempo music this is the album to purchase</review_text>
For those who have only heard the hits this is a fine addition for your collection.  Bruce and the boys were young and completely up to the task of handing out the long jams you find here.  The title sums up the overall feeling of the songs.  There's a certain joy and a ton of fun to be had.  Put this on one nice warm spring day and see if it doesn't lift your mood.  Caution: must be listened to while drinking a cold domestic beer</review_text>
I like every song but 1 on this CD. They're the same ones that're on the movie and if you don't like the movie, you probably wouldn't like the CD</review_text>
John Michael Mongomery is back with a big bang.  This album is one of the best to come out this year. It's better than that of Travis Tritt, Alan Jackson, and Kenny Chesney.  The song I wanna be there is one of the most touching songs since Alan's Where Were you.  He mixes the soulful ballads, with his country rockers, and sweet love songs.  THis is vinatage JMM and should be bought by any true country music fan</review_text>
Although the real roots lie with the black artists who inspired these guys, the PBBB is where the hippy generation,(this is a couple years pre-San Francisco, and before the Stones and Beatles began stretching their arrangements out on record),learned to JUST PLAY. Their next record was more representative of what they were actually doing live at time time, and is the single greatest influence on what became the San Francisco sound of the late 60's and early 70's, (REALLY long and experimental jamming), so this is in fact the &quot;roots of the roots of the roots&quot; of todays jam bands and guitar-heavy blues bands, mixed-race bands, and, for all practical purposes, the white-blues-man in todays' world</review_text>
Ok, i just could not resist coming on here to review this. I've had this CD for about 4 years now and I STILL listen to quite a bit, proof right there that this CD is definetly a classic (in my book at least) Every single song on here is original, the guitar riffs are simply amazing, and the lyrics i can not even describe in words how much they hit home and how breathtaking they are. If your a Goo Goo Doll fan, and you still do not have this CD, i deeply encourge you to go buy it now! This is The is The Goos like you've never heard them before. The CD is pure genius, and in my opinion the best cd i've ever heard</review_text>
This has been my first cd of Rod Stewart and I am very proud to have this cd,because worth every penny.This CD has class. Congratulations to the men behind. The duet with Cher "Bewitched, Bothered & Bewildered" is the best song.duet with Queen Latifah "As Time Goes By," I was astonish, She has a nice voice TOO!!. All songs are relaxings. Actually ,I listen  this cd before to go bed</review_text>
Actually haven't heard this CD, yet, I can still comment on part of it. I was the lucky guy who did the live recording at the X-Ray Cafe.   Sold the masters to the band a couple years ago and just now got around to thinking, "I wonder if they ever did anything with those masters?"So, I was there at the show and can say that every ounce of energy that the band put out (which was considerable since this was the last show on their tour,  but they knew the X-Ray was special and gave it their all)- It was all captured on these recordings.The machine was a Tascam 688 that used standard cassette tapes for 8-channel recordings. Most all the mics were either Shure SM57/58, but there was also a high quality Shure stereo mic overhead that was mainly used for capturing the drum kit but also provided a nice stereo image of the stage.The X-Ray was perfect for this type of recording. The tiny PA was only used for the vocals, so, there was no competing with a PA blasting everything.  I would place a SM-57 close to every amp.  Had a nice specialtiy bass mic, too.  Usually, 8 channels was enough to catch everything, but, there were extra inputs where it was possible to stack multiple mics onto a single track if needed. Because of the overhead stereo catching the drums, this was rarely needed.With a full house, such as the night with The Gits, any reflecting waves were just soaked up by the body mass of the crowd, creating what turned out to be a very nice intimate recording space.  There was split box on stage which fed all the mics to the X-Ray "business office" next door, which is where the Tascam was setup away from any real danger.  All of which made it a fun gig to record in comfort and be able to also go over to the stage side and enjoy the show.  Every once in a while, magic happened.D. FletcherPortland, OR</review_text>
It's fair to say that all orchestras are not created (or built) equally and these discs of phenomenal playing with the Berlin Philharmonic under the baton of Herbert von Karajan are simply some of the best classical recordings ever made.Analog sound was at its peak when these records were made in 1976 and 77 and DG has done an excellent job of remastering them for CD. But beyond that Karajan simply "gets" the composer--as another reviewer pointed out--and conducts with an intensity and passion he seldom showed in his other recordings and performances.I'm listening to these discs once more on a massive sound system with doubled speakers to handle the '70s Kenwood beast amplifier and love it more than ever. As a reviewer once said of a classic Szell/Cleveland performance of Beethoven's Third, this is a reading of "blinding virtuosity and strength."As a budget two disc set it is also, incredibly enough, cheaper than those old DG import records we bought (and scratched up) one by one in the seventies.As I've said before, when you listen to a disc like this you realize why you went nuts for this kind of music in the first place. Buy it, blast it, love it, get your Slavic ya yas out!!</review_text>
This CD has tons of power, and soothing energy. It really shows off how well Part understands the human voice</review_text>
I've been a Jim Brickman fan for a few years now.  When I saw this CD came out, I could not resist getting it.  It is absolutely amazing and fully worth it.  When I first put it in my stereo, I had to sit there just to listen to the first few tracks without doing anything.  That was how impressive they were.  The title of the album is incredibly fitting.  While my roommate is venting about the latest drama in her group of friends, I have this CD turned up in my own little corner to "Escape" from it all.  I swear I could not have found anything more fitting to be listening to while trying to get away from real life for a bit.  If you love Jim Brickman, or just like soft jazz, or piano music, this CD is a must have</review_text>
"I have been a Brickman fan since the very first album. Much of his early songs were uplifting piano solos without much "electronic enhancement." Escape is a wonderful album full of songs you might find on his early albums. There are three excellent vocals on the CD that will please fans who favor his more recent work which tends to feature the vocalist over the piano.If you are a Brickman fan, this is a must have album.</review_text>
This is a good compilation of AFI's songs over the 10+ years they've been together. It's easily worthy of 10 stars. This CD allows newcomers to listen to the progress leading up to Sing The Sorrow, and to get more intimate with the band. I havn't purchased this album YET, because I already have all their albums, but plan on it.The new tracks are from the Answer That, and Very Proud Of Ya era. They've finally been released on CD. This is a cool little feature fo newcomers also.Anyway, buy this album only if you havn't heard any of AFIs music but want to give it a try</review_text>
This guy is a freak of nature! Different but in the same vein as Illinoise. I loved it..No fillers to speak of. If you liked some of the more laid back songs on Illinoise!, you'll LOVE this album. Its great regardless.Highlights are:AvalancheAdlai StevensonSaul BellowThe Mistress Witch From McClureSpringfiel, Or Bobby Got A Shadfly Caught In His HairNo Man's LandThe Perpetual Self, Or "What Would Saul Alinsky Do?S</review_text>
I bought this recording along with Blood on the tracks recently and all I can say is "Doggonit" it don't get any better than this.  They called Elvis the king but Bob Dylan must be  the "Wizard".  Who will tell us great stories when he is gone?</review_text>
Having read some of the reviews here I just thought I should mention that for those who enjoy punk rock music rather than the sameness of most emo music these days they should definitely check out this band! While the singer (Conor Oberst) does have that emo voice so familiar to many other bands, he utilises it well and his conviction can be heard throughout (unlike a band like Taking Back Sunday)The music is uplifting without being soppy or sentimental, the lyrics are refreshingly different from most punk-politics band and don't come across as just the singer throwing a badly worded hissy fit.If you want to feel sorry for youself go listen to Bright Eyes, if you want to do something about it listen to Desaparecidos</review_text>
Anyone who had access to a radio in the 80's would know at least two songs by Missing Persons.  Their fun music and amazing flare (Dale did have pink and white stiped hair and it looked great!) make this a good party album.  I also have their album Color In Your Life and most of the songs are great.  Just as an added note, Warren Cuccarullo is now a member of Duran Duran (my personal favorite band) and has been since he appeared on their Notorious album which was released in 1986!!</review_text>
I was looking for a cd that I could listen to all of the time.  Oh my God, I am breathless.  I was brought to tears as they sang "Mama".  My mother passed away in 2002 and I never got a chance to say thank you and this song said it all.  All of Il Divo's songs have touched me in a way that no one else could.  Thank you for touching my heart.  I really recommend that you give this cd a chance.  All of these other people on the board that gave it a low score, obviously need a hearing aid and a heart.  Blessing</review_text>
When I first purchase this album the first time.  It was Exceptional then and it still is .  Exceptional and Gifted Group these Ladies rule the early 90's.  Some of my favorites Free Your Mind, My Lovin, It Ain't Over till the Fat Lady Sings, just to name a few.  Envogues voices all of them work masterfully together they way a head of their time.  As far as female groups they rank 5 stars in my book following such groups as Supremes, Labelle, TLC the had allot orginiality and appeal that drew people to them because of the voices and their orignal material.  They are trendsetters.Please go buy this CD.  I will buy it again myself.  I have the cassette. I need the CD for my collection.  I know they came out with a new album hopefully this will be a Great album as well.Go Envogue G</review_text>
This is a Great Classic Rock CD including some timeless songs.  If you like "Summer Breeze" as much as I do and have not heard the remix of it yet, you are in for a pleasent suprise.  A remix album came out in November of 2004 called "What Is Hip" and in my opinion is the best remix album of 70's music that I've ever heard.  Their version of "Summer Breeze" is near perfect.  A modernized, but not over the top version that manages to preserve the true melody of the song with out removing the original rhythm.  The entire album is great too. I have this "Greatest Hits" and the "What Is Hip" CD and simply can't get enough.  Here's a link to the CD.  ENJOY.http://www.amazon.com  --  What Is Hip</review_text>
Very different, very cool! An awesome CD that all ages in my house (from 13 to 68) really enjoy listening to</review_text>
Ah, yes, it's Nirvana's "Nevermind" cd, released in 1991. I listen to all 80's pop-metal, or hair metal (Whitesnake, Winger, Van Halen, Y&T, Dokken) I could go on forever on 80's bands. (Of course there is Rick Springfield, and John Cougar Mellencamp). I am a true rocker here, I know all the true bands out there, I know everything about them. I have reasons for this.But here's the bottom line. Nirvana was a breakthough along with Soundgarden and Pearl Jam back in the early 90's. Millions of people bought those cds. And yes, there were hair bands still alive back then, like Poison, and Firehouse, etc. Firehouse and Poison had alot of success, eventhough it wasn't the 80's anymore.As I can see, alot of my fellow rockers don't really like Nirvana, or Pearl Jam, or Soundgarden. To be completely honest, I like their music, I just don't prefer the music, because I don't like the hard sound. I really like the glam-hair band style.People say: "Nirvana and those other grunge bands killed glam-metal". Yes, I agree that they killed the 80's hair bands, but it's not necessarly their fault. It's a mix between the bands, and the people listenting to the music. Because of grundge music, today's music is quite horrifying, with EMO and other types of music that would've been a nightmare back in those days.Nirvana has a great CD here, but I just don't prefer it. If you are a REAL rocker, you'll listen to all the types of music back then. Don't judge unless you have actually heard it, because you may actually like it.To all rockers- Don't listen to modern music. It's poisoning our people, and no one really understands the true meaning of "the guitar" in today's music. Most of you will understand what I mean, so listen to the classics.Classic rock, and hair bands forever, and even grunge. Keep the classic alive.~The Sicilian Axe Ma</review_text>
This is a fantastic album. The fact that 5 star reviews are still being submitted over 10 years after its release (and they're not the beatles or u2 or anything) should speak volumes. I have played this CD countless times over the years and I am amazed that I am not sick of it. I am a pretty constant consumer of new music. Get this CD - you won't regret it! (PS I've never done an Amazon review before, but the fact that this has had only 22 motivated me). It is melodic, catchy, uplifting and cheeky - in short, a little piece of musical bliss.</review_text>
This was the break through record for Pink Floyd that would place them in the super-league. The strength of the record lies in the song writing that is simple yet engaging and Dave Gilmore's guitar playing and voice is superb. Production wise this is well polished and the presence of the sax and backing vocalists just give it that little extra commercial potential. Overall the record works well as a whole yet I do feel 'Money' seems out of place. The problem with records like this that it is too easy to enjoy and all the sharp ends are neatly filed off and well packaged for your consumption.Now don't get me wrong I think this is a magnificent record but is it really Pink Floyd's greatest album, I tend to think not. Is it the greatest record of all time? Most certainly not. Because a records sells 35 million copies does not make it automatically great. Because everybody and their grandmother thinks it's great, does not necessarily make it great. The problem with this record is that it sounds of its time, not that that's a bad thing, its just that it does not transcend time. The real indication of a great record is how many people it inspires to make records that sound like it. I can't think of many records that sound like this without sounding retrogressive. Some records released at the same time: Can's "Future Days"(1973); Nue!'s "2"(1973); King Crimson's "Larks' Tongues In Aspic"(1973); Robert Wyatt's "Rock Bottom"(1974); Tangerine Dream's "Phaedra"(1974) are by far more influential and enduring than Dark Side. If you don't own Dark Side then buy it because it is a very good record and deserves its five stars, but make sure you buy 'Piper at the Gates of Dawn' also. 'Piper' is Floyds greatest, most influential and definitely one of the greatest of all time. Besides, how many people who think 'Dark Side' is Floyd's best have actually heard 'Piper'.</review_text>
This was the first Punk-O-Rama CD I listened to, and boy I was not dissapointed. Most of the songs on this CD are the type of punk I would listen to, Quite fast and energetic. The best song on the CD has to be either NOFX - Bath of Least Resistance (NOFX being the greatest punk band of all time, of course), or Beatsteaks - Let me in. I heard the Beatsteaks for the first time on this CD and there absolutely bloody excellent. Obviously, The Cd is made complete with songs from the Descendents, Pulley, Pennywise, Dropkick Murphy's. The only let down on this CD is Noise Conspiracy, there song on this CD, well plainly sucks i'm sorry to say. But overall this CD is one hell of a good listen if your into punk. That's all, oh yeah, buy it! by</review_text>
Neil Young's latest release has some very clever and interesting songs.  They are very political so unless you are a completest who likes Neil Young, if you agree with President Bush, this album will be a turn-off.  For the politically neutral or those who agree with Neil Young this is a good album.  Maybe this is not Neil Young's best but it still is a good album</review_text>
Gun's & Roses came out in the nick of time. Record companies were mass producing cookie cutter bands and they all sound the same. G&R made their debut on the music scene in 87 but didn't get big until almost late 88 early 89. Appitite is a true masterpiece. Welcome to the Jungle, It's So Easy, Mr. Brownstone, My Michelle....The list goes on and on. Put it in turn it up to 10 and Rock On! The they made a mistake. they realeased an albums worth of great songs on 2 albums. So instead of another masterpiece they wound up with 2 ok albums. Then they vanished. Anyone who is a fan of the music but couldn't care less about Axl should pick up Velvet Revolver with Slash and Scott Wieland from Stone Temple Pilots</review_text>
Being a professional dancer as well as a teacher and having seen hundreds of musicals, I must say I rate this as &quot;one of the best&quot;.  The dancers are fantastic!  the music utterly great, The choice of dances  (from classical to rock) is highly deversified.   CAN'T WAIT TILL I GET IT  SO I CAN PLAY IT AGAIN AND AGAIN. AS WELL AS &quot;ROCK THE HOUSE, SHAKE MY  BOOTIE, ETC&quot</review_text>
Digressing from their first 2 albums, Transmutation(5 stars)and Sacrifist( 5 stars),  Praxis unleashes Metatron.  Trimmed down to a 3 piece with Laswell, Bucket and Brain covering all bases,  Metatron lacks Bootsy's space bass,  Yamatsuka Eye's agonizing screams or John Zorn's out of tune saxamaphoning, but it still rocks. track 1 is a laid back acoustic # and is absolutly beautiful. The album lacks the speed of some of Sacrifist's songs but makes up in phat grooves.  Half of the Collection cd(again 5 stars) is from this album, but with nothing from Transmutation, hmmm.  Instead of going further Ill' say this.... Get THIs Album at alll costs.  Burn copies for friends and spread the gospel according to Praxis</review_text>
I have to admit that, at first listening, I found some aspects of Ms.Belle's interpretations of these pieces disorienting. However, as I listened to these covers repeatedly, I can now say that I understand better what the vocalist is after. Not that I always agree with her and with George Duke,the arranger/producer, but I agree with their choices and their totally new project and enjoy having had my horizons broadened.Ms.Belle has immense talent, superb technique, and a clear idea of each piece, and she delivers the goods without faltering or compromise. I admire that a lot in a performer. Her choices ask us for a reaction and we are free to accept or reject what she has offered us. When I first heard these renditions, I was quite stand-offish, but over time I have come to appreciate them more and more - almost to the point of addiction - and am grateful to Regina and George for their strength of conviction as well as their superior musicianship.They do NOT want us to listen in a passive way, they are waiting for our reaction..and God, this is really so,so good....That's the true spirit in which an album should be recorded.I'd encourage you to get this album because it is about strong, powerful and personal interpretations of some great jazz standards by Regina. You may love everything about it, or you may reject aspects of her interpretations. But in any case you will not remain indifferent; you will be enriched by hearing these pieces in a clear and beautifully personal way. That is an important aspect of why I love this imaginative, innovative quality music and why this recording is invaluable.And it cannot be said enough that her backing band is incredible, giving this album the necessary push to take it over the edge. It is a success because it skilfully avoids being categorized. Regina has had the courage to break out of the traditional mould and make a successful cross-over, which some purists may not approve of...Only time will tell....</review_text>
Okay, take everything that you know about John Squire. Strip away the amazing Stone Roses first album, the not so amazing follow up, the nice brit pop of his work with the Seahorses and picture this as a solo album from a new artist and I honestly think that peoples thoughts on this album would change drastically. They would realize that every track on it is a winner and that the guitar work is amazing and beautiful, the vocals might be grating at first (Think Robert Forster (The Go-betweens) circa Before Hollywood) but that upon repeated listens grows on you and you eventually end up loving. What you expect going into an album has alot to do with how much you like or dislike it and this album is no exception. People should listen to it for what it is and not for what John Squire was...John Squire is an established song writer who has moved beyond what he used to do (who hasn't moved on in 13 years? minus Robert Smith of course!) and now writes beautiful pop songs...John Squire has grown up just like his original audience has and this solo album is the perfect proof of that</review_text>
This CD is supberb!!  Absolutely fabulous.  I received it timely and have enjoyed listening to it over and over again.  All my deslings with Amazon thusfar have been outstanding.Thanks, AmazonLaura Rig</review_text>
This was not a waste of Brad's time or mine.  Good job!</review_text>
Tim McGraw does it again.  It is a great album with some really great songs.  A must have</review_text>
Wow!  There's sooooo... much to like in this album it's amazing.  The music is mostly upbeat & very catchy--making you want to (& will if no one's around) sing along.  The lyrics are fine, meaningful, & personally touching--about life which is getting faster & faster in the contemporary world, while people are still people with hopes, feelings, needs, desires, & all the rest of what makes people human.  The lead singer, Jennifer Nettles is powerful yet gifted with a sweet voice (though a bit twangy in style).  She grabs you quickly for a wild ride--immersing the listener in the musical story she's telling.  I bought the CD based on hearing Baby Girl & Something More (on the TV show Vegas of all place).  Then I heard Sugarland on the CMA show--winning awards as they so deserve.  The range & variety of the songs on the album are good too--from sweet & poignant ballads to wild & spicy soaring.  Virtually all of the songs are well worth listening to & the majority could become successful singles.  Yes, the style is their own mixture of influences--the 3 artists come from different musical backgrounds, which makes their wonderful blending are the more impressive.  And, the trio wrote all the songs on the CD--with Hall the primary author (solo writer on one of them).  How many trios are there with 2 women & 1 man?  I wonder if they are unique?  Well, they are unique even if not in that respect--how many bands include a mandolin?.  Of course, country purists may not be happy with them, but the vast majority of listeners ARE.  This has become one of my favorite albums, at the speed of sound.  IMHO, it's terrific</review_text>
This is my all time favourite Jacksons album. This album, along with `Mama can't buy you love' and anything by Donna Summer were hogging the airwaves during my first visit to the States as a kid.Comprising mainly Jackson compositions (and production), it showed a more mature and funky side of the group, and was far more consistent than their hit filled but patchy Motown works.Filled with their trademark smooth harmonies, lots of horns and Michael's distinctive vocals, the album hit #11 on the billboard album charts (#3 R&B), was certified platinum and had a smash hit single in `Shake your body (down to the ground)' #7 pop.`Blame it on the boogie' opened the album in style, a funky upbeat disco tune that one couldn't keep still while it played. Other dancefloor anthems are the horn laden `Things I do for you', the frenetic `All night dancin'', and the shimmery `Shake your body' with its distinctive riff, which hinted at future MJ songs like `Don't stop till you get enough' and `Workin' day and night'.For me however, the songs that really did it for me were the ballads.`Push me away' is a lush sun kissed ballad featuring a passionate vocal delivery from Michael, alternating from full voice to falsetto with ease. Great horns!Title track `Destiny' has an acoustic guitar intro which leads into an amazing ballad where Michael declares `if it's the rich life I don't want it/happiness aint always material things'. Great backing harmonies too.`Bless his soul' is simply stunning! Featuring pensive lyrics about trying to do what's right, but never seeming to please anyone. `You just can't please the world and yourself' sings Jackie. This song starts off tender with congas, fleeting horns and strings which after the second chorus builds to a superb climax of `the life you're living is dangerous' and a fab outro of `hey, ha ha ha'.Then comes the final track and my favourite. The dramatic `That's what you get for being polite'. A thumping piano leads to horns and sweeping strings, and then Michael tells us the sad tale of some lonely guy named Jack who wants to be what he is not and would do anything for love. Dazzling instrumentation, a stellar vocal performance from Michael,The cover art was a painting depicting the group with their huge afros, and the original vinyl release folded open like a book with individual shots of the brothers.One of my favourite childhood albums, one of my all time favourite albums, and a classic!</review_text>
I'll have to accept that even tough I'm not a great fan of this band they have impressed me with this new release, the lyrics are in some cases very deep and in songs like evil angel they can touch you right there.  For me the band has progressed a lot and you can tell that in this album, it's very melodic and more mature.  Also the acoustic version of "the diary of jane" is amazing.  I personally recommend the songs "breath", "evil angel" and my favorite "dance with the devil"</review_text>
A friend of mine gave me this cd about a year ago, I listened to a few minutes of it and was like "What is this crap?" and I shelved it for a couple months. I then picked it back up and gave it another listen. To my surprise it was really catchy to me. The music (and lyrics) are simple, but thats what I like about them. Theyre simple! This is a great college-rock cd. I plan on checking out more Teenage Fanclub, and I suggest you do the same. Notable tracks are Sidewinder, What You Do To Me, and Is This Music?</review_text>
I recently purchased this cd again. I once owned it on cassette.Keith is a real smooth old school type singer and his music andsound has sustained very well since it was released in the early90's. If you are building an old school collection with greatsingers this is a good one to have. It's great for romance orwith that special lady.          Jaye Pricebeltsville md</review_text>
Recorded 2001 - 2002.It has become all too common that few are taken to task for saying or doing stupid things.  What's worse is that no one seems to care.This is the kind of thing that pisses Lewis Black off. The angrier he gets the funnier he is.I first came to appreciate Mr. Black on the Comedy Central's "Daily Show."  I always felt that there should have been more time devoted to Lewis Black.I wanted more - I needed more - I had to have more!So I went to my "mental health club," Amazon.com and bought every title available.The End of the Universe, Rules of Engagement and Luther Burbank Preforming Arts Center Blues - ( I had already purchased the White Album)Which one is the best?  ALL OF THEM!As I write this review - I realize that I still want more - so I am buying the DVD's.There is nothing dated about this material. In 2006 it is just as - if not funnier than when first released.Please Lewis keep recording it still is not enough!casl</review_text>
This is my favorite Bob Dylan album. The album begins and ends with two of the greatest songs ever, Like a Rolling Stone and my favorite Desolation Row. Sandwiched in between are some fantastic songs. The album is filled with incredible lyrics,wonderful music, and a mean harmonica. If you want to know why Bob Dylan is a legend buy this album</review_text>
It's hard to believe this music is more than a quarter century old now. I think it would recieve the same kind of accolades if had come out yesterday. But it didn't. It came out in the summer of 1979. It was the summer before my sophomore year in college, my first summer away from home. For at least a week, anytime it was my turn to put something on the turntable, I'd select side 1 of "Rust Never Sleeps." It took me at least that long to flip the darn thing over. And then, when I did, for the next week, anytime it was my turn to put something on the turntable, I'd select Side 2 of "Rust Never Sleeps." My flatmates never complained.Oddly, the songs I see getting the most grief in the reviews here are my faves. You don't really want to do without the swooping lead guitar, contagious handclaps, and hysterically funny yet politically cutting chorus of "Welfare Mothers," now, do you really? As for "Sedan Delivery," I have only the vaguest clue of what it's about, but it's sure a scorcher (and it's still hard to find a job). Allright, maybe we don't need two versions of "Hey Hey, My My," but which one would you delete?As far as I'm concerned, there's only one song here that hasn't withstood the test of time: "Sail Away," which is innocuously pretty, but lacks the bark and bite of even the other acoustic stuff. "Trasher" and "Pocahontas" are both beautiful and mean in just the right amounts and places. Poor Marlon, poor CSN.Do I wax nostalgiac? Perhaps, but not overly so. This remains essential Neil, which is to say as essential as rock 'n roll gets. It still sounds fresh and relevant. And fun. Did I mention fun? In fact, I'm gonna go plunk it on right now, maybe take a breather between "Sail Away" and "Powderfinger" to relive the LP experience. You should too.</review_text>
All I have to say is great album</review_text>
A quality album from Richard. Long time fans will not be disappointed. It will win over quite a few new fans as well with it great guitars and snappy lyrics</review_text>
This CD is great.  It is a must have.  Picture yourself in the wild or on a lake in a boat and a thunderstorm comes rolling in slowly.  You hear the rain, the thunder in the distance, you sense the storm getting closer.  The storm is over head, loud piercing thunder claps and you duck for cover.  The thunderstorm slowly moves out but the rain is a constant presents.  The thunder rolls on but the wild life moves in, bullfrogs, owls in the distance, all the animals are alive now.  This cd is all in one, the real deal.  It is not all thunder.  I love it.  I also bought Thunderstorm [Rykodisc]; this was a waste of money.  To me, in my opinion it sounds like the storm just knocked the cable out, static and more static.</review_text>
I purchased this CD during the lowest time of my life emotionally. Every track brought solace and comfort beyond belief, especially the title track, Deep Peace. I would listen to it over and over, bathing in the lush healing sounds. Each element, from the perfectly balanced vocals to the simple piano and violin motifs, is seemingly structured at a spiritual level. This is more than ambient music, it's true music therapy.</review_text>
What is the song that is being played when they are handoing out the dance benefit leaflets?Email me at Tarahillyard@aol.co</review_text>
The Edward Scissorhands score will always be one of my absolute favorite movie scores.  I truly believe this is Danny Elfman's best score and believe me, he's done some great scores!  The music is so moving.  The childrens chorus mixed with the soft bells and strings were absolutely perfect for this sweet, beautiful film.  Even people who haven't seen this film have probably heard the music from it since it is used in so many film previews and commercials.  A must-have for any Danny Elfman and/or Tim Burton fan</review_text>
Jodeci's Forever My Lady has a problem that most nineties R&B releases had at that time, if the fast songs were tight then the slow songs suck and vice versa. Jodeci's first CD had some of the finest slow songs to come off of one CD in 1991. Stay, Forever My Lady, Come & Talk To Me, U&I,and I'm Still Waiting rank with the best but every single fast is hot trash</review_text>
This book helps toddlers put into context how they fit into the animal kingdom, and the natural things all animals do. It teaches them to be comfortable with - without shame - the move from being a diaper-clad baby to a big kid. The drawings are charming! I bought this book for a friends who runs a day care center and got a very positive reaction</review_text>
Goth meets Cabaret, or rather Gothic music influenced by Cabaret. Thats the best way to describe this wonderful little release by Projekt. The eleven tracks here provide an introduction to the "dark cabaret" scene, and do so quite well. The first song, Coin-Operated Boy by the Dresden Dolls, is a great start, and the CD continues onward to devious Evil Night Together by Jill Tracy (which sets up a wonderful film noir mood) and on to the darker, electronic dance number Cabaret Fortune Teller by Audra, to a remix of Knock Three Times on My Coffin by Projekt veterans Black Tape for a Blue Girl. Along the way numerous other bands are covered.Sam Rosenthal's side project Revue Noir makes their debut on this CD, with husky feminine vocals provided by Nicki Jaine, who also has a solo song (Pretty Faces) on the CD as well. Personally, I LOVED Revue Noir and find Nicki Jaine's voice to be quite alluring, but I also know some BTfaBG fans who dislike her vocals so you've been warned. But all in all, I think anyone with a task for the dark should check out this CD. At the very least, its a cheap and decent introduction to a whole new style, and thats always a good thing</review_text>
This is an amazing, beautiful album.  Probably a little more difficult to get into than Streethawk, but after about the 4th or 5th listen, I found it more rewarding.  The music is very dense, and the lyrics are beautifully poetic (it helps that Dan Bejar has chosen to include a lyric sheet in the cover this time).  A great album for any fan of intelligent independent music</review_text>
(In reference to another review) - The symbol on the cover of Still is the Factory Records logo, Joy Division's record label.Since I'm in the area....  I've owned this album for about 15 years and it still sounds, in parts, as solid as anything Joy Division ever did.  Some of the live stuff is so-so but studio tracks like The Kill, Dead Souls, Exercise One, They Walked In Line and Something Must Break are damn near worth the price of admission alone.  If you already like Joy Division, thereby showing good taste, this is a great album.  If you find yourself slowly descending beneath the black cloud of depression, Unknown Pleasures should fit.  If you have been there and find yourself wanting out, Closer is the soundtrack.  This album is more varied in mood, for established fans and safer for household pets</review_text>
I love this soundtrack! It stands alone as beautiful, haunting, alluring, and innocent--just as Griet herself was in the film. Desplat perfectly captured the spirit of the story, enhanced and deepened a plot that was less than stellar.Scarlett Johanssen's acting is superb, as well as Essie Davis and Colin Firth. The story, though, was a bit tired--pretty housemaid/jealous wife/do-nothing husband. Its portrayal of Vermeer and his wife was a disservice to the real people, even though it is a fictionalized account.The two best tracks on this album are 'Griet's Theme' and 'Colours in the Clouds'. While I'm not keen on seeing the film again, this soundtrack is a treasure. It's a real work of art, second only to Vermeer's work</review_text>
This is The Jacksons second album for epic and producers Gamble and Huff. It would be their last with Gamble and Huff but together they made a great album that doesnt get the play it should. Music's Takin Over, Different Kind of Lady and Do What You Wanna are great, catchy dance tracks. The real greatness here lies in the ballads where Michael's voice is in peak form. Even Though You're Gone and Find Me A Girl are classic ballads. So good, I feel that Find Me A Girl is probably the best Michael Jackson song you've never heard. This is probably Michael Jackson's most overlooked album and its one of his best! The Jacksons all sing together great and you can see why Destiny and Triumph were such big hits after this one was recorded. Overall, great ballads, catchy feel good dance tracks, and Michael Jackson singing his heart out. Get this, you will not be dissaponted</review_text>
Hayley Westenra, at only 18 years old, is an enchanting voice we should be hearing from for many years to come. This is an uplifting and at times, spiritual album that shows shades of greatness. Throughout, Westenra's voice is captivating, though the musical scores are at times, sub-par and do not equal the vocal talent.There was an advertising tag on this CD that stated "The female Josh Grobin", but I think a more accurate sentiment would be "a young Sarah Brightman". ODYSSEY is a fine mix of spiritual and operatic tunes, all of which match up well with Westenra's abilities. Bocelli fans will also appreciate the duet, Dell Amore Non Si Sa. They pair up for that one song, but the rest is all Westenra.This is smooth, soothing and easy listening. If you like Brightman, you will truly appreciate the voice of Westenra.</review_text>
In Boyz II Men's sophomore album, II, they make attempts to create their own identities with writing and producing this time around escaping producer Dallas Austin and founder Michael Bivins.  This LP begins with the deepest of gratitude on "Thank You" produced by the group and Dallas Austin.  Both "All Around The World" and "U Know" are mid-tempo tracks with a hip-hop flavor to them, but neither of the two is strikingly memorable or highlights.  One thing they do is provide another angle for Boyz II Men.  For a more relaxing environment, "Vibin'" has a rather simple instrumentation, lyrics and vocals.  "I Sit Away" is a hidden gem with a mid-tempo flow with soothing lyrics written by Tony Rich and production by veteran L.A. Reid and Tony Rich.  Stepping into a more modern jazz feel "Jezzebel" strengthen the groups range and abilities as the album is nearing a completed overall goal.  Over a piano solo, Boyz II Men harmonize on "Khilil (Interlude)" to shift the gears down to their overpowering abilities to formulate ballads that begins with "Trying Times" written and produced by Wanya Morris, Tim Kelley & Bob Robinson.  Hit maker Babyface lends a hand on two of the thirteen track album with smash singles and highlights "I'll Make Love To You" and "Water Runs Dry".  Heavyweights Jimmy Jam & Terry Lewis add a touch of love and mood setting material on "On Bended Knee".  "50 Candles" drives this album to epic proportions with its thriving bass and lyrical content "...feels like one of those nights..."  They show and prove why for their time there are no other male groups that can compare to their beautiful harmony and range as on "Yesterday" they perform accapella.  If real talent that you seek, members Shawn, Michael, Nathan and Wanya has uncompromising talent for any age, era, or time that you can enjoy for long time.</review_text>
to set the record straight, rodney 'darkchild' jerkins produced ONE song on this album, and that is 'he said'.that said, producer waryn 'baby dubb' campbell [also husband of erika, younger of the duo] did a great job on this album.  not at all to say that the ladies' singing hasn't always been phenomenal.the highlights of this album include the aforementioned darkchild song, a guest apperance by fred hammond on 'this love' [their appearance on his album, speak those things' is duly noted], an impressively done cover of stevie wonder's 'you will know', and a cover of walter hawkins' 'thank you'.  yes, that is the original sampled at the end of the song.every album that mary mary has released to this day [yes, all two of them] has proven that gospel music can be musically current-- impressive-- and still within taste.  that's what happens when you have the best on your team...baby dubb, while being mary mary's resident producer can also be found on kierra sheard's 'let go', 'sweetest thing', 'all i am', fred hammond's albums 'speak those things' and 'somethin' 'bout love' and countless other records.the downside:  the last two songs.  they're of forgettable quality.  while happy, forgettable.  overall, this album is an essential</review_text>
If you think yer gonna puke everytime you have to suffer through a "country" song from Nashville these days, and you happen to like classic rock, you would probably appreciate what Shooter's trying to do here. Folks, this is the Real Deal. I don't mean real country or real rock - this is a hybrid - I mean he's making music that is honest and down to earth. A flash in the pan, he's not. He's going to be around for awhile</review_text>
Tom DeLonge is at it again with a new band and a new album.  Even with being accompanied by the lead guitarist from Boxcar Racer, Angels and Airwaves managed to have a completely different sound.  They dropped the more punk rock tone of Boxcar Racer in favor of an emo-alternative style of rock.  The first released single "The Adventure" is quite enjoyable and even though I haven't checked too deeply into it, I think it's the theme song for NBC's Studio 60.Besides, how can you go wrong with an album that's gone double platinum in the UK and gold in Canada</review_text>
After watching the movie walk the line, I wanted to hear more of Johnny Cash. All these years(35 of them) I always thought he was just a slow folk singer. His music is non-stop foot tapping soul grabbing stuff. He toured with Elvis Presely and Jerry Lee Lewis. He inspired musicians like Bob Dylan. I am so glad I bought this CD. It's the best purchase I made all year.</review_text>
Well it's not quite as good as Rising which is the best album ever but it's still amazing.1.Man On The Silver Mountain- 10/10 This track is a classic and is still played at every Dio concert and Ritchie Blackmore still performed it at every Rainbow concert until Rainbow disbanded in 1997 but anyway this may be Ritchie Blackmore's strongest riff ever! and Dio's vocal performance is excellent. Anyway it's a great fantasy song by Dio and Blackmore and still got radio play so it appeals to everyone.2.Self Portrait- 10/10 Excellent dark song by the band which fits Dio's voice perfectly another classic!3.Black Sheep Of The Family- 8/10 Good song but not a Rainbow song it's a cover and that's a shame because I would have loved to hear Dio's brilliant lyrics another original song but anyway still a good listen4.Catch The Rainbow- 10/10 Another classic from this album as Dio shows how well he can sing ballads as well as epics and rockers. Blackmore has a solo full of feeling and this was performed at every Rainbow concert until Dio left the band.5.Snake Charmer- 10/10 Another song that takes place in the middle ages which is Rainbow's trademark. Anyway this song is very underrated and should have been a classic. Dio has brilliant lyrics and vocals as usual and it's no suprise that Blackmore supplied excellent solos and riffs for this one6.Temple OF The King- 10/10 Here is the best ballad of all time!!! Ronnie's vocals are perfect for this song and his lyrics are amazing too. Blackmore throws togethor and a great arrangemant and solo aswell to make this maybe the best track on the album.7.If You Don't Like Rock N Roll- 8/10 Kind of cheesy lyrics but a good track and it sounds more like an Elf track.8.Sixteenth Century Greensleeves- 10/10 Great song! A real classic as Dio puts togethor another great fantasy song. Blackmore's riffs is brilliant and his solo is full of bends and shredding.9.Still I'm Sad- 10/10 Well the version with vocals is much than this instrumental version but this version is brilliant too. The live version off On Stage however with Dio's vocals blow it away. I still wonder why there weren't any vocals on this.The band isRonnie James Dio- vocalsRitchie Blackmore- GuitarGary Driscoll- DrumsMickey Lee Soule- Keyboards, Piano, MellatronCraig Guber- Bass2</review_text>
I like the main voice(s) and I like the music, but the voices are over powered by the music. If they turned up the voices a bit I think this would be a great album.This album does not sound like other albums I have so I'm not sure what to compare it to.</review_text>
The title gets it right - this is a very fun album. There are a lot of great songs on here. Infectious lyrics and music - it still surprises me that Matthew Sweet isn't more popular than he is.One other thing...it's a sin that "We're The Same" wasn't a bigger hit than it was. Truly a great song</review_text>
This CD is truly a classic and one of my all-time favorites. Love it</review_text>
This CD is perfect for driving.  The Downtempo/Beat Driven Ambient feel and overall togetherness of this CD is a perfect choice for easy electronic listening.Overall very pleased with Mr. Schnauss' contribution to the genre.Highly reccomende</review_text>
Rare are the electronic albums that are so consistantly inspired. Melodies are beautifully simple and soothing, sounds are particularly well crafted. A great album.The drum box could be a bit more discreet though</review_text>
Every listen I get more into this CD. Many catchy songs. I now need to buy more of Donald's solo stuff. Great music</review_text>
I just saw this woman live and she's amazing!!!! The songs come alive when you hear them! It's hard to put into words the state that her music and lyrics put you in. But trust me it's a good place!Please check her music out if you're into heartfelt music</review_text>
What can I say that most of the people reviewing this cd haven't already said.Arthur is OUTRAGEOUSLY talented. It's almost shocking.The depth of songwriting and production values are so intense.It's extremely well recorded and mixed music.Anyone into audio manipulation should just buy all of his albums right now."Stumble and Pain" is probably my favourite track. The sinister tone of it and the synth effects are just superb.As with all Arthur albums the vocals are dense, layered, and its something he's obviously worked on for a long time and it really pays off on this album!Anyone new to him should buy this immediatly and buy redemption's  son straight after that.WHAT A MUSICIAN</review_text>
First up I give this album a 4.5/5 for the fac that it has REAL hiphop beats and good lyrics. Real hiphop, they stayed true to the sound. I just didnt give it a 5 since im not the biggest TCQ fan and of that style. But all these emcees spit hott lyrics in this album. Tracks like "Keep It Movin", "Hot Sex" have ill beats. This album does have a real jazzy sound to it, which im not the biggest fan of, but its more of a unique style, and they deserve props for trying new styles. So overall this is a really good album, and worth getting.My Top 5 Songs1.Buggin Out2.Hot Sex3.Oh My God4.Luck Of Lucien5.Keep It Movi</review_text>
Try to name some of the greatest debut rock albums.  Let me give you one ground rule though:  It has to be from a band that put out at least five albums (so no Stone Roses, Sugar, Verve or Jane's Addiction, e.g.).  Here are some of mine, off the top of my head: Led Zeppelin I, In the Court of the Crimson King, Days of Future Passed, The Doors, Boy (U2), C.S.N., Can't Buy a Thrill (Steely Dan), Ten (Pearl Jam), Murmur (REM).  I'm sure there are a number of others that I'm forgetting.  Oh yeah, one more: the incredible "Ferment," by Catherine Wheel.The harmonies and swirling lush guitar sounds created by Rob Dickinson and Brian Futter, the compelling rhythms generated by Dave Hawes (Bass) and Neil Sims (Percussion), it just all works, and is comparable in every way to the extraordinary "Nowhere" by Ride (not quite as great as "Loveless" by My Bloody Valentine).  Unfortunately, C.W. never quite matched the power of "Ferment" with their subsequent releases.The best song on the album is "Black Metallic" ("it's the color of her skin/ her skin is black metallic") which soars up to the sky, floats in the wind, lands, and soars again.  Clearly, "Black Metallic" clocks in as the band's "Stairway to Heaven."  The second best song on "Ferment" is . . . well that's where it gets tricky, and demostrates how great this album is.  There are no weak or even average songs, and I could see where anyone of the others can be considered as a runner up to "Black Metallic."  Put a gun to my head and I would have to go with "Shallow" or maybe "Tumbledown" or perhaps, if I'm in a more pop oriented mood, the danceable "I Want to Touch You."  Although, last night, as I was listening to the album in preparation for this review, I thought of how strongly it closes with the trio ""Bill and Ben," "Salt" and the uplifting "Balloon" ("ba-ba-ba-ba-balloon").A wonderful album.  Perhaps not in my top ten, but definitely in my top twenty (tied with the aforementioned "Nowhere")</review_text>
I bought a copy for a friend recently and she said "His music sounds so fresh and it's so singable.  The lyrics are meaty, too, not just fluffy pop. I'm kind of obsessing over this music right now--which is fun!  Thanks so much... I'd like to see him in concert sometime." I had this album for a year before I really got into it, since it takes a couple of listens to really appreciate.  At first listen I really liked We'll Do It All Again, and put it onto my MP3.  A year later I finally got the album out again and it bleu me away.  I realize that there is something slightly Barry Mannilowish about We'll Do It All Again, because he has some lungs, not because of style or anything.  He reminds me more of Jellyfish, or They Might Be Giants.  Some songs are so pathetic, vulnerable, and a little too honest for comfort as far as lyrics go, but they are energetic and hopeful in their delivery.  Anyone who appreciates art for arts sake will probably like this album.  The songwriting is superb and precisely produced. The second hidden track is a real gem, that you don't need to relate to in order to appreciate.  The lyrics are clever and fun even though several songs have a theme of loneliness.</review_text>
Pete Rock and C.L. Smooth came out of no where with this classic in "92". I was expecting the T-ROY tribute to be the only highlight, but this joint was bangin! The very underrated CL had the dope metaphors and complex lyrics. Chocolate Boy Wonder had the legendary "horns" going on. The whole album is a banger. Fav's are Pete's Sake, The Basement(Pete's cuz Heavy D rips  it), Mecca and the Soul Brother, Troy- They Reminisce, Straighten it Out( a kick in the balls for bootleggers), Ghetto's of the Mind and Skinz(CL's cuz Grand Puba steals the show on this one). Eternally Classic, rock on.</review_text>
I've had this cd since it came out and it continues to be my favorite.  It's a cd that I can put in anytime and thoroughly enjoy.  This would be my pick for the cd to have while stranded on an island.  It never gets boring and made me appreciate just how good Schon is.  Unbelievable. If you like this, you'll like Eric Johnson's Venus Isle album too.  Two of my all time favorites</review_text>
It doesn't get any better than this. This album is a must have for all true Judas Priest fans. This is Priest when they were really getting good. The guitars and the vocals rock you to the core</review_text>
This might be the best CD that has come out this year.  It may be Will Oldham's best CD since "Viva Last Blues." It may be better than "Viva Last Blues" although these are two different styled CDs.  "The letting go" has a mostly very mellow sound.  Almost every song is beautiful.  The string and guitar melodies are uplifting.  Will Oldham's voice is grounding, it is the familiar voice you have heard for the past decade or so.  Dawn McCarthy's voice will then again lift you up.  McCarthy's voice is a fantastic companion to Oldham's.  Other singers/bands have tried to use a female voice to echo or accompany the lead vocal and it has often become irritating.  This is not the case with "the letting go," McCarthy's accompaniment adds so much to the album but without taking away from Oldham.  I haven't listened to a Will Oldham album since "Ease down the Road." This makes me want to go back and listen to those albums I have missed.  One song in particular, "The Seedling" (I believe) has a different sound than the rest of the album.  It has a harsher sound, but is still a good song.This is a great introduction if you are new to Oldham or if you are returning listener.</review_text>
This is a wonderful effort by the Del Castillo brothers and their band. Mark and Rick are great guitarists and the band is one of the best that I have ever heard. I hate that anyone would compare them to the Gypsy Kings or Strunz and Farrah, because I believe they (Del Castillo) are far superior. Even though I am a huge fan of Santana, I think Brothers of the Castle and Vida are more entertaining and satisfying than Santana's last CD. If you are a fan of this genre, you should possess both Del Castillo CD's.....Brothers of the Castle and Vida. Their live show is among the best that I have ever seen</review_text>
As he did with "Parade", the soundtrack to his last vanity project "Under the Cherry Moon", Prince provides a musically invigorating soundtrack to "Graffiti Bridge", which is a hopelessly silly film. No matter. "Graffiti Bridge", Prince's first album of the 90's, is also one of Prince's best albums of the 90's."New Power Generation" serves as the title track to Prince's new band, and it's a powerful, funky manifesto. "The Question of U" is exotic and intoxicating. "Elephants and Flowers" is an upbeat song about spiritual redemption, whereas "Tick Tick Bang" is Prince at his most joyously raunchy. Although most of Prince's material is exceptionally strong here, the collaborations and contributions by other artists are a mixed bag. "We Can Funk" is a simmering duet between Prince and funkmaster George Clinton, and Tevin Campbell provides some youthful exuberance to "Round and Round". But the tracks by The Time mostly fall flat. I've personally always found Morris Day to be a one-trick pony with his effete pimp routine, and his one trick gets boring quickly.It's obvious that with "Graffiti Bridge" Prince is trying to create the feel and atmosphere of a funky block party. But I can't help but wonder, without the tracks featuring other artists, if "Graffiti Bridge" wouldn't be more highly regarded as one of Prince's better albums</review_text>
Even if you don't know much about Donny Hathaway, this collection of songs is a fun mix and it's very moving.  It includes some classics with Roberta Flack that are terrific.  I enjoy it tremendously</review_text>
At first, I thought the only reason why I wanted this CD was because Idina Menzel was on it. But now, after listening to the whole CD, I was right, Idina Menzel was AMAZING, and all of the other cast members are incredibly talented too.I would HIGHLY recommend this because it is a very interesting story, it's incredibly complex music (theoretically), but at the same time it is VERY enjoyable!!!! I would give it more stars if I could... but I am only allowed 5... :(</review_text>
This is the stuff that rap dreams are made of!  Just like the movie itself,  this CD is packed with moment after moment of perpetual rollercoaster type thrills that leaves the listener in a sheer state of funk frenzy!  The talent assmbled here is tops and just seems to keep coming at you so,  get in, sit down, buckle up and shut the F&#k up because it's about to get rowdy up in here!</review_text>
It realy has been a long wait after Jellyfish. This Roger Joseph Manning solo effort is as beautiful as music can get, giving wagonloads of goosebumps all the way. If you have a craving for the ultimate in sophisticate popmusic you should get this rare jewel.And don't wait for the US release: it lacks one song from a perfect 11 like the Japanese has. I sure wouldn't want to miss any of these tracks. Very higly recommended!</review_text>
I have loved the Swans since my Danceteria days in early 80s New York. But its a fitful, frustrating love. You get the sense from 'Incandesent' that the Swans forgot to stop partying.  That they never took the time to put together more than a handful of songs.  Oh, but what songs they were.  This collection is for completists and aging post-punker (like myself) who wished they'd shared a pint with the boys back when simply getting stoned was a subversive act. Its a nice collection of beautiful, quirky oddities here. But a few gems are missing "Holy Holy", "1982", "World of Milk and Blood" come to mind. Maybe on an 'Ashes' reissue.  In the meantime, scoop this up.  Simpson & Company deserve the attention. If you really care about the band, buy it directly from their label, Renascent. That way the company (and the band) can make a few pennies. Maybe enough to mine the crates for a second hits collection.</review_text>
Buy it. Now. Stop reading.Are you still reading???? Okay, so I'll tell you my reason why. Reason(s) why. 5.1 sound. DTS. Different (some versions better to my ears/psyche) than the CD. Flavor. Beautiful production. Did I mention DTS - you gotta hear this in DTS. And she and her band deserve and have earned every penny you could spend on her (gratuitously inciting flaming).I am just hoping that she will give us the opportunity to have DVD's covering her 'Girl in the Other Room' and her 'From This Moment On'.</review_text>
I love this album, the best of Phil Collins.  I believe every great artist always delivers their best stuff when they are in a rut.  I know he wrote some of the songs on this album bases on his bad times/suffering with his ex wife.  He did not realize how much pain she was in and the mood and moment is captured very well.  He is a great composer.  Too bad most of his new songs...2006, times are different and so is his life, I do not enjoy them as much.  Once an artist becomes more Self-Actualized much of their best work becomes just that a memory.</review_text>
This album sends mixed messages to the listener.  Some tunes are overally happy, some quite depressing. I can only explain it in parts:Radio Song - the first track of the album comes out quite upbeat and rollicking.  A guest vocal from KRS-One makes it quite a lively tune.  Puts you in the mood for a more Green-style album.Losing my Religion - Huh? What's this? The album delves into uneasy angst as a troubled Stipe spills problems out to the listener.  The tortured riff holds out until the end, telling the listener this isn't quite like Green or Document...Low - The depression lingers on.  Low is a tune sadened speech about the absence of love and how it can make you feel so low.  My favorite on the album, I think it's delicate and sad.  My #1 downer tune.Near Wild Heaven - Another uneasy tune that has a touch of angst.  Deals with the apprehension of love.Endgame - A curious tune.  Can't be interpreted either happy or sad, for it is instrumental.  It could go either way, it's written in a major key, yet the melody sounds sobered, almost as if it's a requiem.Shiny Happy People - Takes the listener up to a very uncomfortable level of happiness.  A low point on the album, yet I interprate it by feeling uneasily happy after the anti-pastorial earlier tracks.Belong - One track I don't understand, yet enjoy and see it as a break from the main goal of the album.Half a World Away - Ah, so beautiful.  Essentially about enjoying life's finer moments at the expense of moments to come.  Truly happy, but still holds on to the softcore angst.Texarkana - The lyrics and pulsing bass line make me draw conclusions that it's about unfulfilled life goals.  Delves deeper into seeds of depression until...Country Feedback - The climax of saddness on the album.  This song is excruciatingly sad.  The melody, the lyrics... It kept me awake all night.  One of the saddest songs I've ever heard.Me in Honey - A powerful, joyous ending that basically sums up the fact the everything turns out OK in the end.This album is highly recomended.  R.E.M. are an incredible band.</review_text>
Evan Dando has once again delivered an astounding collection of pop/punk songs.  This album rocks like Lovey and is almost as catchy as Come On Feel.  I've been listening to this album for weeks on end.</review_text>
I wore out my tape of Cypress.  Afoot is great, but Cypress is amazing.  I bought this while stationed in the Army.  There weren't too many "new wave" tapes available at the PX, and I wasn't going to listen to Def Leppard or Bon Jovi.  So I bought Cypress.One of those rare tapes that I bought 20 years ago and still listen to every few months (The Jam's Snap and Setting Sons, and The Smith's Hatful of Hollow are 3 other tapes I never tired of).Get this CD.  Get it now!   It is great.   Thanks for reissuing it.</review_text>
And you will to. This music conveys the happy feeling of Latin music produced for the American ear from 1946 to 1949. I picked up the album from Amazon after listening to selected cuts offered by the Yahoo Music radio service -- "El Cumbanchero" and "Cuban Pete". The cuts are almost all strong and all are well recorded, especially when you compare the sound quality to those on some other big band recordings that have been reissued."Babalu" which became Desi Arnez signature piece on the I Love Lucy TV show is probably one of the least appealing, and that may be why it was used comedically in the TV show through the years. The highlight cuts include -- "Peanut Vender", "Holiday in Havana", "You Can in Yucatan" and "Brazil". While brass, strings, drums and guitars tend to dominate much of today's music, this album gives the spotlight to a variety of percussion instruments, flute, clarinet and bass clarinet. It is refreshing to hear them in solo.The liner notes by Will Friedwald are extensive and give you a glimpse into this period of Desi's life between his movie career and the defining work he and Lucille Ball did on television in the 50's.I could not recommend this album more and hope you enjoy it as much as I did</review_text>
I purchased this CD with the intent of finding fine players playing fine music. What I found, however, was and outstanding example of chamber music as its finest. The ensemble these 3 players generate is some of the finest ensemble music playing recorded. Each player displays exceptional technique, both in the mechanical and lyrical aspects of their playing. Most impressive is listening to Istomen who, playing a very technically and lyrically demanding part, voices his playing with such finess and carefull attention to detail to the strings; a feat very difficult to do as a pianist. This is an excellent recording for the professional to study a score from or for the avid listener to play over and over</review_text>
THIS ALBUM MARKED A RETURN OF SORTS TO THE OLD TRADEMARK ISLEY BROTHERS SOUND,AND IT'S OFF THE HOOK.JAM AND TERRY,STEVE HUFF,RAFEAL SADDIQ,KELLY AND ANGELA WINBUSH ALL TOOK THEIR TURNS PUTTIN' IT DOWN,AND THAT'S EXACTLY WHAT THEY DID.FROM THE TIME MOVE YOUR BODY KICKS IN UNTIL THE VERY END THIS ALBUM IS ABSOLUTELY SLAMMIN'.HIGHLIGHTS IN MY OPINION ARE YOU DESREVE BETTER,JUST LIKE THIS,WARM SUMMER NIGHT AND MOVE YOUR BODY.BUT THE ABSOLUTE HIGHLIGHT AND(in my opinion)ONE OF THE MOST SLEPT ON SONGS OF ALL TIMES IS THE TITLE CUT ETERNAL.THAT IS ONE OF MY TOP TEN ISLEY BROTHERS FAVORITES OF ALL TIMES.THE SONG KIND OF REMINDS ME OF MAKE ME SAY IT AGAIN,AND EARNIE SHOWED ALL THE WAY OUT ON THE GUITAR SOLO ON THAT SONG.CONTAGIOUS EVEN HAD A BIT OF THE ISLEYS SOUND AND PROBABLY INTRODUCED THEM TO A WHOLE NEW AUDIENCE.AS A WHOLE,I AM EXTREMELY FOND OF THIS ALBUM</review_text>
I appreciate bands like Ima Robot, Film School and electroclash artists for trying to add a little balance into Alternative music, or at least I appreciate Film School for trying to merge the beauty of Electronica with Alternative and allow it to simmer down to the always wonderous shoegazing while bringing back the trend of the New Wave you loved in the 80's. The thing about it is it is bands like these that are adding their own style into music making it worth your minutes and expanding your genres from just on band. Have you heard Depeche Mode's albums with a wind of Boards of Canada?Call this the album that it would have made more sense for Maximo Park to create if you will but this album is America's response to all other international bands showing us off hard. (The band is from San Francisco, I believe) And their influence for this album is a mix of Electronica and 80's music (My Bloody Valentine. New Order? Depeche Mode?) all leading them to create an album that doesn't quite call the band in question an American Radiohead per se, but with half of the music smothered in swirling guitars, accompanying keyboards, and a leaders effort to push the band forward, a band that is trying to reach heights of originality.Film School's debut (if you aren't counting their imported EP) kicks off with am intro wielding only swirls of guitar and electronics before finally bringing you into an illuminating "On and On" that may force your urge to name this band after Interpol and Elefant and a little bit of The Bravery in there, too, but will not let you throughout this entire album. Their current single "Pitfalls" may cause them to swing on the vine of similarity since everyone is trying to bring back New Wave these days, but worse can happen for a band like this. The backward keyboard melody should more than make you tell the difference. The second actual interlude "Garrison" is where Boards of Canada's wind starts blowing through the CD, before heading back into the record that will be likely to redefine the sound of "cool". If there is ever an album to chase after and count on for the safety of New Wave and the health of Alternative, I don't see a better candidate for leg-ups than Film School's latest.Rating: 7.5/1</review_text>
Without a doubt, this is a must-have for any fan of the Go-Betweens and the place to start if you are new to the band.  "A man far wiser than myself once referred to "16 Lovers Lane" as 'the indie Rumours'" the liner notes say in this fantastic re-issue of the Go-Betweens ultimate set of songs.  No truer words were ever spoken about this amazing set.  Why this album didn't spawn at least five top 10 singles is a mystery that will never be solved.  But needless to say this is a fantastic set made even better by the wonderful packaging and extras included with this re-releaseFor those of you unfamiliar with the Go-Betweens work, this was the consummate work of their 80's heyday, for a great many reasons.  The music is bright pop music, crystal clear, but in no way is it featherweight pop.  The songs are beautifully arranged, every instrument, vocal, handclap, and anything else perfectly placed with not a note out of place, but this can be said of nearly every Go-Betweens release.The lyrics, plaintive ruminations on love, are clearly written by two songwriters/lyricists going through the opposite sides of relationships.  I will not go into detail here as the liner notes tell the story, but the interplay within the band as these relationships play out are what drove the entire release.  Each lyricist, Grant McLennan and Robert Forster, gets about half of the album's lyrics, and that is what makes the CD special.  Images of the giddyness of new love ("Love Goes On!") are juxtaposed with images of love lost in such as way as to be almost shocking.  "I'm ten feet under water/standing in a sunken canoe/looking up at the water lillies/they're green and violet blue/still the sun it finds/a place to light me" from "Love Is a Sign" has to be one of the best descriptions of how it feels when a relationship falls apart that has ever been placed in song.  These themes are repeatedly dealt with in different ways, from young lovers meeting and breaking up to the "old" love of couples with children ("You Can't Say No Forever") having a fight.The bonus material in this handsome double-disc set is truly welcome.  The videos to "Streets of Your Town" (still undoubtedly the best song on this incredible collection) and "Was There Anything I Could Do?" underscore the relationships going on in the band while not seeming too terribly out of date.  The bonus disc of outtakes and b-sides is also a fantastic addition to the set as it includes several songs that didn't make the final album cut but are presented as they were at the end of the recording sessions, being nearly complete but having that rough edge of a final demo.The real treat come with the acoustic "demos" that are included.  "You Won't Find It Again," "Apples in Bed," and "Head Over Heels" are played only by McLennan and Forster on acoustic guitars, providing for an intimacy that is unmatched anywhere.To top it all off, the packaging (including an awesome essay by British songwriter Andrew Male) is exquisite, providing detail on the circumstances surrounding the album as well as any pertinent recording information.This is "16 Lovers Lane" as it was meant to be heard--enjoy!</review_text>
My son loves music and really likes Dan Zanes.  We started with the videos on Disney and the "catch that train" song really got us singing, so we ordered this CD.  Now my son sings along with it, dances and jumps around.  Dan Zanes really is fun for the family</review_text>
I was looking for some music I could play in the car or around the house with my 19-month-old son and came across this one--the exact same "album" that I had when I was his age!  I'm so glad they redid it!  One of my fondest memories</review_text>
Gene Watson was one of the finest voices in country music, and this compilation of 18 hits provide a fine sampling of that voice.  Considered by some to be "hard country", I find Gene Watson to have a more "pop" oriented voice that combined well with his selection of songs;  and in the '70's, that proved to be enough to keep him on the charts.  While many of the songs on this album are pure country, others are the typical, drab, 70's pop that filled the void between the Nashville Sound and the New Traditional era of the 80's.  In any case, there is no doubt that Gene Watson earned his spot in Country Music, and this collection carries those hits that made him the household name he is today;  including his signature songs "Farewell Party" and "Love in the Hot Afternoon".  If you prefer the more traditional country sound, his "You Could Know as Much About a Stranger" and "Should I Come Home" are also included</review_text>
Gene Watson's music was introduced to me by a friend who played drums for Sonny James, Ernest Tubb, and Dottie West.  I had never heard of him but then when I heard his voice on the CD I knew the songs.  It's amazing to me how a person with such a great voice has never received the attention that he should.  Every song is great but the one which I really like is &quot;The Old Man and His Horn&quot;.  This was a song I had never heard.  It also shows the versatility of Gene's song selections.  He has the best voice of any country singer I have ever heard</review_text>
Honestly, Led Zeppelin is the ONLY artist that can create monumental album after monumental album and have not ONE bad song.  When you listen to one of their albums in your car, there's no, "Oh, I really like track 2, but I don't like the next couple, so I'll skip to track 5 after that one's over."  Now it is common opinion that the classic albums of Led Zeppelin are the first five, and "Houses of the Holy" is the fifth one.  This is Zeppelin at their pinnacle, which in my opinion, they never fall from."The Song Remains the Same" is Pagey at his best with his Gibson double-neck.  The song itself makes you want to ride the wind because it is so airy, but at the same time a fast-paced rock tune.  Page's initial (and INCREDIBLE) guitar solo makes this song the perfect initial song on this album."The Rain Song" is a lovelorn masterpiece with the lovely sounds of an orchestra to help create this mood.  The lyrics are deep, and while the song to me is melancholy, it is also refreshing."Over the Hills and Far Away" is a 5-trillion star song, with amazing acoustic and electric guitars with mystic lyrics."The Crunge" is groovy and funny.  The bass is really felt in this song, and odd spoken lyrics at the end give a laugh."Dancing Days" is very far out, but a summer-y song with an addictive riff."D'yer Mak'er" is one to definitely highlight Bonzo's masterful rhythm skills, or in other words, GREAT DRUMS!  Equal to that is Pagey on guitar and Robert's singing, "I still love you so...but I can't let you go...""No Quarter" is the quiet masterpiece that is credited to John Paul for an exquisite keyboard solo."The Ocean" is quite the upbeat song on this album with a raunchy riff.  An overall energizing song.This is the best deal for this album--do not pass it up!  I hope this will be a permanent fixture to your collection...not one bad song</review_text>
This is a great cd with many good songs as it is one of my favorites and bruce rules</review_text>
low tech and brilliant, music that seems to have channeled Zappa, Winchester Cathedral, and god knows what else.  incredibly funny, and then suddenly sad.  mr pink is a genius, you betcha.  and he explains what it is and how it is to live here in this strange quasi-city in the shadow of the industry, in the curiously full and fun wasteland of other people's dreams</review_text>
Trace Adkins has set them up and knocked them down once more! Can Trace ever produce any music that sounds bad? His low deep bass voice continues to tickle our ears and the message of the songs he chooses to put together on cd continue to proclaim loud and strong that he loves everything in life from his dog to his woman to his God!I strongly recommend that everyone has Trace's latest CD in their collection! A big ten-four in my CD player</review_text>
"The Dreaming was one of those albums that I found in my parents CD collection when I was young and I haven't outgrown it yet. My parents seemed to hate it and never bought a Kate Bush CD after it (though I recently bought her whole collection except "The Whole Story" as it's just a greatest hits!). This album took me a very long time to get into however. I listened to it several times as a child and then put it away because I thought it was too strange. I took it out then several years later and loved it. I would now say it could be my all time favourite CD and is better than "Hounds Of Love" as I see it. The songs all stand on their own and Bush's voice is brilliant and her quirky themes shine through. This is the only album that I will never skip a track because I'm always in the mood for them all.1. "Sat In Your Lap"- A great opening track. Bush deals with whether she can be bothered to do something or not. The instruments are great as always.2. "There Goes A Tenner"- A notable song for the quirky British accent Bush puts on. The instruments are very good and remind me of the '80's (as it was made then!). That was a good decade for music!3. "Pull Out The Pin"- The piano arrangement is excellent in this song and the chorus is so good. The lyrics are about someone who is in war and thinking about pulling out the pin of a grenade. The song was inspired by a documentary.4. "Suspended In Gaffa"- I don't actually know what Gaffa is but this song is still so great and catchy. The lyrics are quirky and the instrumentation is excellent.5. "Leave It Open"- An excellent song that reminds me more of "Hounds Of Love". The instrumentation is excellent as always.6. "The Dreaming"- Another brilliant song which is so funny because of Bush's Australian accent. The production is good and so is the songwriting.7. "Night Of The Swallow"- The use of Irish traditional music is a nice effect to this song. The singing by Bush is superb and the song is flawless!8. "All The Love"- The song has a sadder feel to it but is excellent. The lyrics are unusual and very well done. The instruments complement Bush's superb voice and never overtake!9. "Houdini"- The album cover is to do with this song. The song is excellent with a really quirky chorus and good instrumentation.10. "Get Out Of My House"- A perfect way to end an amazing album. The lyrics are so good and it is so funny at the end when she turns into a mule (within the song obviously). It is something only Kate Bush could have written!Overall I think it is an amazing album though I can see why people don't like it. It could be a little too experimental for some though for me it is perfect. Kate Bush shows she was the original alternative female and the best (yes, she's better than Tori Amos). She is one of the few geniuses of music and an all time amazing artist. Reccomended to everyone into alternative, especially Tori Amos fans!MARK- 10/1</review_text>
What else can be said about this great CD?  It's one of the best pop records ever made and you never get sick of hearing these 10 songs. "Child of Vision" is the best (the piano solo is killer) of the best, but this is one of those rare CD's that you just pop in and let the entire thing play till the end (no skipping over songs you don't like). A true classic</review_text>
A lot of music fans have mused over why Matthew Sweet did not achieve greater success with the masses despite his obvious ability to write very catchy songs. "Sick of Myself" single-handedly rejuvenated my faith in the power of pop music at a time when pop seemed to have exhausted its possibilities. But in retrospect Sweet simply wasn't a very marketable commodity for the music industry, and on top of that his vocals and lyrics somehow didn't grab people. Its not that he doesn't sing with passion or feeling, but somehow the words seem to get lost in the mix. Perhaps its a production thing; regardless, the vocals on a MS album always seem to be secondary to the music and that is a no-no for any great singer-songwriter. There are some truly impressive (albeit derivative) stuff here: "What Matters" is in my opinion the greatest Byrds song never written, "Hide" is a beautiful piano ballad that wouldn't seem out of place on Badfinger compilation, "If Time Permits" has some of the most beautiful chorus harmonies not written by Brian Wilson, etc. etc. "I've Been Waiting" works well in combining catchy melody with plaintive adolescent desire, and "Girlfriend" is for the most part a great rocker. However, after the relatively simple production of Girlfriend, his later albums got bogged down in an attempt to recreate a "wall of sound" feeling, which quite frankly doesn't really work unless you're Phil Spector. Not much here can be completely discounted and the new songs fit in quite well (although I probably would have included "Evangeline" at the expense of "Ready"). Despite the undeniable quality of the music there is nothing life-changing here and ultimately great music must at least have the semblance of being life-changing. Still heartily recommended for fans of catchy, melodic pop-rock</review_text>
Really nothing on this is bad. The best IMHO is Rubyhorse, the Brian Jonestown Massacre and the Subways but a case could be made for any of the songs. The only problem is now I have 8 other CDs I need to buy</review_text>
After Trouble and his Austin City Limits appearance, I thought he was just another very good singer songwriter.  This follow up has made me reconsider, because this is the work of a very thoughtful perfectionist.  He waited and it was worth the wait.This reminded me immediately of John Lennon (please don't punish me for blasphemy) and others that knew how to touch you with simplicity done in a classy way.I didn't expect something this deep for a sophomore recording.  Enjoy</review_text>
The title gets it right - this is a very fun album. There are a lot of great songs on here. Infectious lyrics and music - it still surprises me that Matthew Sweet isn't more popular than he is.One other thing...it's a sin that "We're The Same" wasn't a bigger hit than it was. Truly a great song</review_text>
I've been a Robben Ford fan since 1979. Each time he offers a new recording, I try to purchase it as quickly as possible. Robben can ROCK and play slow blues. Every cut on this cd is worth listening to over and over again. I can't say enough! Robben is one of the least known and treasured guitartists of our generation! If you like Robben Ford, don't miss Chris Cain. This man is also a guitar genius</review_text>
I'm a horn performance major, and I bought this box set because I needed recordings of all of Beethoven's symphonies but at a low cost.  Now first off, yes, they sound great.  However, I've noticed a problem in the first movement of the fifth symphony: Karajan changes Beethoven's orchestration!  Allow me to explain:The horn players at the time would have been using valveless horns -- instruments bound to the overtone series.  On the "natural" or "hand" horn, pitches that fall on the overtone series can be played without adjustment (like a bugle) but any other note must be bent into tune by using the right hand to close off the bell.  This technique was effective in allowing the horn to play most chromatic pitches, however, the "stopped" notes have an entirely different tone color; most composers favored "open" pitches, especially for symphonic works.In the exposition, the second theme is announced by a call in E-flat by the horns.  However, in the recap, the same call must be in the tonic (C), as dictated by sonata form.  The horn part is written for E-flat horns, which meant they would have been tuned so that the harmonic series emphasised E-flat major, the relative major.  The E-flat call of the exposition falls entirely on partials the hornists can play with no significant adjustment -- they are all "open" notes.  However, in the recapitulation, the C call would include two "closed" notes if it were played by the E-flat horn.  The horns could change crooks and become C horns, in which case the call would again be all open partials, but Beethoven does not do this; I am uncertain whether he wanted the horns in E-flat for the transition, leaving them no time to change, or if it was simply not yet common practice to change crooks in the middle of a movement.  For whatever reason, Beethoven left the horns in E-flat and rather than writing the call in the horns again, which would include stopped pitches and have a very different sound, Beethoven moved the call to the bassoons.In Karajan's recording, the second theme is announced by the horns in both the exposition and the recapitulation.  Granted, if Beethoven had been writing for our modern valve horns, he might have written both calls in the horn section.  There is no way to prove for certain that this is the case, however.  It strikes me as very arrogant to "correct" Beethoven's instrumentation, and I feel that a respect for historical accuracy by preserving the master's writing is a more prudent performance choice.</review_text>
This is the album that all Kenny G fans have been waiting for!!! It was well worth the wait too. Not only is Kenny G at the top of his game but the vocalists are GREAT! The entire group of artists is so eclectic. Thank you Kenny G!!</review_text>
To be honest I can't think of a word that can explain the emotional link with this album apart from it being the most beautiful sound I've heard. For me listening to this album makes me feel emotionally confused but absolutely complete at the same time, never before has an album stopped me in my tracks as firmly as this one. My favourite songs on the album are "the only moment we were alone" and "six days at the bottom of the ocean" every time my ears are blessed with these artworks I'm am fixated on nothing else but them. I literally cannot communicate with anyone or anything I just have to listen to them intently. This album is not as experimental as "those who tell the truth shall die those who tell the truth shall live forever" but I feel it is just as good and the songs are put together impeccably well, with no song being neither longer nor shorter than it has to be. I love the pure, clean sound of this album and see it as light as the wind. The trance that this album provides is indescribable; I'm not saying if you buy this album it will have this exact effect on you this description is merely from a personal note. Either way I strongly recommend this band and album to anybody who is looking for a purchase, for you can have no doubt that this album is extremely well produced, written, recorded, thought out and sounding. Buy it, you will not regret your choice one bit.</review_text>
The one song I know is a remake is "Goodnight My Love."  I know this because I have it on the original 45 issue and the CD version is an inferior remake.  But the others with which I'm familiar - but don't have original vinyl to compare, only memories - seem authentic.The audio quality is great and certainly superior to some of the CDs you find these days which are only re-recordings of old vinyl or cassettes.</review_text>
I bought this CD after I'd watched the movie the first three times. The music is wonderful.  I bought it specifically for the song they sing in the church scene - "I Don't Care to Stay Here Long" and I want it played at my own funeral way out there in "someday".  You can't hear it without smiling and the words are much easier to understand on the CD than in the movie.  But just in case, here's the first foot-stompin' verse:Fare -- well, vain world! I'm going home.My Savior smiles and bids me come andI don't care to stay here long. BrightAngels beckon me away to sing God's praise in endless day andI don't care to stay here long.Right up Yonder! Christians, away up Yon-der.Oh, yes my Lord, for I don't care to stay here long</review_text>
I can't say with the wordsmust listen!</review_text>
I can't even begin to say how much I love these albums (i just picked UYI 1 to write my review for both).  Everyone always says that Appetite is Guns best album...no way in hell.  The Illusion albums are so much richer.Now don't get me wrong, I love appetite but it is more of a party album with cool guitar work and catchy tunes.  The illusion twins are just so much deeper lyrically and have many more styles woven in and out of a hard rock framework.I can identify with so many of axls lyrics, and the music just makes them stand out so much more.  Slash is basically the best hard rock guitar player ever, and he has more awesome solos and leads on these albums than most guitar players have in a career.And the best part about these albums is that the lesser known songs are usually the best, such as: Locomotive, Bad Apples, Dont Damn Me, The Garden, Pretty Tied Up, Coma, Civil War, Get in the Ring, Breakdown, Estranged (kind of popular but still fairly unknown) 14 Years, Bad Obscession, Dust n Bones, Dead Horse, and more.  Then of course there are the hits, Dont Cry, November Rain, Knockin on Heavens Door, Live and Let Die, You Could Be Mine etc.The only songs i dont really like that much are My World (wtf?) and shotgun blues, but everything else is just so gdamn good.  Do yourself a favor and go buy these albums if u consider yourself a hard rock fan.  The illusion albums are art, plain and simple</review_text>
We started playing this for our one year old when we were driving on a short trip out of town. As babies sometimes do, she began screaming and was unconsolable... UNTIL we turned on Rocket Ship Beach. Polly wolly doodle calmed her right down and continues to do so. We played that song at least 6 times in a row that day! now that she's a little older, she points to the cd player in the car if something else is playing, requesting her cd be played.I've always enjoyed a wide range of music, and was afraid that after having a child, we'd be reduced to listening to watered down "kid music" like that purple dinosaur and those australian guys. There is a mixture of classics reimagined and new songs that i find myself humming all of the time. There is a good variety of instrumentation and styles. Our daughter claps at the end of her favorites and often waves her arms about.Got kids? Buy this cd!</review_text>
...else if Michigan was on vinyl I would have worn it out by now.Illinois was my first venture into the sound-world of Sufjan Stevens, and no doubt it his most impressive outing to date. However the subtle spendour of the earlier Michigan has ousted it as my favourite. Perhaps less eclectic and entertaining than Illinois, but more soulful and beautiful. Ultimately it's the one I'd take to the proverbial Desert Island.There's not a single track in this 74 minute CD that I'd want to skip or drop from my MP3 playlist, but highlights for me are Romulus (gentle and heartbreaking), Sleeping Bear (musically gorgeous), and Vito's Ordination Song (like being gently hugged).p.s. So often the 'bonus tracks' on a CD can seem superfluous and substandard but the 2 extras on my CD (Marching Band and Pickerel Lake) are both excellent.</review_text>
His singing style is very unique as are his lyrics.  He has an eclectic mix of love songs, "we are the world" type songs and a few others on this album.  He has the staying power for long the long term and I would love to see him mature throughout the years and watch to see where he goes.  I loved Streetcorner Symphony!  It is so upbeat it can pull me out of whatever is ailing me.  Lonely No More is my theme song for right now in my life - needless to say I am replaying grooves in that one!  Enjoy this album - I sure do</review_text>
Like many Amazon reviewers, I play a teensy bit of guitar.  I know just enough to know how incredible these guys are.  This is the best, most exciting acoustic playing I've heard since Al DiMeola cut "Race With Devil on Spanish Highway" on his Elegant Gypsy Suite LP.  Watching the Del Castillo brothers shred on the DVD part of this set will assure that I don't get anywhere near my guitar for a long time.  Since Robert Rodriguez (Desperado, Spy Kids, etc) filmed the performances, we get appallingly good, tight shots of the fretwork.  People, it can't be done.  I will henceforth concentrate on harmonica, and try to forget that Sugar Blue does about the same level of impossibility on that instrument.The songs and playing come from a somewhat traditional Latin, Mexicano perspective, but the overall sound is more like Santana when Carlos goes acoustic.  The "hidden track" on the CD most overtly shows that the Del Castillo brothers love their blues and rock almost as much as the Latin roots music.This is an obvious buy for anyone who enjoys Latin music or great guitar work of any style, but it is more accurate to say that anyone who is not totally averse to this style should check it out.  The quality of music here really transcends the genre</review_text>
This was one of my first albums I got. I got it because of 'Paradise City' but got adapted quickly to 'Welcome to the Jungle' and rest.There were only few more metal/rock albums that made such impact on my taste during teens:Maiden's 'Powerslave',  Megadeth 'Rust in Peace'  and Suicidal Tendencies 'Lights...Camera...revolution'</review_text>
Without getting too much into it this Album is pretty good. 4 stars for some bad ass tracks. My favs are Tears from the moon, Beautiful things , As the rush comes. All in all worth the money</review_text>
I, like many others, have been waiting for this album for quite some time.  Right from the first track, I was hooked.  "All My Days" is a haunting, melodic, heartbreaking opening to a fantastic album.  "Breathe" has a subdued yet powerful message.  "Home" is just plain fun.  "Song For You" is sweet, somber, and hopeful.However, I must say that the Four Songs version of "Orange Sky" is what I consider to be the greatest song ever written.  However, the Time Without Consequence version is devastatingly bad (when held up to the light of the original).  The new version is too fast, has an inexplicably irritating percussion, and just doesn't dig into the soul the way the Four Songs version does.  I will always be baffled by this remake.  It is truly awful.  Its only saving grace is that the original is still available.But that is by no means any reason to avoid this CD.  In fact, those who do not know the original "Orange Sky" may fall in love with this one.  But it is my duty to warn those looking for an "Orange Sky" that matches the original that you will be severely disappointed.  Outside of this single-song complaint, this CD has vaulted to one of the best I own</review_text>
EDITED:It took me a while to enjoy listening to this whole album since I am used to listening to her recent work - Afterglow & Surfacing.  This is truly an outstanding album and definitely overlooked. In my opinion, this ranks as the 3rd best Sarah McLachlan album with #1 Fumbling Towards Ecstasy, and #2 Afterglow -- even though Surfacing outsold these 2 albums.I can't say much about the album, because some of the reviews here say what I would say for this album as well.Drawn to the Rhythm: 5/5Into The Fire: 5/5The Path of Thorns (Terms): 5/5 - first song from Solace I heard. Truly unique than the rest since she sings at a lower range.I Will Not Forget You: 5+/5 - LOVE IT, My #1 favorite of all her songs on this album.Lost: 4.5/5 (this is a first for Sarah McLachlan to have male background singers singing - Edited:  actually this would be the third as her 1st album "Touch" had male bg singers for the tracks Trust and Strange World)Back Door Man: 5/5 - I truly enjoy this song, this song sort of reminds me of Stupid from Afterglow. I love her intense voice and wish she could do more songs like this.Shelter: 5/5 - really sad and it's actually the second Solace song I heard after 'Path'Black: 5+/5 - this is my second favorite song.  All in all, deep lyrics dedicated to corporate pigs as Sarah says.  One of her first experimental songs after "Touch".Home: 5/5 - this is also another good song, probably the 3rd I love.  I just love how the song ends.  It actually sounds better live since the instruments overlap her singing.Mercy: 5/5 - I consider this the last song from the album. WYLLH doesn't do it for me and I'm disappointed Sarah let Arista have it their way.  Oh well.  Sarah should do more acapella-like songs!  This truly displayed her skills and got even better in the next album ;)Overall rating: 9.5/10Outstanding album I wish it had more praise</review_text>
This album came out about 8 years before I was born. All the years, I still remember turning on the classic radio stations that would play WBSS or Billie Jean. Now I know all the lyrics and music videos from this album. This is MJ in his prime. Unfortunately, we will never get another epic like this again. Michael is sadly a target in the media, but he is still a great music icon whether you like him or not. Every song off here is a classic. One song I thought was unneccesary was "Baby Be Mine". But otherwise, it's excellent. If you starting an MJ collection, get this album first. Trust me.</review_text>
Hiphop as a genre is so wide spread and international that sometimes we get wonderful creative jems like Lady Sovereign. She is not only lyrically impressive, but the mixes of electronics on all her tracks will get you moving, which is basically what she sets out to do. I dont know much about the hip hop insprised grime scene in the UK, but i will definitely be keeping on eye out now. And i will patiently await for S.O.V. debut US album.Favorite Track, though all of it is really good, will have to be "The Battle" feature other grime scene artists like Shystie, Zuz Rock, and Frost P spitting the wildest (barely understandable lol) rhymes ive heard. No men and women have battled against each other like this, especially for the listening public.How ever, no one should compare SOV to anyone (Missy or M.I.A.) All emcees, particularly female one have a different style and should be prasied for such. SOV has a style totally different from anything ive heard to date. It's refreashing to see a new spin on HipHop.</review_text>
Yes, there may be some small issues with the sound quality, but you get used to it, and Wilhelm Kempff is definitely one of the great pianists of the 20th Century, so it is worth it. These are incredible performances that are often justly called definitive. Kempff seems to always bring out every theme of every work and magnifies its emotional intensity, whereas other pianists would not have nearly as much attention to detail and neglect many subtle themes. Highly recommended</review_text>
Kate is one of the most talented musicians on this earth. The Dreaming was underrated when it was first released, but I think that has to do with the fact that it was way ahead of its time. This is a superb album, tracks like Sat in Your Lap, Suspended in Gaffa, Leave It Open, Night of The Swallow, Houdini, and Get Out of My House proving this point. There's lots of anger on this album, as Kate put it herself many years ago, and it is her "darkest" effort to date, but it's pure brilliance! Buy it and be convinced.....</review_text>
La Bamba (1987.) The soundtrack to the Ritchie Valens biopic of the same name.INTRODUCTION:In 1987, the film La Bamba, based on the life and times of fifties pop-rock star Ritchie Valens, was released. The film cast Lou Diamond Phillips as the classic musician, and told his story, from his rise to fame, right down to his young and tragic death. For the film, Los Lobos, a fairly popular act of the day, was asked to rerecord classic Valens material for the movie. Some other moderately popular musicians who portrayed other musicians of the same era depicted in the film also provided recordings for the film. So, how is the soundtrack? Read on, and find out!OVERVIEW:The La Bamba soundtrack was released in 1987, around the same time as the film of the same name. Contributors to the soundtrack include Los Lobos, Howard Huntsberry, Marshall Crenshaw, Brian Setzer, and Bo Diddley. The A-Side of the soundtrack sonsists of the Los Lobos covers of the Ritchie Valens songs La Bamba, Come On Lets Go, Ooh My Head, We Belong Together, Framed, and Donna. The B-Side consists of the other artists' covers, which include Howard Huntsberry's cover of Jackie Wilson's Lonely Teardrops, Marshall Crenshaw's cover of Buddy Holly's Crying Waiting Hoping, Brian Setzer's cover of Eddie Cochran's Summertime Blues, Bo Diddley's remake of his own classic tune Who Do You Love, and the two songs Los Lobos recorded for the film which were not remakes, Charlena and Goodnight My Love.REVIEW:Awesome movie, awesome soundtrack. I'm a huge fan of the music of Ritchie Valens, and for the most part, La Bamba proved to be an efficient and entertaining retelling of the Valens saga. Aside from some omitted material (which I'll get to later), the soundtrack is every bit as good as the film it represents. Read on for my reviews of the tracks.-SIDE A--La Bamba by Los Lobos: Los Lobos covers the track that took Ritchie Valens to the top of the musical world. Being a folk song, no one ever thought a rock and roll version would do well - Valens proved the non-believers wrong! Los Lobos does a great cover of it, too. The band actually did two versions of the song for the movie - a rendition of the slower, folksier version by the bar band that convinced Valens to cover the song himself, as well as the classic version Valens did. This is the classic Valens version. I wish they had included both versions of the soundtrack, though (although an instrumental sequence near the end of this version DOES reprise elements of the folk-type version. Still, I wanted BOTH versions as complete, separate tracks!)-Come On Lets Go by Los Lobos: This classic rockabilly-style cut was another huge hit for Ritchie Valens. Los Lobos creates a fine rendition of the classic cut, staying true to the Valens original while at the same time adding their own spin onto things. All in all, another great song.-Ooh My Head by Los Lobos: Not much to say about this one. Once again, Los Lobos manages to create an excellent version of one of the many classic Valens tunes people know and love him for. Every song on this soundtrack is excellent, and this one is no exception.-We Belong Together by Los Lobos: Ah, the classic Valens love song. Although its success was pretty much ousted by the better known ballad Donna, this one was still a fairly notable hit for Valens. The Los Lobos take on the ballad is a damn good one - but I shouldn't have to tell you that, now should I?-Framed by Los Lobos: Of all of the Ritchie Valens song that Los Lobos revisited in La Bamba, this one is the least well known. That's a shame, because it's a great song! The song takes a classic blues styling, and puts a rockabilly spin on it. Once again, Los Lobos does a marvelous cover version of the song.-Donna by Los Lobos: This song was so big a hit for Ritchie Valens initially, that his only song even on the same plane of popularity is La Bamba. The classic ode Valens wrote to his high school girlfriend proved to be the stuff that has withstood the test of time. And I know you're probably getting tired of me saying this for every song, but Los Lobos really does a good job on here.-SIDE B--Lonely Teardrops by Howard Huntsberry: In La Bamba, Howard Huntsberry portrayed the classic soul singer Jackie Wilson. And here, Huntsberry reprises Wilson's signature tune. This is classic soul at its very best. Prior to seeing La Bamba, I had never even heard of Huntsberry. But the real shocker is that I ended up liking this version of the song more than the original! Definitely a solid, underrated cut.-Crying Waiting Hoping by Marshall Crenshaw: Marshall Crenshaw, a fairly popular eighties pop signer, managed to land the role of Buddy Holly in La Bamba. Holly, of course, was killed in the same plane crash that claimed the life of Ritchie Valens. Buddy Holly is a tough guy to cover, but Marshall Crenshaw does a damn good job of it. I personally prefer this version over Holly's original (and that's saying a lot since I LOVE Buddy Holly!) If you're interested in hearing Crenshaw cover another Holly tune, check out the remastered version of his 1982 self-titled debut - he covers Rave On on there as a bonus track.-Summertime Blues by Brian Setzer: Long before Brian Setzer gained any real fame, he played Eddie Cochran in La Bamba, covering the song that made that man a rockabilly legend. Here's another one of those covers that is so good, I like it more than the original. Definitely worthwhile listening - but then again, isn't every song on here?-Who Do You Love by Bo Diddley: Bo Diddley himself did this song originally so very long ago, and was asked to rerecord it for La Bamba. He did, and the end results are solid. Diddley is a legend of the blues, and this recording is just a small sample of why so many people feel that way. It just a shame that the version of this song most people remember is the George Thorogood one, because Diddley's version is the song the way it was meant to be heard.-Charlena by Los Lobos: In addition to the Ritchie Valens covers, Los Lobos recorded two new songs for the La Bamba soundtrack. This is the first of the two. Essentially, this here is a neo-rockabilly track of sorts, and a damn good one too. Long after the fifties music scene died out, Los Lobos still managed to record a song that suited the style perfectly.-Goodnight My Love by Los Lobos: Here's the second of the newly-recorded Los Lobos songs done for the soundtrack. What we have here is one of those classic fifties-style rock ballads that were so popular back then. If you're into that sort of thing, you're going to love this song - I know I do!-OTHER COMMENTS-Omissions are the biggest problem with this soundtrack, by far. As I previously stated, only one version of La Bamba is on here - not both versions from the film. Another omission is Sleepwalk, the classic Santo And Johnny instrumental that shows up frequently in the film. Its omission is likely due to the fact that it wasn't recorded just for the film, but still, I miss it. And then there's the issue of Rip It Up, the classic Ritchie Valens rockabilly tune he first plays with his band in their garage, early on in the film. This was one of my favorite songs in the film, and I was devastated not to see it on here. And where's the Big Bopper's Chantilly Lace? I rated this soundtrack four stars instead of five because of omissions. If these songs had been on here, it would be five stars all the way.OVERALL:Overall, despite my issues with the omitted songs, I am very satisfied with the La Bamba soundtrack. Much like the movie, it's an excellent experience all the way through. If you liked the movie, or you're just into this sort of music, the soundtrack is well worth owning. Highly recommended!EDITION NOTES:This soundtrack is becoming increasingly more difficult to find on compact disc, implying it may be very gradually going out of print. Take my advice - if you want it, just buy it online. It's the fastest, easiest way to get it.</review_text>
When I first heard this album I was a bit shocked.  Myself and my fellow TMBG fans derided it as a "teen angst album," moaned and whined that John & John had betrayed us by adding a band, and generally refused to give it a chance.A few years later, listening to my entire collection of TMBG in chonological order (a sanity-restoration ritual), I realized that this album is AWESOME!There are only 2 stupid songs, Window and DirtBike.  Hey, for TMBG, that's not bad - their fans forgive them stupidity on a regular basis.Aside from that, there are more rockin', thought-provoking tunes here than you'll find almost anywhere.  This album establishes beyond a doubt that TMBG are among the most gifted songwriters in rock history.I'm not going to go over each individual song - there are millions of TMBG fans who have and will.  I will add my 2 cents about my 4 favorites however:"I Should be Allowed to Think" - TMBG does justice to beat poetry, and beyond!"Why Must I Be Sad?" - Funny and pissy, great for getting those pesky emotions unstuck.  The lyrics are genius, subtly quoting the best of Alice Cooper with tongue firmly planted in cheek."A Self Called Nowhere" - Righteous, angry, and breathtaking.   Angsty punk bands of the world, take note: you will NEVER be this hardcore."The End of the Tour" - I have written in my last wishes that I want this one played at my funeral.  One of the most moving and emotionally honest rock ballads ever written.If your idea of TMBG is songs like "Istanbul" and "Particle Man," get over it!  And give this album a chance!</review_text>
So many times, older recordings are not very high quality but not with this group of songs. If you are a Marty Robbins fan (and I am) this CD is a must</review_text>
ALL I CAN SAY IS YOU MUST TRY THIS!</review_text>
I am a big Ambrosia fan and I love "Biggest Part of Me", "You're the Only Woman", "How Much I Feel" and the newer track "I Just Can't Let Go".  However, I wish this CD contained all of their Billboard Hot 100 hits.  The CD is missing their cover of "Magical Mystery Tour" (#39) and "How Can You Love Me" (#86).  For the casual listener, this CD is perfect.  For the chart hit completionists out there, it misses a couple songs.  I bought this CD used for $1.99, which was a HUGE bargain for the songs included.  For that price, I can certainly try to download the missing tracks</review_text>
i just want to say that this record blows my mind!  Only the japanese could come up with this musical hybrid that defies definition.  Only miss minekawa could inject such beautiful innocence into this thrilling aural rollercoaster of breaks, samples, and guitars.  Cornelius and DJ Me DJ You  are brilliant</review_text>
I'm a bit surprised by the negative reviews, this CD is amazing. It's not anything like Soundgarden or Audioslave - but it's amazing none-the-less. Every song on here is beautifully written, and, as always, Cornell's voice doesn't disappoint. It's different, but one of my new favorite CDs</review_text>
When my boyfriend bought this for me I was so happy and I remember I would play this music and sing for him in the car on cool dark, starry nights and I would be mesmerized not only by the intensity of those nights, but by the music she sang and how she deeply, richly portrayed those songs. She really knew how to set the mood for any lover or lonely lover as well. I totally recommend this CD to start if you have not heard much of her music...SHe truly is addicting once you hear these songs...These songs will definetly put you in an enchanting and romantic journey</review_text>
If you are expecting "Safari Moon Pt. 2", you will be dissapointed. Air took a more adventuourous, darker, ambient, serious, experimental, and ultimtately brilliant journey into electronic music. The songs here range from sounding like Aphex Twin (without the weird off-putting effects or heavy drums) to Thievery Corp. Air still has a beautiful sense of melody and as usual the tunes themselves are beautifully and creatively put together (even a throwaway Air song is a well-crafted one). Overall, all us true hardcore Air fans love this album. Those who only loved MS may not like it, but that's their loss I say</review_text>
If you do not yet own Dark Side of the Moon, Wish You Were Here AND The Wall, do not even consider purchasing A Momentary Lapse of Reason. AMLOR is junk by comparison.That said, very few rock albums ever made can hang with those three, and AMLOR certainly has its bright spots. "Learning to Fly" and "On the Turning Away" are as good as anything Pink Floyd has ever produced. Some of the other songs are adequate, but this album does not contain the front-to-back brillance of the earlier Floyd releases. It's definitely worth having, but make sure that you have the others first.</review_text>
This album is the foudation of modern Hip Hop...the format of the album the presence of Rakim ....his image everything was new territory when this album came out in 86' all Hip Hop lovers should have this album especially people down south</review_text>
Considering how much bad music is out there these days, this was nice to come across.  Covers a wide range of topics and moods, musicianship is pretty good.  I'd recommend it to just about anyone.  My tastes are usually heavier and more progressive - Rush, Dream Theater, Iron Maiden, Queensryche.  But I like this disc too</review_text>
It's impossible to like all of country music, but Randy Travis is liked by even those who don't like country music. From 1986 and through the 90's he was always on top or near the top of the country charts.  His calm, nasal drawl reminds me a bit of Lefty Frizell, but there's no mistaking his unique style. These are some of the best recordings in the history of country music including Digging Up Bones, Forever and Ever, Amen, Too Gone Too Long, Is It Still Over?, Hard Rock Bottom Of Your Heart etc. Randy had 16 No. 1's on the country charts. There are 20 cuts here.  If you only want one CD with all his greatest hits this is your logical choice. By the way, the sound from Rhino is bright and punchy and the booklet features dates, neat pixs, and peak positions. You've got a winner for life with this one!</review_text>
Good singing and Good Production must I say anything else?.....No get this if you love mixtures of good uptempo and slow Rn</review_text>
This is mood making, sexy, great music. Neal adds a slight rock edge to some beautiful and familiar melodies. This album is great for background music (we play it in our store), party music or just for listing. One of the best guitar players of all time 'sings' with his instrument. BUY IT NOW</review_text>
I personally like this compilation of Prince, it's got most of the songs I like and the sound is great. Sure, there could have been a few more songs included, like "Pop Life", "Hot Thing", but when compared to the other compilations, this disc has more of the songs that are a must-have, for me, such as "I Wanna Be Your Lover", which I don't think was included on any of the other compilations. So, it's just a matter of weighing what songs you most want, so that's why I chose this disc and I'm glad I did!</review_text>
I owned the album as a kid.......I enjoy it as much now as I did then</review_text>
For the longest time, I have thought that observational truths were highly prone to being the most piercing of things: I have believed that the truth could either hurt (or disturb) you terribly, or make you laugh so hard, to the point of hysteria--or a combination of both extremes. There are many things to put this theory to the test, but to cut it all short, all one would need to do (if by chance it hasn't been done already) is experience the observational humor of Richard Pryor to possibly get a better understanding of what I am talking about. This classic comedy album from 1975 is a prime example.Richard Pryor has been hailed as a genius by many, and I would have to agree: it takes plenty of intelligence and natural talent to be a comedian for starters, but to also turn many disturbing observational truths of everyday life into something painfully, body-breakingly hilarious takes a whole lot of something as well. From the very beginning, to the tail-end of this CD, 1975's _Is It Something I Said?_ is a non-stop laugh fest, that personally gets *me* laughing so loud and hard, I end up pretty much abusing almost every part of my body in the process: my throat, my lungs, my sides, my stomach--they all end up feeling beaten and worn-out. Richard's takes on drugs, sex, race & racism, relationships, and politics in general are every bit as painfully observational as they are profane--and did I mention HILARIOUS? The racy quality of the material found here makes so much of what's referred to as "cutting-edge" these days, seem so contrived and unaffecting; Richard's observations seem just as relevant now--if not more so--as they were 30 years ago. I couldn't be graphic in pointing out some of the sickeningly funny moments on this disc -- and there are MANY -- but I should say that the opening one-two punch of "Eulogy," and "Shortage of White People," and Richard's take on his own battle with cocaine addiction in the "Cocaine" bit get me cracking up SO hysterically, I sometimes need to be careful not to make myself sick. And again, those are just a few of the MANY hysterical blasts found here.Richard Pryor is considered a comedic legend for a reason. This album here is a good example as to why he is considered as such. Just don't play it for the kids, and for the love of god *don't* play it during the middle of the night; you most certainly will disturb the beauty rest of your family, and your neighbors. And you know what could happen if you disturb one person's beauty rest: just imagine what would happen if you disturbed the beauty rest of many..</review_text>
I think this my first EP purchase ever - and I generally feel that, despite the quality many offer, EPs just are not worth it. Sam Beam was clearly on a mission to change my mind, as these apparent "outtakes" from The Creek Drank The Cradle are every bit as good as that miracle debut - if not better. I only very recently discovered Iron and Wine through Our Endless Numbered Days, and have since been backtracking only to see that this remarkably talented artist can do no wrong. The standout track to me is The Night Descending, it has the feel of a track pulled right out of the past. The other four tracks are just as excellent though, and I think Sam's managed to make an avid fan out of me. Damn... and just when I thought there were no new artists to be excited about!</review_text>
"Horizon" was a turning point in the recording career of the Carpenters--a more sophisticated sound more suited to Karen's rich and warm voice. But the album was rather short, and some of the songs just weren't up to the standards expected by their fans, which was reflected in the sales of the album, which was their slowest selling album up to that point.The opening "Aurora" and the closing "Eventide" (The same melody with different lyrics) nicely bookend the album, and Aurora provides the first hint that this was not the average Carpenters album. "Only Yesterday" follows; this beautiful and uptempo song begins as a dolorous, downbeat ballad before segueing into the cheerful refrain. The cover of "Desperado" is well done, but ultimately it is lost between the flashy tracks before and after it. "Please Mr. Postman" is infectuously happy fluff; it has absolutely no depth, but is irresistable while it's playing and will have you singing along with Karen.  The big-band era "I Can Dream, Can't I?" reveals the new depths of Karen's voice, and the small jazz combo  ensures that she is the focus of the listener. The third and final single from this album, "Solitaire" begins the second half of the album on a (metaphorical) high note. The remaining full tracks ("Happy","I'm Caught Between Goodbye and I Love You", and "Love Me for What I Am") are all less-than-captivating songs that greatly benefit from Karen's reading and Richard's arrangements</review_text>
I received "Aerial" last December, and it still amazes me.  The music soars and sweeps, carrying the listener along on its wings.  It is a work of genius, and those who are long-time Kate Bush fans will find that it was well worth waiting twelve years for this masterpiece to arrive!This two-disc set offers the listener two different experiences, in my opinion.  The first disc, "A Sea of Honey" is comprised of sort of stand alone pieces, first of which is "King of the Mountain," probably the most "commercially appealing" song on the album.  "King of the Mountain" sucks the listener in with deep, murky tones and Kate's voice easing into the song softly, building in intensity as the song progresses.  "King of the Mountain" is followed by songs like "Pi" (who else but Kate Bush could make the derivation of Pi sound so sexy?) and "Bertie," a lovely Elizabethan paean to her young son.  Then there are emotionally raw songs like "Mrs. Bartolozzi" and "A Coral Room," the latter of which is about Kate's late Mother.  The reclusive Ms. Bush teases the listener about the struggle for anonymity in "How to Be Invisible," and sings in reference to Joan of Arc in "Joanni."After being captivated by songs about famous people, and more down-to-earth personal struggles/triumphs, the listener comes to the second disc, titled "A Sky of Honey."  This is, in my opinion, the pice de rsistance of "Aerial."  This disc is a continuous journey of sound, taking the listener on an amazing voyage punctuated by--among other things--the sounds of birds, the sound of her child's voice, and Kate Bush's silky voice singing in Italian.  The disc is almost indescribably beautiful, in my opinion.  I love the way "A Sky of Honey" takes me out of myself when I hear it.  I feel like I am flying at points; becoming one with the soaring birds.  My personal favorite on "A Sky of Honey" is "Nocturn," a surreal nighttime romp on the beach, accompanied by thumping bass and showcasing the pure magic of Kate Bush's voice.  The disc's final (and title) track "Aerial" is a forceful climax to the sonic journey, and ends with Bush singing:"I want to be up on the roofI've gotta be up on the roofUp, up high on the roofUp, up on the roofIn the sun"It is as though Kate Bush has reached new heights and has taken the listener along for the trip.  What an absolutely magnificent acheievement this disc is!To Kate Bush fans, I cannot recommend this album highly enough.  True, it was a very long wait for this new CD, but, Ms. Bush has rewarded her fans duly; indeed it is almost like she released two separate albums at once with this two-disc triumph!  If you are a Kate Bush devotee, you will not be disappointed!  And, if you are new to Kate Bush, "Aerial" will be a great introduction to her genius.  Kate Bush is like no other artist I can name.  Her voice is incredibly versatile; she can mold it to sound like an angel or a banshee, a temptress or a child.  And, so far in her career, it Kate Bush's voice gets better with the passing of time.  Like a fine wine, one can savor it and contemplate its complexities endlessly.  "Aerial" is well, well worth listening to, and words alone cannot suffice to explain what a work of art it is.</review_text>
First, I'd like to say that I am so glad there are artists like Amel around who aren't trying to fit in with today's commercial R&B scene. As a long time fan of R&B and soul music I can't help but feel sad and dissapointed at the direction the genre is taking, especially in regards to female singers. She may be beautiful, but she doesn't need to use her looks to overcompensate for any lack of vocal talent by flaunting herself. Amel has a beautiful soul, and you can hear that through her wonderful voice and lyrics. Every song on this album has at some point or another touched me, some songs straight away while others grew on me slowly. You know how sometimes when you're listening to music and a particular lyric or vocal piece makes you shiver? Amel's got that down for me.I was firstly introduced to nusoul by Teedra Moses, someone who I've admired for two years now, and who to me seemed one of the few decent R&B singers left. Through Teedra I stumbled on Amel's "Bravebird" and became more and more curious as I listened to the album over and over. Like with most nu/soul, the love I have for each song grew slowly, and songs I thought weren't for me suddenly became my favorites on the album. I love that about Amel; she makes me suprise myself, as I become emotionally involved with her music and voice over time until I'm enchanted."For Real" hit me instantly as a beautiful song. I never get tired of it's cute opening where Amel's daughter babbles something in baby talk!I'd love to talk about each song individually, but I'd probably just bore you. To me Amel's music is a personal experience, and most likely strikes people in different ways. I will mention however, "Congo" - one of the songs on there I was tempted to skip at first but has fast become something of an obsession which crops into my head throughout the days, with it's monotonous jungle vibe. Other personal favorites include "We Can Be New", "Say You Want It", "All I Got2"... Hell the whole album really.Along with other outstanding artists of the nu-soul genre, Amel has succesfully metamorphosised my taste in back music. Trust me, you'll never go back to commercial R&B again</review_text>
Overdrive, watching the rain, Enchanted, Teaching myself to dream, Glow, Lemon, Because I can are really excellent songs, this album is really worth it.</review_text>
This is where AFI began their sound change from their first 2 cd's (answer that & stay fashionable, Very Proud of Ya). It is much more serious than the first 2, alot angrier, heavier, Darker, and more screaming/yelling as well. Some people say this is their best, I disagree, I prefer their "punkier" 1st 2 BUT i still enjoy this alot, it's all down to personal taste, it gets a 5/5 for me</review_text>
I have just about all of Robben's albums and I believe that this is his best work. The interpretations and musicianship are outstanding. Robben's improvisational playing actually comes across more like  composition. His  technique is extremely melodic. He is, in my opinion, one the best blues  guitar players around and his profound knowledge of jazz gives his music a  very refreshing &quot;twist&quot;. Check out his prowess on &quot;You cut  me to the bone&quot;, &quot;Prison of love&quot; or &quot;My love will  never die&quot;</review_text>
Although I like this album, there's nothing that especially stands out about it. It's typical Bright Eyes, and if you already love the band you won't be disappointed. However, it's not one of their best albums. It's not as good as Lifted, not as addicting as Fevers and Mirrors, and not as raw and endearing as Letting off the Happiness. But yet again, Conor succeeds in writing songs that capture all of the emotion without making me ill in a Dashboard Confessional sort of way</review_text>
I first encountered Bird3 opening for Veruca Salt the summer of 2001.  That band had put their faith into Bird and so have I.  We fell in love with them all together.  This band has successfully combined infectious pop hooks with soul-baring lyrics to create something unique, beautiful, and far from most of the trite pop or rock music you hear on the radio today.  You'll find yourself not only humming along, but holding this music close to your heart at your most intimate moments.  You will not once regret buying this piece of art</review_text>
Earlier, I had an LP called "Best of the Band" that was 10 cuts and maybe 35 minutes. This is 18 well chosen cuts and double the length. There are a lot of "best of/greatest hits" type collections from veteran artists that originally came out in 70's or early 80's that had a limited number of songs and length. This IS a case where the record decided to offer more songs and give the customer a better value for their money. The music itself is 5 stars and they were a major artist due to the fact that they had 3 very good but very different lead vocalists handling the vocals. It gives the music a lot more variety and they put out a lot of fine music in their 1968-76 prime. As an aside, 3 of the Band members (Helm, Danko, and Hudson) also put out some good music in the 1990's</review_text>
This album is great but I'm looking for a song that I think they sung. It goes: Pressing on we're pressing on (repeat). Waiting on Jesus to answer our call we're holding on (repeat) Pressing, pressing, pressing. If anyone knows the name of the song, or has any suggestions on who sings this song, please email me at udeebear1984@yahoo.com. Thank you and have a blessed day! :</review_text>
Hot Hot Heat is one of the few new bands to pique my interest. Their first release was decent, but "Elevator" is even better. Great tunes, drums and guitars - and, of course, Steve Bays' yelping vocals. There's only three songs I really don't care for - "Pickin' It Up", "Soldier In A Box" and "Shame On You". Looking forward to the next CD</review_text>
I used to be a bigger fan of Joe Satriani than Steve Vai about 10 years ago.  Now I quickly get bored of new Satriani albums, but Vai's music just moves me.  Lotus feet for example, wow, words cannot describe what that song does to me. Thanks Steve</review_text>
I'm a fan of Three 6 Mafia, and I can say maybe they kinda got a little of Three 6's rap style in this album, but I dunno.DJ Paul and Juicy J, the superproducers, they can never be beaten. I got all the Hypnotize Minds albums and they did invent crunk music. Many people haven't heard of them cuz besides Ridin' Spinners and Chickenhead they haven't been played on the radio very much except for their new track "Poppin' My Collar."Crime Mob's alright. The beats are alright, but nothing compared to Three 6 Mafia. Some of them are some krunk songs, I can get hyped to a few of them. But other than that I dunno. The lyrics are rather simple, I'm an 18 year old white dude and I think I can put together some better bars than these dudes can.But they do get some major play up here in Virginia. Stilletos and Knuck if you Buck haven't gotten some airtime. But there's only like 4 songs total that are worth hearing. I guess we'll see if they put out another album or not. I think if they had some other fellas from Georgia like T.I. or Jeezy or something they might get some more hype. Who knows, since Paul Wall's on every song now maybe he'll make a cameo. I guess we'll see.Three 6 Mafia still the buckest and besides their new artist Chrome, who really is garbage, they are still the kings of crunk, not Lil' John</review_text>
if you do not own this album you must get your hand on a copy. It is the best debut album since definatly mayby. Tracks like &quot;golden touch&quot; &quot;V.I.C.E&quot; well lets just say every song on the album is a bonnifide hit including the banging&quot;stumbble and fall&quot; which will have you tapping your toes from the first 2 seconds. If you like the libretines or the others or are just looking for a solid cd this is a must have</review_text>
One of his best times. All the songs on this CD are great he express his fellings very openly. With this CD people can really see who Marc Anthony really is</review_text>
The earlier reviews pretty much said it all; this is pretty much one of THE best and most overlooked bands from the 90s.  Swervedriver is lumped into the shoegazer category often, however, if that label scares you off then dismiss its application to this band, because they aren't so much shoegazer - in that cough-syrup-dreamy-noise way - as they are sonic rock.  Yes, rock.  Who knew it could still be done, and believe me, they do it well, and uniquely.  If you've listened to Swervedriver before, then tehre isn't too much more to say - buy this album.  It's not as hi-fi as 99th Dream or Mezcal Head (in my opinion their best album and one of the best of 90s decade), but not as fast or dirty as Raise.  Now, if you have never listened to Swervedriver, this might not be the best album to start with - it all depends on your tastes.  Personally, I would suggest starting with 99th Dream or Mezcal Head; either way, this has all the qualities of every Swervedriver album - great lyrics, superb and unique songs, and that urge for more when it's over.  Sadly, this band was vastly ill-treated by labels and they are no longer together (however, some vestiges exist in the form of Toshack Highway).  But if you want to see what you missed in the 90s - even more so, if you want to see what the best of the best from that decade truly was - Swervedriver is a must</review_text>
Every thing he sings is perfect, I've yet to find one song that doesn't move me.  This CD has some beauties.  &quot;Daughter of Mine&quot; is priceless.  &quot;Steal Away&quot; is very nice.  &quot;One Small  Star&quot; brings tears.  This arrangement of &quot;Voyage&quot; is  probably the best I've heard.  His traditional songs (&quot;When you and I  were young Maggie&quot; and &quot;Mary of Argyle&quot;) are beautiful.  I  can't find anything on this CD I couldn't listen to for hours.  I truly  love music and listen to it constantly.  I find myself reaching for the  McDermott CD's almost exclusively.  I have them all, more please</review_text>
Kudos to Harvey Fierstein for being so true to the Jean Poiret play. Jerry Herman did a wonderful score - my favorite song was "The Best of Times". Gene Barry turns out to be a good singer, esp paired with the talented George Hearn</review_text>
I'm only giving this 5 stars because the actual recordings are priceless. However I'm telling you now. DO NOT BUY THIS ALBUMThis is stolen goods and the recordings that are on this cd are not even of the finest quality.This is purely a commercial album released by the record company without the permission of Jack Off Jill's members. And thus they recieve no royalties for the selling of this album.Fear not though. you can get the tracks off this album completely free and in better quality.Agent Moulder of Jack Off Jill has remastered and released them on her website for your downloading pleasure.you can find them here:t-c-r.net/jojmusicwhile you are there check out and support her new band TCR, and their new album 'The Chrome Recordings'.Singer Jessicka also has an amazing new band if you didn't already know. check her and Scarling. out at scarling.comGod Bless Jack Off Jill.</review_text>
Hey!....It's Johnny Cash! You can't go wrong purchasing anything by Johnny Cash.</review_text>
This CD offers a great deal of incredible music by John Lennon during 1969 and the early 1970's when he fought our government in order for him and Yoko to live in the United States. The quality of the music is excellent and after you listen to this CD you want to run to watch the film!The CD starts off strong with "Power To The People." The song makes its political statement and offers a great beat that sticks in your mind. It is also very upbeat and aggressive in its tone which attracts the listener immediately to make them want more.The listener won't be disappointed. The tracks that follow provide great insight into John's politics at the same time that he provides us with his singularly beautiful music. Great songs on this CD include the autobiographical "Nobody Told Me" in which John admits that his struggle with our government both to end the Vietnam War and to remain in the USA is harder than he thought it would be. "Working Class Hero" has a folksy, bluesy feel to it but then the CD goes right back to that unique John Lennon rock and roll flavor with the song "I Found Out." "Bed Peace" follows as a type of introduction to the only Beatles song on this CD, "The Ballad Of John & Yoko." Despite the catchy rock and roll beat to "The Ballad Of John & Yoko," the lyrics tell the sad story of how people harass John and Yoko. Another great song is "Give Peace A Chance;" the message here is obvious. "Love," "Imagine," and "Oh My Love" are beautiful ballads with excellent musical arrangements; and we get a new instrumental version of "How Do You Sleep" that is very well done.In addition, I like the two live tracks from the John Sinclair Freedom Rally in 1971. "Attica State" is a brand new release and "John Sinclair" packs a strong punch! These tracks demonstrate so well John's ability to connect with his audience in a live setting.One special song on this CD directly challenges each and every listener to personal reflection and insight: "Happy Xmas (War Is Over)." John and Yoko tell people to know the difference between the blessings of peace and the evils of war, to cherish what is morally right and to fight against anything that is morally wrong. The song also expresses hope for a peaceful future beyond the current Christmas season. "Happy Xmas (War Is Over)" continues to play on radio stations every Christmas season to this day.Yes, another Amazon reviewer correctly notes that Yoko talks a little bit over the very beginning of the song "Oh My Love." Thank goodness that she doesn't talk over the lyrics! A few brief dialogue excerpts from the film are peppered throughout the CD but they never overlap with the songs.The CD ends with the same strength that it started with: "Instant Karma! (We All Shine On)" is an excellent song that most Lennon fans will always love.The liner notes include some great black and white pictures of John and Yoko, including two from the infamous "bed-in." You get the song credits along with the year that each song was released and there is a brief essay by Yoko Ono herself.Overall, this CD is more than just a retrospective of John's music during a turbulent period in his life. Oh sure, almost all of this music has been previously released. However, that's not relevant here. The CD celebrates Lennon's ability to communicate his political beliefs through his songs. These songs remind us to avoid genocide, to be true to oneself and to strive for peace--now. I highly recommend this CD for Lennon fans, fans of great 1970s rock music and anyone who wants to experience how John Lennon taught us what was right through his music.</review_text>
This is one of my all-time favorite CDs. I loved all the songs on this CD except one. My favorite is "Black Girl Pain" and it should be an anthem and inspriration for Black women all over the globe. I had the pleasure of seeing Talib in concert a few months ago in Atlanta and his live show was even better than his CD. True Hip-hop lives</review_text>
In the early 60's Etta James was to R&amp;B what Patsy Cline was to country. She could cross over and yet remain true to her roots, and that's only one part of a nearly 50 year career! From the velvety cross over soul of &quot;At Last&quot; to the hard driving Memphis soul of &quot;Tell Mama&quot;, this is one legend who certainly deserves a wider audience than she has today. She ranks right up with Aretha Franklin as an influential vocalist. I took far too many years to discover her power. If you haven't given her a serious look yet, stop wasting time and begin here</review_text>
This guy is going to become big someday.    I agree with this reviewer:"The songs on "Seven Swans", with a folksy bucholic feeling that runs through most of them, tell of spiritual tales. They tell of love that transcends the body and age. Sufjan can appeal equally to the Christian person as to the one who practices Zen Buddhism. And that is something few songwriters can accomplish. Keep an eye on Sufjan for years to come."  I have fun tooling around with "To Be Alone with You" on the guitar, such a simple but infectious melody."SEVEN SWANS" is not over orchestrated like "Michigan" and "Illinois" seem to be.  Good song to OK song ratio is about 85 percent on this one and about 45-50 percent on the the aforementioned CD's.    "SEVEN SWANS" is a great way to get introduced to the subtle musical power and overall genius of Sufjan.Sufjan has all his own style and is not afraid to tell us who he is.  VERY CREATIVE...HE TRULY FORGES HIS OWN MUSICAL PATH.  CANNOT WAIT FOR HIS CD CALLED "WISCONSIN."</review_text>
Please do yourself a favor and buy this CD! Whatever you do, dont listen to it in your car though. No kidding aside, I almost ran my car off the road because I was laughing so hard</review_text>
I INHALED this CD.  After all the hype and hyper blowin' up about this dance/punk/rock genius, I finally broke down and bought it.  Not that I was old enough to get into the discos in the mid 70's-early/mid 80's(I was still in elementary school, then middle school), but I remember(and still love) the groups that influenced this disc...The Buzzcocks, Heaven 17, PiL, Blondie...hell even the Rolling Stones "Some Girls" album.  And yes, I have to say(after finding "Death Disco-Songs Under the Dance Floor 1978-1984" CD and I'm ordering it)the old stuff is more fun.  But for the hipsters who don't know this is not original genre,it's pretty great.  No, it's very great.  The first song "Daft Punk is Playing at my House" was fun, and both discs made it worth driving through  snowy/sleety/frozen rain covered streets to work out at the gym these last couple weeks</review_text>
With a compelling story, great music, great lyrics, and two outstanding female leads, Aida certainly delievers. Right from the start with the goregous "Every Story Is A Love Story", the listener is captured by the wonderful spirit of the show. The seamless tranisition between ballads and showtunes is flawless.The three stars of the show each being something different to this recording. While Adam Pascal is always great, he's the weak point on this recording. I much more prefer him in Rent, and I don't think his voice suits this show very well. Sherie Renee Scott is teriffic as Amneris, and her powerful voice fills this recording with the powerful opener and "I Know the Truth". The star, however, is Heather Headley as Aida. Her Tony-winning performance will be forever immortalized on this recording with big, raw, emotional, and powerful voice. She's is perfect in every way</review_text>
I love that garage days re-re visited is on the flip side...in the cassette I had warped a long time ago!  I like this one</review_text>
This was one of those rare performances where Dylan's raw energy swept the stage and transformed these selections from his collection into somthing entirely new and great. The sound is rough, the intonation is off, the recording is filled with horrible buzzes, whistles, and clicks. None of which matters. Once youe listened to some of the tracks on this disk, you'll prefer them to the original album cuts. I know I do. Absolutely essential to any collection of Dylan's work, "Hard Rain" is not to be missed.</review_text>
ROCK N' ROLL history has many example of band/artists unlucky, that didn't get the recognition they deserve. Here's one.What is Big Star about? A rock n' roll, slightly psychodelic, most influenced by Beatles and The Byrds.the first record (#1 record - 1972) is the battle of two frontman putting one classic pop-rock tune after another. Chilton gets the most rock stuff, Chris the ballads, and also a contribution from Hummel, the hippy "India song".best moments: In the streets, thirteen, india song, when my baby's beside me, my life is right.the second album - Radio city  - 1973. Chris left the band, claiming that Chilton was getting too much control of everything. For this record, Hummel contributes more, the band goes torward some stuff slightly different, like the soul intended O my soul (maybe a reflection of the record label atmosphere.Chilton here also takes full control of the musical direction, the albm sounds not better or worse, but less laboured, sounding in some tracks, more like a rehearsal, with a great garage feeling.Stevens goes great on drums, specally on Back of a car.best tracks: way out west, life is white (although the harmonica annoys me a little), mod lang (very bowie mood), back of a car, september gurls.At a glance, Big Star reminds me backing home from school,playing my guitar, calling my girlfriend on the phone and waiting for the weekend to go to the beach. A feeling of youthness that doesn't come back, just like those special moments in a band's career that later, they can't catch anymore, no matter how hard they try. For Big Star, no differ, they would never do anything like these two records. And sadly after Bell's death, chances are zero to none.Why didn't they succeeded. Well, ego stuff, lack of Stax knowledge to deal with rock n' roll bands, and the dicotomy that was ruling the rock n' roll scene at the time: Hard rock versus progressive rock. And what about Big Star? Neither hard rock, nor progressive.But, despite all that rubish, Big Star is pure rock n'roll, guitar band, 70's style, recognizable in many current bands recording all over the world.Big Star is eternal.</review_text>
I purchased this album from Rasputina's website as soon as it was released there, and it stayed in my cd player (or technically, it stayed on repeat on my iPod) for a full fortnight after. It's full of the rock, groove, beauty, and madness that typefies the live Raspy experience.I HIGHLY recommend this cd to any fans who love to see the band live in recital, or who have not yet had the pleasure. If you don't have this recording, buy it now! Wait a minute... why don't you have it yet?The only reason I've given a rating of 4, rather than 5, is that I feel the sound quality could be a tad better in some spots; it can get a little murky. But for the most part, it sounds pretty good.I'll also mention, for anyone who doesn't know, that Zoe's latest solo cd is now available on her website, zoekeating.com. She's a wonderful artist in her own right - check it out!</review_text>
For real, you gotta give this man props. I repect him and his music, but it's not my style. He still managed to make this a good album, so it's all good. Much repect.</review_text>
For any seasoned fans of The Waifs (or anyone out there with a predilection for folksy girl duets sporting brilliant guitar skills and voices to boot), 'Shelter Me' will be no departure --and no disapointment -- from what you've heard before. The album weighs heavily on The Waifs accoustical appeal. The majority of the songs carry themselves without backbeat or excessive instrumentation -- mostly it's just the girls, their guitars, and the usual, typically wonderful songwriting that comes from Josh Cunningham, the third member of this stellar folk ensemble. The title track 'Shelter Me' is a gorgeous, magnificently charged piece that will leave you reeling, "Take me now where shelter be/ before there's nothing left of me." Vikki's final track 'Spotlight' is a pure gem, emotional and raw but utterly beautiful. 'Attention' finishes the album well with that familliar Waify energy and pulse, almost blue grass, almost country, but totally wonderful.</review_text>
This album is a classic, but its really short. Dead prez are the best duo in rap in my opinion. i highly recommend this and all of dead prez's other albums</review_text>
This album is awesome!!!!  My favorites are Pure and Appreciate.</review_text>
Wow what a great cd. I'm a big music fan of alot of different types of music and I have to say that this is one of the best cds that came out in 2004. You can't go wrong with this one. A</review_text>
This is lovely stuff. The other reviews say why much better than I can, but I just had to add to the adoration</review_text>
I love EVERY track on Ne-Yo's CD "in my own words!" Next let me thank Ne-Yo for bringing true R&B back to the industry! I dont consider songs about cheating on your bf/gf/husband/wife R&B. R&B is supposed to be about love - thats why people call them slow LOVE songs. And from 2001 - 2005 new slow love songs didn't exist. I ended up listenin to the same songs from da 90's over and over until I got so tired of them, and was fortunate to be lucky enough for my radio station (that plays mostly rap: a genre of music I dont like) to play "so sick" by Ne-Yo. It was a great song. This is literally the FIRST and only R&B album that I never have the urge to use the fast forward feature to get to the next song! Ne-Yo's lyrics are strictly romantic and sweet too! He is a lyrical genius. His voice is soothing and melodic. Most R&B albums obviously have rap tracks or rushed R&B songs as filler to probably meet the deadline or get the CD out as fast as possible and reducing the enjoyability of the CD, but THIS album has ALL songs that are great. All of the tracks on this album are great, but here are the ones that are SUPERB:1. So sick - 9/10 (would be a 10 if it wasn't played over and over and with so many different versions. Although I can still listen to it over and over2. When you're mad - 9/10 (for those guys who like the look on girls faces when they get mad. Maybe for Michelle Rodriguez fans. :) )3. Get Down Like that 10/10 (both versions) (I call it "dont get down like that") (This song is for the guys that are completely faithful like me) (if you're not a player, and proud of being faithful, this is da song for you)4. Sexy Love - 10/10 (great song. um hmmm.. what can i say about THIS one about its lyrics?.... oh yes.... this song is for the guys who have a girl and when she touches them, it just feels like.... Magic.)This is da only CD dat ever deserved 5 stars by me, the only reason I gave OTHER R&B albums 5 stars is cuz i took into consideration: there was no R&B album that existed that had NOTHING but good tracks, and most had poorly done upbeat song</review_text>
I just loved this album the songs really related to my life. It was nice to see that there was personal experience involved while writing the songs</review_text>
Can't say enough about how great this record is. It still stands the test of time by remaining relevant. "Summerland," and "Mission Man" are my personal favs, but the whole album deserves raves</review_text>
This album was so good to hear when it came out. I like every song on here but my favorites are "Still Dre","The Watcher","Xxplosive","What's The Difference" and "Forget About Dre. Those are my favorites but there a lot of other songs that people will like. Recommend this album highly to rap fans. Buy this album you have nothing to loose because its Dre one of the best producers in the game right now so click on add to cart and be happy you hearing this classic</review_text>
Not speaking or understanding Tibetian, didn't lessen the joy of being totally absorbed by this wonderful movie, and the music from this soundtrack is the reason why. It guides you like a sherpa, gently leading you along the high trails, powerfully pulling you to the heights of ever thinning air. You are at once engulfed in the Tibetian life, you live the experience through the deep gutteral chants, singing bowls, and drums</review_text>
Guys, if you've got feelings for Tim, you're gonna love this one. If you know anything about honest to God country music, this is what you look for. This guy is extremely good and his music fits</review_text>
Great trip down memory lane.  Had forgotten that Paul Davis had recorded some of the songs.  "I Still go Crazy" is one of the best songs ever</review_text>
O.G. Ron C did a good job Screwin' & Choopin'. He really gave the rest of tha U.S. a taste of Texas (Tha Lone Star State). Tha best time to listen to any screwed & chopped music [SwishaHouse, Chamillitary, D.S.R.(Dirty South Rydaz)] is you are throwed (drunk) off that syrup. This was a good thing that O.G. Ron C did, Choppin' Boyz Up & Not Sloppin' Boyz Up. CHAMILLITARY MAN!!</review_text>
Oh! Boy! how things have change..years ago i invested thousands of dollars in a killer Dvd-audio/Super-audio multichannel surround System.This was done to capture the glory of the state of the art music mastered in the wide frequency response of 24/192kHz.Example ..Donald Fagen "Morph The Cat" dvd-audio disc..this dics captures the dedicated genuine glory of dvd-audio multichannel done superbly.Today we have the so call Bonus Dvd Audio disc packaged together for one low rediculous price only to be disappointed  with the amature quality of the 5.1 mix.If you are an audiophile like me and know the difference between the dedicated Dvd-audio disc sold between $14.99-$29.99 and the so call Bonus Dvd Disc...you will understand why iam so irritated at this new phenomenon.Today most good recievers can play back stereo recorded music in "all channel Stereo/multichannel stereo surround which sounds superior to the so call DVD 5.1 disc.The stereo version of the Beatles LOVE album is worthy of my expensive system and is highly recommended</review_text>
I will state first off that I'm one of those hipster snobs who dismiss Pearl Jam's debut album, "Ten," as the whining chart-whoring pseudo-anthemizing overpriced-flannel-flying watered-down-grungifying crowd-surfer-pandering piffle that it is.  If you think that makes me inherently biased (unbalanced?) this review probably won't be "helpful" to you, and you can move on the other 250 or so reviews.  If you decide to hear me out, I promise to be fair, 'cause even though I may be a hipster snob, I can't deny to myself the sweet rockin' going on in "Vitalogy."This album represents one the best meeting points between what was then called "underground" or indie rock and the "classic" rock mainstream.  Thus the production quality is raw when it needs to be but polished enough so it doesn't sound sloppy.  Ballads like "Better Man" and its companion piece "Nothingman" are clearly influenced by Neil Young and even "Nebraska"-era Springsteen--they're sincere & emotional but not mushy & sentimental.  "Not For You," with it's lyrics about how Eddie Vedder's small table has been invaded by uninvited hordes, is a none-too-subtle complaint about Pearl Jam's status as "millions served" rock gods and a longing for the more stripped-down aesthetic of punk.  That, of course, is more directly the point of "Spin The Black Circle," an old-fashioned punk barnstormer that sounds like a close cousin to SST-era Husker Du.  For Vedder, the joys of vinyl are that they seem "warmer"--a symbol of "tradional values" in a rock 'n' roll sense: independence, hard work and homespun crafts are better than the shiny, sterile corporate plastic of compact discs.  Never mind the fact that vinyl was just as much a product of corporate culture; Vedder just feels a pleasing wave of childhood nostalgia cradling a 12" record sleeve in his arms and watching a needle bury itself into those mysterious black grooves.Pearl Jam may be in many ways traditionalists who long for the simple joys of just playing for the kids without corporate interference.  On the other hand, the Big Corporate Evil has enabled them to reach a huge audience, which in turn helped them finance the elaborate packaging of "Vitalogy"--it's designed as a salute/satire of a very old hardcover book advising youths on good physical/mental/spiritual hygeine.  The album, therefore, aims to strike a balance between the fondly-remembered rock stars of the band's own youth (the Who, Neil Young) and the more recent indie-punks that re-sparked their interest in the Power of Rock (Fugazi, Sonic Youth)--hence the  title.The album is perhaps unnecessarily padded out with unfinished or noveltly tracks like "Bugs" and "Hey Foxymophandlemama That's Me," even though they're intended to give the album a looser and more light-hearted feel.  Still, some of the songs that work the best are gloomy ones like "Last Exit" and the somewhat proggy sea chanty "Tremor Christ" (whose title I dearly hope is meant more as metaphor than an endorsement).  Even though it's uneven, "Vitalogy" is the work of a self-reliant, even ornery band that's in full control of their ideas--even the bad ones.  It's also not their fault that they influenced the likes of true bottom-feeding whores like Stone Temple Pilots and Matchbox 20.</review_text>
I love this Pretenders album and Chrissie always rocks but I love the songwriting skill of Billy Steinberg & Tom Kelley.  They wrote "Love Colours", "Night in my Veins" and the hit "Stand by You".  Her follow-up to this, "VIVA! EL AMOR!" also contains three tracks written by them.  I purchased this long after its release and was glad I did.  Steinberg Kelley write memorable hooks and good lyrics with interesting chord changes.  Something not all big names can do on their own and Chrissie wisely is aware of this.</review_text>
This cd has so much going on and going for it - it's one of the number one releases this year for jazz fans.  Lee Ritenour is one of those guitarists who sculpted much of the west coast evolutions in jazz during the 80's and you can hear why people followed his flavor on these tracks.  He's never sounded better and the musicians who contributed with him on this cd are tight and magnificent in their own right."Blue in Green" is one of my favorite jazz compositions by Miles Davis and Ernie Watts on tenor sax more than does it justice.  "Ocean Ave." is as breezy and beachy as I think it's meant to be.My favorite tracks are easily "She Walks this Earth" (Ivan Lins' vocals are bossa nova beautiful), "Blue in Green" and predictably for me "Papa was a Rolling Stone" with powerful, crystal clear, unique trumpet by Chris Botti and soulful, rhythmic vocals by Kenya Hathaway and Grady Harrell. I went looking for that track because I am transfixed by Chris Botti's trumpet and what I found was a remarkable cd in its entirety.  Happy me.  ;</review_text>
Bone Thugs is always keepin it real. This album gots good production and of course them good lyrics. I love the beats on this album. The songs I got in my top 5 are straight bangers no doubt. This double album is a classic by Bone Thugs. You should cop this album. All tracks are 4-5 minutes long, each emcee spittin there verses, good stuff. Definately check out this album now!!!My Top 5 Songs1.Handle The Vibe2.Look Into My Eyes3.Body Rott4.It's All Mo' Thug5.Ain't Nothin Change</review_text>
Feinstein is in love with the Gershwins and that passion is never made clearer than in Pure Gershwin.  Michael's love affair with Ira's lyrics, his reckless abandon to the light-hearted spirit of the familiar -- and  lesser known --phrases, more than makes up for the less polished vocal  production in this early album.  In fact, it is that very element that  sells these songs as I've never heard them elsewhere.  Michael pulls out  all stops, embracing the less-than-lily-white additional verses of  &quot;Embraceable You&quot;, with the unbridled passion of a first time  lover.  His duet with Rosie Clooney arrouses my curiosity about the movie  in which this unknown number made its debut.  What a delightful approach  Michael demonstrates throughout....  Oh, to be that young and exuberant  about life, love and music again</review_text>
It would be easy to say that this is the single greatest performance of the Mahler Eighth ever recorded; I believe it is. But it would be difficult to say that and have it mean something, because after experiencing this colossal achievement, the competition (including, alphabetically, Abbado, Bernstein, Chailly, Haitink, Horenstein, Kubelik, Nagano, Olson [Colorado Mahlerfest], Solti, and Tennstedt, among others) suddenly seemed far less impressive than they once had. What sets this Mahler Eighth so far apart from virtually every other is its sense of ecstasy; of a transcendent vision being communicated, of a religious fervor. Mahler had an extraordinary plan in putting together what he considered his most important work, such that he could bring us to the brink and say, "There. It's out there. You can't see it, but you can divine it" (and call "it" what you will: "God" or "Love" or some all-embracing power outside of ourselves). Most performances miss the mark, then, in one of two ways: by remaining resolutely earthbound or by trying to capture that vision in terms we can understand. The problem, of course, is that if we can understand it, it's no longer a vision, it's something mundane. In the closing pages of Wit's extraordinary (and that word, as well as any other, hardly begins to do it justice) performance you become aware of that vision existing just beyond your comprehension. You know it's there only because you're willing to take that leap of faith. And that's what I mean when I say he brings the piece a sense of religious fervor. There is nothing dogmatic about the kind of religion I'm referring to here.So let's look at the basic components of the performance, element by element:The sound: Spectacularly natural and all-encompassing. The soloists emerge from the overall sonic image like members of the orchestra, and the chorus, orchestra, and organ blend to perfection.The soloists: To a letter the finest group I have ever heard. There's a distinctly Slavic sound that seems altogether appropriate given Mahler's Bohemian roots, and a refreshing lack of self-importance. No operatic grandstanding here. And for the first time ever I felt as though I was missing something by not following the words (no libretto is provided, though it is available online and can be found easily enough elsewhere) because everyone sounded like they cared dearly about what they were singing. They weren't going through the motions, making pretty sounds. They had something imperative to communicate and wanted us to know it. To be honest, part II has often bored me to tears (with Chailly's performance being particularly offensive in this regard) but here I was literally on the edge of my seat throughout, impatient to hear what (and who) came next. And throughout it all, so importantly, there was a sense of spiritual ascent from beginning to end.The choruses: Easily the best I've ever heard. The way they rip into "Hostem repellas longius" with their shrieks in the great double fugue of part I is unforgettable, and the fugue itself, which has never reminded me more of the "rabble" section from the first movement of Mahler's Third, literally had my spine tingling throughout its entire course. That's nothing. I got chills right at the beginning of the Chorus Mysticus and six and a half minutes later they had not abated! I have NEVER experienced anything like that before. Ever. And I don't just mean while listening to music.The conductor: What can I say? He holds the symphony together with a tautness and logic that nobody ever credited this work with having before. How? I have no idea, but when the start of part II doesn't jar, as it usually does, you know you're in for something special. Maybe it's because the orchestral prelude there seems faster than usual, or because he finds so much inwardness in the first part (the first entry of the soloists, for instance, is so raptly caressing).The orchestra: While they don't have the "Mahler sound" that the Concertgebouw or Vienna Philharmonic may produce, there's an earthiness (but never sloppiness) that sets them far apart from the bleached, sterile sound of too many American orchestras that make Mahler sound not like Mahler.To sum up, then, I could not speak for an hour after hearing this recording, and still burst into tears at the mere thought of it, especially those radiant, visionary, and extraordinary closing pages. Record of the year; record of the century! It crowns not merely my Mahler collection but an entire lifetime of listening to great music.</review_text>
If you would have told me last year that I would own an album of piano solos I probably would have laughed in your face. While I enjoy several kinds of music, most of my favorites are in the classic rock and alternative genres. The reason I bought this is my wife and I are having a baby in December and our birthing class instructor played and reccomended Brickman as a popular choice for relaxation music and her personal favorite. I bought &quot;No Words&quot; and &quot;Simple Things&quot; mainly for their absence of singing and something to play while she is in labor. I have been listening to them nearly every night since we received them while browsing the internet or doing chores around the house. It really is amazing music that is very calming and relaxing. He definitely pours everything he has into his piano and the accompanying instruments and background is fabulous. Everything everyone else has stated in their reviews is right on as well. I would definitely reccomend not only this CD but Jim Brickman in general if you are looking for a nice relaxing getaway</review_text>
this is without doubt the most beautiful, moving song i have ever heard.  i cry every time i listen to it.  i will ask my family to have it played at my funeral.  the lyrics and symbolism are born of emotional genius.  the solo vocalist and the instrumentation are flawless.  this selection is the hope diamond of contemporary music</review_text>
this album is a great representation of what spoon is about. great music along with fantasticly written lyrics provide a feeling of sheer uphoria to one's ears. spoons sound is somewhat like cake but different in ways as well. they are a very good band that should be getting more cred than what they are getting. some of my faves on this cd include mathematical mind, the two sides of monsieur valentine, sister jack and i turn my camera on. i would strongly recommend this cd to anyone that like alternative rock. definately money well spent</review_text>
This was the second tribe album i bought i was gonna get this cd before i got the low end theory but they didn't have it at the best buy i went to. I like this cd a lot but i like midnight mauraders more because phife got some more rap time and i like phife a little more than tip. Most people like tip more but i like phifes style a lot. All like all the songs but the most is luck of lucein, afterhours, foot prints, i left my wallet in el segundo, bonita applebum, can i kick it, rhythm, go ahead in the rain, and description of a fool. Man i pratically like all the tracks but the most remeberable. I wish they were still going to make another cd but its just tip coming out with another solo cd. The only complaint is that phife was only in a couple songs. This is one of my favorite rap albums with the jazz and r and b mix with the lyrics which makes this a absoulte must have for any hip hop fan is part of the tribe classics.</review_text>
The sounds were very convincing, I actually felt like I was there even my daughter thought it was really storming outside since I have a Subwoofer and was able to control the thunder intensity (all this was at night) the only thing missing was the strobe light to add to the lightnig effect. It does relax you and allows you to destress. There are other types of stress management cd's out there but if you like the outdoors and your'e not able to get away then this is what may work for you.Johnny Lina</review_text>
This album is absolutely fantastic! Paul and the band are incredibly tight and sound great together. Paul sounds very loose and like he's having a lot of fun - not as serious as some live shows I've heard.The songs focus mostly on his solo records, with some Jam and Style Council mixed in (all on disc two). Wisely, only five of the twenty three tracks are from "As Is Now" and they're the uptempo ones - it's not a hard sell by Yep Roc to make you buy that album if you don't already have it.The extended jams for "Porcelain Gods/Broken Stones," "In The Crowd" and "Foot Of The Mountain" (one of my favorite solo tracks) all are focused and don't wander so they keep your attention. The crowd is energetic and into the show and are very appreciative when the Jam and Style Council classics get into the mix (although the sing-along to the album closing "Town Called Malice" is pretty lame).I haven't listened to the somewhat difficult to find "Live Wood" concert disc for a while to give a good comparison. However, since "Catch-Flame" covers all his solo discs instead of only "Paul Weller" and "Wild Wood," this is a more balanced collection. Highly recommended!personal highlights:Blink And You'll Miss ItUp In Suze's RoomPorcelain Gods/I Walk On Gilded SplintersIn The CrowdFoot Of The MountainThat's EntertainmentBroken StonesLong Hot SummerShout To The To</review_text>
But a good debut album. This is when I felt proud knowin Ja was from ny. No radio friendly s*** here just street for the most part. But i guess when you were never really gangsta in the first place you can't keep talkin about it, which is why i guess he changed his style. Now the subject i wanna hit. Has anyone noticed that guy named progressive? Why does amazon allow goofs who hate hip hop trash our culture? And everytime I turn around its some damn rocker/junkie hippie. Last time i checked Rhythm and melody was part of music. I dont hear none of those when i through on heavy metal or rock. I'm tired of our music bein trashed. You know what im a go trash one of they "artist" right now</review_text>
This album is by far on the greatest recent live recordings.  Sheryl Crow demonstrates her influence and talent by putting on an all star show with some of the biggest names in music history.  Sheryl shines on her own, singing some of her great hits, but it's the duets that really make the album.  My least favorite has to be the Dixie Chicks just because I can't appreciate the country flare they bring to "Strong Enough" but it's still a great version.  Chrissie Hynde, one of the album's highlights, brings intense attitude to "If It Makes You Happy", still one of my favorite Sheryl songs.  Stevie Nicks remains Stevie Nicks, giving more than enough emotion and flare to her own "Gold Dust Woman."  Sarah McLachlan's usually soft voice comes out strong on "The Difficult Kind" and compliments Sheryl's quite nicely.  My favorite rendition has to be Eric Clapton and Sheryl together on Cream's "White Room", the rock-out moment on the album.  The show is complete when all the guests return to belt out Bob Dylan's "Tombstone Blues" and close the show with a definite BANG</review_text>
I won't say to everybody this greatest hits is highly recommended. Being that I never heard all of her albums, so a true fan may feel like some songs is missin'. However for me, who is just really startin to seriously get into pop is somewhat satisfied with these and this is a 5 star collection to me. Some of the tracks I love, a couple I don't like at all and the rest I just like.My favorite ones are in order;EroticaRay of LightBeautiful StrangerThe power of goodbyeDeeper and DeeperThe prodution is excellent and I love the vocals. If your new to Madonna, my opinion would be to start here. But a true fan can give me lessons.</review_text>
First of all Bob Dylan is certainly not for everyone. However, if his style is up your alley this is a classic. You can turn on the radio and hear all those classic songs of his like "lay lady lay" or "like a rolling stone" to name a couple. Planet Waves is the type of album where the sum of the songs come together wonderfully. This is probably my favorite Dylan album and I have all the "classics" like Blonde on Blonde, Blood on the Tracks, Highway 61 revisited. ect. I'd recommend this to any Dylan fan</review_text>
So, Incubus rocks no matter who you are or which of their albums is your favorite.  Plainly put, this album was not my favorite of theirs.  It's good.  It's really good.  But if you're expecting Incubus good, you'll be slightly disappointed</review_text>
Even though Gary Allen is a country singer, he rocks as an artist!  He has a vein of rock mixed in with his deep country voice.  This man's voice is so smooth, he could melt butter along with any woman's heart.  Guys will like him too, but he's a crooner, his ballads touch women (sigh!) and make men want to emulate him.  I enjoyed every song on this CD, but my personal favorites are: Tough little boys, and Songs about rain, both beg to be sang along with</review_text>
It is good for old Eric Gale fans to be able to purchase thiscd. It will bring back many memories. It will also remind youof how great a guitar player he was. I am grateful that I'vehad a chance to own many recordings that he has played on. Payclose attention to She is my lady and morning glory. This is amust have cd.        jaye priceBeltsville, md.</review_text>
I have seen Phantom on stage twice and regularly listen to this cast recording.  It is a different approach to the classic Leroux novel; one that is gentler and more romantic, but still intense and passionate.  The lyrics and music are excellent.Even if you are an ALW/PTO fan, don't miss this production if it plays nearby.</review_text>
I read about Lila Downs' new CD, La Cantina, in Victor Cruz- Lugo's article entitled, "Sweet Sorrow," published in the June-July 2006 issue of Hispanic Magazine (page 76).It is an honor and a pleasure to offer these few reflections on Lila Downs' new CD, La Cantina:1.  The CD cover is awesome, a beautiful and colorful work of art illustrating  Lila in a pensive and contemplative mid-air pause with her guitarra ready to rock.  It strikes me as an example of the rising feminine in our time, awakening the historically-oppressed feminine from its slumber and into an alto canto of unstoppable and celebratory song.2.  Each track is a lively composition of Mexican corridos and sones impregnated with Lila's lovely voice that makes me feel so proud to be mexicano-chicano-hualahuisense and a member of our precious universal human family.3.  I first was introduced to Lila Downs and her musical talent when I enrolled in writer Juan Felipe Herrera's legendary Manikrudo Summer Arts class at Cal State Fresno in 2000.  Juan Felipe invited her to our class room and she impressed us all with her down-to-earth talented voice.  Later that night we all saw her in concert at the Tower Theatre in Fresno and I've been a fan of her work ever since.4.  This new CD is indeed a delightful experience.  I appreciate that she moved into the corrido, son, etc. genres which makes me appreciate her music so much more.  It has so much more appeal to me without bordering on the commercial and superficious.  It's authentic and retains its articistic musical integrity.  I think that this is a hallmark that we can expect from all of Lila's work.  She is a true artist.  I've always appreciated her darker and earthier songs in her first two CDs, however, this new stride into popular folk corridos is a movement into another aspect of the heart and soul of the mexicano experience.5.  I am very impressed with Lila's voice and how it has matured since the summer of 2000.  There seems to be more color and flair in it and definitely mucho corazon. Ahua! Her solos in "Yo ya me voy," have my soul spinning to the outer edges of infinity.As Victor Cruz-Lugo writes, "Through it all, Downs' powerful alto voice cuts a path into the deepest pits of your heart, tears something out of there and somewhow we as listeners wind up asking her for more of the same."This is my favorite of Lila's repertoire.  It is my opinion that those who purchase this CD will not be disappointed.  Enjoy!</review_text>
If you're a Strummer fan who is an historical completist then you'll want this disc.   Also, there are some really good tunes on here for anyone, particularly Joe's "Keys to Your Heart".  Some of the live material here is high quality and some is not.  This is likely not a CD you will listen to over and over again as you would artists who are fresh.  But, I'm just glad this finally appeared on disc as I've always wanted to hear it and as a Joe fanatic, I had to have it.  There's moments here that sound like a rough draft of JS and the Mescaleros, but also moments of pure rock 'n roll circa mid 70's with some great guitar solos.  If Joe had not been where UK punk started after this band there's no telling what he would have done but you can be sure he'd have kept playing in a band.  I'm a huge Clash and Strummer fan, but I rate this 4 stars more for its historical significance than for the actual quality and uniqueness of the content</review_text>
Wonderful cd the music brings back a lot of childhood memories! A must have for those who are looking for a cd that includes Neil Diamond's top hits.</review_text>
I bought this out of a cut rack for $3.99. It sat in my CD tower for at least 5 years before I ever really listened to it.I couldn't stand the way it sounded over my stereo and I came close to trading it.I brought it to work and put my headphones on and it sounds like a completely different album.I really like the whole experience. I'm lucky I brought it up here-it was going nowhere at home but I'm playing it a couple of times a day over my headphones. I don't know anything about this band,I bought it on a whim,but I'd reccommend this album and I may follow up on this band</review_text>
There is a reason why Styx was the first musical act to have 4 triple platinum albums in row!  Find out why. They are a unique band, with their own uncatagorizable style and sound.  Not hard rock, but can rock. Not pop, but catchy melodies and great three part harmony.  Not art rock, but themed concepts in their writing and dramatic tempo changes and crescendos in their music.  It is probably true that Lady was the first power ballad, though Styx was not credited for it.  Lady paved the way for other rock bands to showcase their softer sides.   Perhaps Styx was not always successful in their attempts, but they took chances artistically and musically and should be given props for doing so.  Every song on this CD is great; however the two that stand out for me are Too Much Time On My Hands and Suite Madame Blue.  Most people who have spent time in neighborhood bar will would likely agree that Too Much Time On My Hands is witty, funny, and true.   Suite Madame Blue a song which is a metaphor for the United States is simply One of the Greatest Rock Songs Ever!! The lyrics of Suite Madame Blue are as powerful as the music, and this song contains all the elements which made Styx great</review_text>
this is quite a sharp turn from francine's previous album (40 on a fall day)... whereas the last album was closer sonically to frontman clayton scoble's work in poundcake, this time around it's quieter, subtler, sweeter and sadder. make no mistake, this is a break-up album. even those songs that make no mention of breaking up leave you with that cold, lonely, hug-craving feeling only the best break-up albums can.the mood will draw you in and keep you listening, but after a few listens it's the songs you'll fall in love with. ahh, the songs. they're densely packed with chord changes, odd but appealing lyrics, and unexpected instrumentation. they're hooky without being obvious (a francine specialty). this was my favourite album of 2003, and i still listen to it pretty often these days.best tracks: this sunday's revival, silver plated 606, novelty, 13 years.best lyric: "read a year old mail / now you should've told me / i've been repeating myself / only far less convincingly</review_text>
I am very satisfied with the 1999 CD by Prince.  It was in top condition when it arrived.  I would purchase again from the seller.thank</review_text>
I'm biased, because I loved the movie and adore the book.Gregson-Williams does an outstanding job here (before this, I was most familiar with his score work on Metal Gear Solid videogames).The music is extremely touching and magical.  The "Evacuating London Score" (from the scene in the train station) tugs at the heartstrings.  And the "Battle Score" brings back the images of the dynamic battle at the movie's climax.  One song that's missing is the 1940s jazz song played in the movie when the kids are playing hide and seek.  Other than that absence (probably due to copyright restrictions), this is an excellent CD.As for the "Bonus" DVD - I probably wouldn't purchase it if I had a second chance.  It's got some nice gallery art of movie stills and concept art.  There is only one trailer, and it is not the very first one released, which opens with the kids at the mansion and really gets the blood pumpin' with its intro of the wardrobe.  There are also behind-the-scenes interviews I haven't watched yet, but I wonder if they'll appear again when the movie DVD is released.</review_text>
Loreena has a pure talent for weaving melody music and words together. Her song The Highwayman is absolutely astounding to be able to put the old poem into music melody and verse is quite amazing</review_text>
I saw Midlake at festival recently and had never heard of them. The live set was strong enough to convince me to order some albums and I'm now a solid fan. The opening track, Roscoe, reminds me a bit of Adrian Belew, a bit of XTC and a whole lot of Midlake themselves. It's like suddenly realizing how Coldplay should sound. The music is layered and atmospheric with a bit of an eels feel. Midlake is definitely their own band, for all the influences I'm throwing out. They make the sort of music that feels old, like your favorite album you lost long ago. Try 'Roscoe' or 'Young Bride' for an indication of their style. If you like either of those, you need to buy the album.</review_text>
Everyone has their favorite Beatle. Some people love to complain about Paul's solo music, comparing it to John's. The fact is that each of the Beatles had their own style, and together they had a magical symbiosis. Separately they each pursued a solo career that simply solidified what we already knew.So Paul's music is light hearted? Maybe even silly? Sure, but if you are like me and enjoy each Beatle for what they brought to the group, then this is a wonderful album. No you won't find deep soul searching here, just fun! And fun is what this album has in abundance.So if you want to curse Paul for his naivet, don't buy this album. If you loved the Beatles, and enjoyed each one for their individual talent, this is a fun solo album.In my humble opinion it is Paul's best solo album, as he really spreads his "Wings" and you can hear the sense of freedom coming through loud and clear. Later albums seem to become too engineered, and never seem to have the same energy that this album has.</review_text>
At first I didn't think there was enough new material on this soundtrack to make it worthwhile, but the four previously unreleased songs are so completley wonderful, especially &quot;All I want to know&quot; and &quot;Heather&quot;.  This is an essential for any Stephin Merritt fan</review_text>
Del spits brilliant lyrics and produces excellently... the beats of songs merge together as tracks change... El-P makes a cameo... Casual makes a cameo... Prince Paul produces a track... get this album</review_text>
I rarely write reviews, but I need to comment on how fantastic this compilation is.  I have a four-year-old and an eighteen-month-old, and this CD is in heavy rotation at our house.  My husband and I love the music at least as much as they do -- it's stylish and sets a great mood as we're making dinner and doing dishes.  The kids love it too, needless to say.  My four-year-old's favorites are Three Blind Mice (she loves when the farmer's wife squeaks that she'll give back the tails) and the final track by Peggy Lee (where she says the word *poop*, as in "party poop" -- endless laughter ensues).  Ella Fitzgerald's A-Tisket, A-Tasket and Chew, Chew Your Bubblegum are priceless.  All in all, I highly recommend this CD -- everyone will be happy to hear it again and again</review_text>
Pinback BLOWS me away.  I consider my taste in music to be very diverse, with a tendency to love obscure indie rock-pop, from the last three decades (talk talk, split enz to elliot smith and death cab).  Pinback delivers some of the best, most consistent music I've heard in YEARS.  I started with Summer in Abaddon and was weak in the knees, then I acquired their debut album and could barely stand...and now, Blue Screen Life has about knocked the breath right out of me.  I haven't gotten through the entire back catalog because I can't stop listening to the three albums I have in my hands.  Words cannot express how fascinating this band is - intricate & complicated with a simple, straightforward delivery.  Their transitions are SICK.  They put their contemporaries (death cab, the shins, the killers) to SHAME.  I love all of the aforementioned bands, but Pinback slaughters them in delivering well conceived, perfectly executed, diversified albums that you can listen to from front to back, over & over.  How many albums can you say that about?  They are heavenly.  The standouts are XIY, Boo, Concrete Seconds, Bbtone, Prog, Pene... oh, screw it - every song is GREAT!</review_text>
Sam Moore's new CD is a welcome return to the roots of soul.  This CD has got IT!  Sam's voice is superb and the duets he does with his guests are wonderful.  I'm not a fan of country music so I was a bit fearful of what Wynona and Travis Tritt would do with Sam.  Wow!  Are they ever good!  Wynona's got it.  I'm going to listen to more of her now.The musicians are the best!  I thought I could hear that wonderful touch of Earth Wind and Fire on some of the numbers so I went searching the notes.  Sure enough--there is Reggie Young--the wonderful Earth Wind and Fire trombonist!  Go Reggie!Billy Preston is wonderful on "You are So Beautiful" as is the accompanying guitar by Eric Clapton.  This is a musician's CD--quality all the way.I have had the great pleasure of seeing Sam Moore and Billy Preston  in person (with Bowzer's Doo Wop Party--thank god for Bowzer, bringing back all these wonderful artists) and they were wonderful.  I'd love to see even more of Sam Moore.  Thanks to Randy Jackson for putting this together.  This is a class-act.</review_text>
When I bought this I played it on repeat for about 45 hours.  Different versions than on the album (I think it's their demo).  This version of Modern Age is amazing.  Definitely worth buying</review_text>
I have a few hundred surf CDs and I would have to say thet this CD is my favorite! My next favorite is their new CD called "Headin' Out". They have the reverb and the composition that just makes all of the songs fantastic. If you like instrumental surf you will love this CD! Buy it you won't be sorry</review_text>
As a fan of both celtic traditional and bluegrass music I was wary of a CD claiming to be a hybrid - too often it means an unsatisfactory compromise where original flavours become watered down and insipid. I need not have worried - Tim O'Brien has produced one of the most amazing and rewarding musical journeys I've followed for some time. Not only do the players from the two traditions blend instinctively and harmoniously but the tracks , mostly songs, are marvellous vehicles for new and exciting directions. There are superb performances all round, vocally from O'Brien with guests Paul Brady, Maura O'Connell, Kathhy Mattea, Del McCoury etc and musicians Altan, Frankie Gavin, Jerry Douglas, Earl Scruggs, Seamus Egan and a host of others and the sound is fresh, acoustic and vital, requiring no production gimmicks or effects. Standout songs for me personally are &quot;Mountaineer is Always Free&quot;, &quot;Lost Little Children&quot;, &quot;Wandering&quot; and &quot;John Riley&quot; although there is not a weak track on the CD. It is obvious that for Tim O'Brien this has been a labour of love. If you like acoustic music, from any tradition, either side of the Atlantic, you'll love it. Several of my friends have bought it on my recommendation and agree it is brilliant</review_text>
NWA was an original rap group and with that being said, this is definitely a must have album for rap lovers. Along with Public Enemy, NWA christened their genre with hard core lyrics and tight bass beats. Although I don't agree with some of their lyrics, one would not expect this white kid to fully understand their view on life. Anyways, buy this album, I recommend it. Keep it away from the kiddies though</review_text>
Of course, no jazz musician can pack the energetic wallop that Dizzy could.  His trumpet can only be described as HOT, and hearing his music makes you think of people dancing their legs off with garbage cans burning all around and smoke in the air.   This man's music has LIFE in it. Unfortunately, the REAL energy to Dizzy is in his Latin Jazz work, and a more complete compilation of that style would be the Compact Jazz series. Ken Burns' collection here is more versatile, but just not as lively as Dizzy's music can be.  Proceed with caution</review_text>
While not dissimilar to other excellent acts such as Coldplay, Keane, and Pete Yorn, Travis have distinguished themselves as a band with their own unique style and sound. This, their 2nd album, is the best of their music: melodic throughout, with catchy tunes, solid lyrics, and tremendous guitar work that captures the listener from the first chords of 'Sing' to the fade-out from 'The Humpty Dumpty Love Song'.If you buy an album once you know three or four or more of its songs are excellent, then I confidently recommend The Invisible Band to you.Rating each song individually for one's ipod:1. Sing, Side, The Cage, Afterglow and the Humpty Dumpty Love Song are each worthy of four to five stars2. Pipe Dreams, Flowers in the Window, Safe, Follow the Light, and Indefinitely are three to four star songs3. The balance are two to three stars each. The only poor effort is probably "Last Train", which is too plodding relative to its counterpartsThe Invisible Band is basically a healthy mix of folksy, hopeful songs mixed with just the right amount of melancholy. Nowhere is this better reflected than in 'The Humpty Dumpty Love Song', which defines this mix perfectly. While this is the best of the album, the rest is well worth listening to repeatedly.  Highly recommended</review_text>
I really think it's Simon's best.  This, and perhaps (in a very different style) "Paul Simon."  I'm just listening to it again after several years...the melodies are intricate, the words are vivid and allusive, the range is astounding.  Graceland has a wonderful rock-style going on, but I really think this is my favorite.  I know a lot of non-Simon fans who love this one album.  It's just fantastic</review_text>
Blue Note was on the mark to re-release this classic. Tina Brook's style of blues laced jazz is a sound that will bring joy to your soul. A must have CD for any jazz collection</review_text>
This CD is absolutely wonderful. I am in Australia so Strawberry Shortcake merchandise is not as readily available down here as it is in the USA, so you can imagine my daughters delight when this CD is being played.The songs are just gorgeous - I just wish they were a little longer.I thoroughly recommend this item to any little SS Fans.</review_text>
Comparing Gogol Bordello and JUF is like comparing apples and oranges. I have seen Gogol live more times than I have fingers and toes to count on. When I bought JUF I did not expect to hear anything remotely resembling a Gogol album. This is a dancehall album. You like it or you don't, but just remember it is a side project. It does not make any sense to compare it to other Gogol albums.Listen before you buy</review_text>
This CD brings back memories of the early 60's when Vince Martin and Fred Neil played at The Flick , The Coffee House, and the Hootenanny here in Miami.  I've had the LP forever.  Now that I'm getting the CD, I can listen in my car and remember seeing them perform live</review_text>
This is a fantastic holiday Christmas album. Doris Day's beautiful voice singing these terrific Christmas songs make for a beautiful sound that will bring all who listen years of enjoyment. A must have for those who enjoy hearing terrific Christmas music over the holidays</review_text>
THIS ALBUM IZ OFF DA FREAKIN CHAIN!!!!! GREAT MUSIC AND GRACE SLICK IZ THE BEST!!!!!!! THIS IS A MUST HAVE!!!!!!!!</review_text>
Sidney Bechet was one of the first real fathers of jazz. Burns puts together a great combination of early recordings. Jazz historions note Bechet as one of the only horn players that could keep up with Louis Armstrong. You have to include Bechet in your Jazz collection, and this one is as good as any</review_text>
Great compilation of songs from Massive Attack, all of their singles plus new never release songs. The videos are great and their new single 'live with me' is a great song (very sad video though). Includes new version/remix of 'I want you' with madonna. The combo is great you can own ALL of the videos, is a lot of fun to see the videos from blue lines until 100th window from the 90s all the way to the new single, the changes in the way they used to make music videos. There's even the first video with Tricky).A must have for any massive attach fan, and if you never heard from this band, you get the best of the best with this cds/dvd. Massive Attack is a band that had influenced a lot of artist from Bjork, Tricky, Madonna, Morcheeba, Portishead, UNKLE, etc.</review_text>
I love this album. Mc Lyte is one of the best female rappers.How can someone not like her rap</review_text>
I supposed I should not have been watching this movie when I was nine years old, but I remember seeing it several times via HBO. More importantly, my father bought the soundtrack and we used to listen to it over & over in the car. The songs stuck with me for years, and every know and then I'll hear something out of context and I'll be taken back to roadtrips with my family.  It's something that I won't think about for ages, but when I'm reminded of it, I can't believe I don't still have a copy of the soundtrack.I remember it had quiet and comforting songs mixed in with songs you could sing along too. It's perfect for driving and just having on in the background</review_text>
This soundtrack cd is the perfect compliment to the visionary film--Cater Burwells score is a pitch-perfect aural equivocation of the profound sadness and blithe absurdity on display,with his sense of minimalist suggestiveness and rich textural instincts shining bightly.Also an added bonus of the above-mentioned dream combination--Bartok's &quot;Allegro&quot;(I know diddly about classical music,but Bartok rocks!!),and a typically great Bjork song&quot;Amphibian&quot;(in two versions),that book-ends the album with an etherial,dream-like haze</review_text>
I would have to say that out of the countless bands i have heard over the past few years Into Eternity is one of the best and has one solid album here!! I think they have something a lot of bands do not have and the one cool thing about them is Tim Roth seems to give a real crud about his fans as he does guitar videos on his website to show you how you can break down his guitar riffs and that to me as a guitarist is so helpful (ive learned some of their songs this way) and this shows how he is not afraid to be the nicest guy and actually take that kind of time to be close and original to his fans.you just never see that these days. And the rest of this band has so much talent, Stu can scream like halford growl too and has a high vocal range and it makes them sound interesting. Plus jims drum work, how can anyone say this dude isnt one of the better drummers, he is so tight but can slow it down and tempo change very well. This album plain rocks,  It should be known as these guys were on Gigantour and rocked there too. Be cool if them and annihilator went on tour.  I have become very fond of them and hope they stick around and keep making great albums in a world overflowing with the same ole un-original bands that all sound the same!</review_text>
The progressive metal world better wake up and take note of this outstanding band that hails from Poland. These guys are a breath of fresh air with the oversaturated and stagnant progressive metal market that has developed over the past few years. So what do we get for our money you ask, a band comprising of well-schooled musicians, incredible song writing skills and the ability to weave so many different moods and time-passages into each song. There are a few scatterings of influences that aren't a major detraction from the overall mood of the album, namely Dream Theater, Pink Floyd, Porcupine Tree, Genesis and Anathema.The vocals are clean without a trace of an accent,however they get getting slightly gruff in places but this only compliments the smooth flow of the music.  The guitar work is outstanding and David Gilmour from Pink Floyd is a strong reference point here. The rhythm section is outstanding; especially the drumming and the keyboards give the album a fuller sound with out being too over powering. If you want to start 2007 on a good note then Riverside is a worthy investment for sure.</review_text>
Back when Blondie was being hailed as the biggest new-wave band in pop music by fans and critics alike, there were also just as many critics that quickly dismissed Blondie as "bubblegum pop," and one group that would never have staying power. But I think it's been observed enough how the group has had the last laugh. Parallel Lines helped establish Blondie as a serious music group and turned their cult following into commercial success. This album is also the first where Debbie Harry's voice gets sharpened with the sensibility of a sweet, vulnerable girl one minute to sultry and rapturous behind disco grooves the next. The album made punk, pop, and disco shake hands, which was a method unheard of in 1978. Songs like "Hanging on the Telephone," "Picture This," "Pretty Baby," and "Sunday Girl," have become irresitable pop gems, while "I Know But I Don't Know," and "Fade Away & Radiate," featuring a terrific guitar lick by Robert Fripp, are punk-driven classics. Last but not least are the two hits that are forever getting played on the classic rock stations of today in "One Way or Another," and "Heart of Glass." And how has Debbie Harry played out as lead singer after all these years? As Rolling Stone stated when this album was ranked #140 on their list of the 500 greatest albums of all time, "Madonna was surely watching."</review_text>
I loved this album.  Strangely enough I was introduced to the title song by Gray's Anatomy where I just had to find out who was singing that lead (Alice Russell).  The rest of the album is like the R& B music I grew up with.  Definitely worth a listen</review_text>
I've always written how the American NOW compilations do not even come close to the British ones, and my opinion has not since changed. NOW 20's track list, however, is solid and pretty good for the American series. It has mostly good rap songs (which can be sometimes rare in this series), great rock songs, and not an overload of mediocrities. I'll go in depth.1. Missy Elliott Feat. Ciara & Fatman Scoop - Lose Control...AA great rap song - Missy Elliott has a great style and her lyrics are actually understandable and enjoyable. Ciara is a nice addition to the song. Fatman Scoop's random screaming in the background wasn't essential, but it at least adds some energy to the track. The music's actually interesting and something different from everything else.2. Black Eyed Peas - Don't Phunk With My Heart...C+Their first album was stellar, and their second is as well. But this was one of the worst tracks on "Monkey Business" and did not deserve to become a single. Annoying, but not horrible.3. Pussycat Dolls Feat. Busta Rhymes - Don't Cha...A-A really good rap song - Busta's rapping is a good addition to the song, making this radio remix better than the original on the Pussycat Dolls' album, "PCD". A dangerously catchy chorus elevates this song to a pretty high grade.4. Rihanna - Pon de Replay...B+Pretty catchy, and a good party song. But it gets pretty irritating after a while. And the "dip it low and you pick it up slow" from the first verse directly copies from Christina Milian's "Dip it Low". That's so unoriginal, Rihanna!5. Ludacris Feat. Bobby Valentino - Pimpin' All Over the World...BGood music, but it's not much without the video, which was, by the way, partly shot in Africa.6. Bow Wow Feat. Ciara - Like You...BBow Wow's returning to the rap scene was really unneeded, but Ciara's chorus makes this song better than mediocre.7. Dem Franchize Boys Feat. Jermaine Dupri, Da Brat & Bow Wow - I Think They Like Me (Remix)...CThis song does not deserve the publicity, and I'm stunned why people like this. It's worse than mediocre, it's horribly irritating. And much of the song is bleeped out because the original is so dirty. Rap just isn't rap when it's edited, and this song is proof. But even without the editing I don't think this song has a chance. Annoying "yep"s in the background and mediocre rapping...just skip it already.8. Destiny's Child - Cater 2u...B-Mediocre for Destiny's Child. Actually pretty boring. But they have great voices.9. Lyfe Jennings - Must Be Nice...C+Mediocre.10. Natasha Bedingfield - These Words...AA great "new" artist who actually found success with this song a year earlier the US. Great songwriting about bad songwriting (if that makes any sense at all) and a good voice. Now I'm just wondering when her brother Daniel's going to release another "If You're Not the One".11. Kelly Clarkson - Behind These Hazel Eyes...A-The only American Idol who earned over twenty minutes of success, Kelly's finding massive success with her second album, and for a reason - she's got an awesome voice, and pulls off rock quite well. This song was brutally murdered by the radio, but that's why I've moved onto the remixes (not on this album).12. D.H.T. - Listen to Your Heart (Unplugged Version)...AThough Furios F.EZ's hard trance remix of this song is a lot better than this unplugged piano version, this amazing cover of the Roxette track deserved all the fame it got. Edmee's got a fantastic voice and this is a perfect song for her. Beautiful song also.13. Backstreet Boys - Just Want You To Know...A-The Backstreet Boys' newest album  must have been the #1 most unwanted comeback of all time (let's just hope N*Sync doesn't follow...*cringe* Justin Timberlake), but this is their best song. And this comes from someone hard to impress by the Backstreet Boys, but they pull off this rock song pretty well.14. Click 5 - Just the Girl...AA really good rock song which many can relate to.15. Franz Ferdinand - Do You Want To...BAtonal, but Franz Ferdinand has a good reputation, so I'll let it slide. But this is definitely evidence of a sophomore slump.16. Weezer - Beverly Hills...A+Unfortunately it was flattened, torn apart, and buried alive by the radios, so I will review it as it was still last summer when I first heard it. This song is amazing and the chorus is way too catchy to believe. But I don't need to write this, as most people already know.17. Fall Out Boy - Sugar We're Going Down...AAn amazing song, but it's only good if you can put up with songs where you can't understand what they're saying. Seriously, it took approximately six times looking up the lyrics to actually realize what's being said here. But the music is great, and this song overall is a pretty good rock track.18. Lifehouse - You & Me...A-An instant classic.19. Coldplay - Fix You...A+I've read mixed reviews about this song, but personally, I think its amazing. Following a vaguely similar buildup as Led Zeppelin's "Stairway to Heaven", this song just keeps you listening until the end. The rockout part at the end is magical.20. Keith Urban - You'll Think of Me...BIt's somewhat annoying that Keith's been on NOW albums consistently for a while but his songs aren't as popular as, say, Gretchen Wilson. I'm starting to think Keith's been put on these albums not for popular songs but just so a default country artist could be there. A good song, but it could've been replaced with something better in the Country department.So overall, this is a great selection of songs, some amazing, some decent, and some mediocre to bad. I'd suggest you buy this, as it's a good list of tracks.Overall, this album gets a B+.</review_text>
There are plenty of reasons to get this Dead Album.  One is the fact that this is probably the best recorded Psychedelic CD of all time.  It was the first Rock album recorded on a 16 track.  In fact it was rerecorded to take advantage of the technology.  The remaster is splendid.   Another good reason is the great bonus tracks.  Almost 80 minutes of dead for less than the price of driving your SUV to the record store.  Can you dig it</review_text>
This remasted disc is nice with the bonus tracks and spiffed up sound, but the only way top hear Aoxomoxoa is to find a original W7 (Warner Brothers-Seven Arts) green label vinyl pressing. The CD features the 1971 remix (like the 1989 CD) in which 1/3 of the backing has been stripped like Constanten's prepared backrounds on "What's Become Of The Baby", the extra drums and barbershop vocal on "Doin That Rag". St Stephen lost something in the remix as well. Anthem was remixed as well in 1972 but the band was wise to issue the 1968 mix on CD. No hidden goodies on this disc, but the bonus tracks are great</review_text>
This album is simply one of the coolest things around, and when I listened to it, it inspired me to a similar project using the same 'weaving and zoning from place to place' kind of method. What this basically is, are field recordings of various different indigenous and mainstream musics from mostly Indian/Middle Eastern/Oriental festivals; they are then mixed together nicely into one flowing peice. You get Indian gamelan, mussette accordion, vocal choruses, foreign tongue talking, and psychadelic bagpipes all in one 33 minute track, and then some. It's very trippy, and it hints at some kind of endless dream where we flow from place to place without reason. Get this for your own good</review_text>
Back in the 70's and 80's, I listened to a really great radio station, WSGS in Hazard, Kentucky. From my home in Flat Gap, Virginia, and anywhere in the region, it was well known that if you wanted real country music, you simply had to turn on WSGS. 100,000 watts of pure, monophonic country music. I'm not talking about the big hats of Nashville, or the gussied up ladies who pose as country singers these days. No, it was the real thing, including local and regional bluegrass, gospel, hiccup preachers, Loretta Lynn, Lefty Frizzel, Merle Haggard, Bill Monroe, Grandpa Jones, and countless others.When I listen to this Pattly Loveless release, I think she must have been listening too. It sounds just like the typical afternoon group of selections on old WSGS. Only better, because Patty is from our time, and seems to have that old time, mountain shout-it-out style much like many of those who came before. She reminds me a bit of Wilma Lee Cooper. What a voice!If you have never heard of these early country artists, and you like the way Patty does it up here, it would be good to go back and see where she learned all this great music from. This is the real thing</review_text>
Saw this fella in 'You see me laughin' on IFC.  Good straight ahead delta style blues.  This is the real deal</review_text>
With all the recent praise heaped on Smile, Orange Crate Art still remains largely under-recognized and under-appreciated. Sure, Smile was supposed to be this grand Copelandesque landscape of America, from Plymouth Rock to The Grand Cooley Dam. But for my money Brian and Van Dyke Parks did it so much better with Orange Crate Art. Having written, what everyone unanimously agrees to be the most California of all anthems, Fun Fun Fun, I Get Around and California Girls, Brian turns his attention to a California not of Hot Rods and Surf, but of sun drenched valleys rich with citrus and vine. Here Wilson and Parks celebrate and pay homage to the likes of Jack London and John Steinbeck. And if all this were not enough, we're treated to My Hobo Heart, a latter day Van Dyke Parks / Michael Hazelwood masterpiece. There's also the lovely Palm Tree & Moon, a dreamy little ode to a moonlit beach, territory not unfamiliar to Brian. And Summer In Monteray is so unabashedly nostalgic it would even make Clint Eastwood Blush. If you haven't become familiar with this so very underated collection yet, you really can't call yourself a Brian Wilson / Van Dyke Parks fan until you give this one a fair shot. You might even find yourself humming Sail Away or Hold Back Time while in the shower. I know I did</review_text>
I bought this CD six months ago because I am a Miami Vice fan.  I didn't expect it to be good, but it is wonderful.  &quot;In Dulce Decorum&quot; is incredible!  This is a hard-to-find CD.  You will love it!  I enjoy it more  with each playing</review_text>
For anyone who loves trumpet music as I do, this album is a must.  Wynton Marsalis has mastered twenty all-time favorite pieces with such brilliance, that no other trumpeteer comes near by comparison.  Opening with J. Clarke's, The King's March, Wynton proceeds to favor listeners with such baroque favorites as Purcell's Entrada from "The Indian Queen," J. Clark's The Prince of Denmark's March and J. Stanley's Trumpet Voluntary.  Fantastic selections from Bach, Mozart, and Haydn follow, with the album also including such delightful listening as The Last Rose of Summer, Carnival of Venisee, and Flight of the Bumblebee.  You won't be disappointed with this purchase</review_text>
I have seen Joe many years ago when he had played in a group called bloodline and he is even better now</review_text>
This album gives me goosebumps.  I got it because of Eric Dolphy, but there is a lot more to listen to on this album than Eric Dolphy alone (though he's excellent as usual).  The inclusion of Booker Ervin gives the album the perfect texture, as his style in many ways contradicts that of Dolphy. Although the styles are different, they complement each other perfectly.  Mal Waldron is a great composer, and many of his most excellent ideas appear on this album.  The song "Thirteen" is a fine example...you'll just have to listen to it.  Everyone on this album smokes.  Get this...you wont regret it</review_text>
If you liked the original Clerks soundtrack, then you're sure to love this.  Thirteen years after we heard Randall and Dante rant and ramble on about hermaphrodites and name-calling during sex on the first Clerks soundtrack, now we are blessed with the opportunity to hear these two anti-heroes discuss other pointless issues like racial slurs and which movie trilogy is, in fact, the REAL trilogy.  And we, the Clerks fans, get to hear these meaningless dialogues in between every music track.Oh, and did I mention the music?  Terrific!  Kevin Smith's choices are so fitting for each scene in the movie.  It's not too difficult to imagine that Kevin has been thinking about these track choices for a long time.  In typical Kevin Smith fashion, the usual array of artists are included as well as some cool surprises.  You've got your typical Soul Asylum and Alanis Morrisette as well as King Diamond and an unexpected Jackson 5 dance number.If you have not seen the movie, please make sure to do so before purchasing the soundtrack.  Doing so is sure to give the songs so much more meaning as you listen to them.  Overall, a really good soundtrack compilation that is sure to please any Clerks fan.</review_text>
I am not Jewish, but you don't have to be to enjoy these songs. This album happens to be one of my favourites of the Putumayo releases. A couple of the songs were instantly familiar to me even though I thought I knew none of the songs when I bought this album. Each and every song on here is wonderful...some are traditional folk songs while others are newer compositions. The 23 page booklet includes a 3 page history of Jewish music, and each artist has a page about them, including a photograph. I highly recommend this album to just about everyone. My husband is Arabic and he too loves these songs. Music truly is borderless</review_text>
I recently discovered Joyce Cooling. Yeah, I've been in the dark ages. She is one of the smoothest guitarists out there and she does not try to sound like everyone else. I especially appreciate her percussive use of intonations. She's got chops galore and is a beautiful woman to boot. You can hear it all in her music. Buy Revolving Door! You'll love it</review_text>
Good old silly, irreverent Slade never really caught on in the US, but their melodic early-70s glam rock sounds as energetic and fun today as it did back then, and this is the best collection of their works, including all of the Slade's hit singles from the early '70s, from 1971's &quot;Get Down And Get With It&quot; to 1975's &quot;Thanks For The Memory (Wham Bam Thank You Mam)&quot;.Slade scored a whopping 11 Top Five hits between 1971 and 1974 (five of which topped the charts), and they're all here. So are their latter-day chart entries, like 1983's #2 hit &quot;My Oh My&quot;, but Slade never got better than they did at their stomping glitter-rock peak, and &quot;Feel The Noize&quot; captures them in all their glory, filled with Noddy Holder and Jim Lea's big, dumb, misspelled shout-along hits (&quot;Look Wot You Dun&quot;, &quot;Mama Weer All Crazee Now&quot;, &quot;Skweeze Me, Pleeze Me&quot; and &quot;Gudbuy T'Jane&quot;)</review_text>
I have only recently become a country music fan.  I wasn't sure I would like Faith Hill, but this was the first CD of hers I purchased.  From the very first song "This Kiss," I was instantly drawn into her music.  What I love about her songs is that they are so real.  "You Give Me Love" is so real and so strong.  It's nice to hear a song that a woman sings about a man who is crying for a change.  "The Secret of Life" has taken some getting used to.  It is not my absolute favorite on the CD.  "Me" is the song that means the most to me since I have experienced trying to change for someone else in a relationship.  And "I Love You" is a heart-jerker for those who have loved someone from afar.  She has a big voice, and she nails each song on this CD.  Give it a try</review_text>
This is a good collection, 15 of Supertramp's best songs and the best single-disc collection of theirs you will find. The sound is great and there are no filler songs, here, they're all great to listen to. Highly recommended</review_text>
-unique-highly artistic-creative-more credit to drummers-beatifully polishe</review_text>
This cd has alot of tight hits including: Nann by Trick Daddy and Who Dat' by J.T. Money. There are too many good songs to name for this cd, those are the biggest I like and I like all the others too. I can practically just  listen to the whole cd without stopping it, which usually never happens  with other cd's b/c u buy it for about 3 good songs and all the other songs  are junk. But this cd has all the Hip Hop Hits that it proclaims. I suggest  anyone looking at this review or cd, to buy the cd. It's worth it,  definetely!  One last word is that you will have no regrets buying this cd  at all I think in my own opinion.I am from St. Louie and I am telling ya'll  to look out for a new group called NELLY also, there hit single is already  out &quot;Country Grammar&quot; and cd soon to be out. Get that when it  comes out to. Peace out ya'll</review_text>
This disc dates from Monk's early period before he achieved recognition and started to descend into a long series of formulaic recordings for Columbia. So it's valuable from that point of view. It's also a wonderful chance to hear him showcased without horns although the standard is perhaps not quite as high as the trio Blue Note recordings that immediately preceded it. The best tracks both from a musical and recording quality view point are an extended Blue Monk, which many consider the definitive version, and a lovely unaccompanied Just a Gigolo, which anticipates later solo masterpieces such as Alone in San Francisco. Sweet and Lovely is in a similarly reflective vein. Much of the rest of the album has a forceful, driving quality, with aggressive use of dissonance in places - even for Monk. A particular highlight is Monk tearing through These Foolish Things</review_text>
As a collector of musical scores, I thoroughly    enjoyed this selection.  It is rated as one     of my favorites.  But I must warn that if you do not like     instramental style music, then this isn't for you.  But if you are then this is a must</review_text>
this is a very well done record by 3 of Raps most elite personalities.  Cube, Dub, & Mack definitely knew what they were doin when they made this record.  The beats are amazing on all the tracks.  This is one you can listen to straight through and not feel any need to hit the skip button.  For me all these songs were hot from the first time i heard them.  If you're a fan of the whole West Coast gangsta rap thing, You GOTTA HAVE THIS!  My Fav tracks are "All the Critics in New York", "Do you like Criminals", "Gangsta's make the World go Round", "Westward Ho!", & "Hoo Bangin'"...although like i said, all the tracks are badass.  peac</review_text>
Tosca's Suzuki is not breaking any ground, but by God they have mastered the art. This album is just so professional sounding, very nicely produced. This is how I envision trance to sound like, so much garbage out there it taked a while to sift through and find a golden little record like this. Funky bassbeats and killer sounds. It's what they call ethereal....I think. It flows so well from track to track, quite the odyessy in under an hour</review_text>
Immerse yourself in the incredible genius of Mark O'Connor and his amazing chameleon-like creative ability to tease so many different moods and styles from his violin. If you like Cajun music - this is for you.  If you like Western Swing - this is for you.  If you like foot tapping fiddle with a Celtic slant - then this is for you! Classical? Jazz? Blues? Country Rock?  Then yeah - you guessed it - this is for you! This is an absolutely fantastic album - a brilliant collection of melodies that bring together some of today's greatest violinists.  Pure Genius</review_text>
Right, so, you're reading this either because you are a big Oasis fan and realize that this album is wonderful, or because you've heard some Oasis songs on the ever-disappointingly-dull radio and it's sparked yer interest."The Masterplan" is a compilation of Oasis B-Sides that have been released over the years.  What has always made Oasis the best band in the world is the fact that the songs that they include on their "albums proper" are not necessarily their best songs.  As such, songs like "Acquiesce", "Talk Tonight" and "Stay Young" are vacant on their albums, yet they represent the best of this lovely band and are included  here in stunning fashion.So in summary, I absolutely do not recommend you buy this album until you at least own and fall in love with "Definitely Maybe" and "Morning Glory".To those who own and love this album, it is a part of rock history and is not to be overlooked.</review_text>
If you like music you can't help but like Mariachi From Mexico.  It is superb.  Is there another volume?  If so, tell me about it</review_text>
Mr. Kimbrough done come thru with the dirt on this one.  This aint just blues music, it's soul music right in there with Isaac Hayes and nem. It's hard played and honest and that's the true pleasure of it</review_text>
Fournier plays exquisitely, imbuing each note with an elegance of its own and keeping the piece lyrical yet still rhythmically precise.  Although his interpretation is Romantic, the spirit is all Bach with no egoism on the part of Fournier.  There is both serenity and tension in these recordings, and Fournier's smooth interpretation is one of the most moving recordings available</review_text>
Wow! I love this spykids movie way better than the first one. I think of the first one as an introduction for the characters and the sequel is the big adventure for all the Cortezes and even more characters, like the Giggleses. We met Donnagon in the first movie, and he was the reason for the Cortez parents to go on the mission. Now we see that he has kids and we relize that he has bigger plans for the OSS. And what about Alexandra, the preisidants daughter? She is the main reason we know about the transmooker device, right? Also grandma and grandpa Cortez are joining us in this movie. I think Robert Rodregiuz did an execallent job on the sequel, Spy Kids 2: The Island of Lost Dreams. ... The sequel is awesome!!!!</review_text>
Can't really add much to the reviews. This is one of those albums that increases in listening value as it gets older. I'll admit that when this came out in '94, I only bumped the singles. It didn't grab me at the time. Sometime around '97 I gave it a spin and I've been loving it ever since. There are plenty of bangers on the album, but classics like "Pour Out A Little Liquor", "Str8 Ballin' ", "How Long Will They Mourn Me", Cradle To The Grave", and "Under Pressure" make this album worth owning all by themselves. The rest of the songs are on point too -- there isn't much filler on this album. The production is handled by Warren G. & Nate Dogg (1), the awesone yet underrated Easy Mo B (1), Johnny J (1), Jay & Mopreme (1), Jay & Syke (1), Stretch (1), and Thug Music (4). I'd say that all contributing producers turned in dope tracks.The only tracks that I would call skip material are "Sh** Don't Stop" and "Don't Get It Twisted". "Sh** Don't Stop" is probably the most lazily produced track on the whole album and the lyrics are unimpressive. The production is on "Don't Get It Twisted" cool, but it's one of those songs that you have to be in the mood for it (in my opinion).Volume 1 is a passionate, if at times misdirected, release from the Thug Life camp. The production is nothing short of vintage mid 90's Cali vibes. It holds up very well 13 years after its release. Of course, if you're a Tupac completist, you probably have this album already. But even if you're not a Pac fan, this should be a part of your collection.R.I.P. TupacStandout Tracks: How Long Will They Mourn Me feat. Nate Dogg, Pour Out A Little Liquor, Str8 Ballin' (My Favorite), Cradle To The Grave, Under Pressure, Bury Me A G feat. Natasha Walker (of Y.N.V.)</review_text>
MariaS and Srayle, if you like the Guaraldi original then keep it and chuck the Winston,  Personally, I think the Winston performance is refreshing and a delightful 'twist' on Guaraldi's works.  The piano is brillaint sounding and at volume, thru a good system sounds like there's a piano in the room.  It should be emphatically understood, you are buying Winston in this case, and not Guaraldi.  I have both versions</review_text>
Too many people are overwhelmed with the more modern Christmas songs out there today and are unaware of the wonderful music available on CDs like this.  John Rutter proves his brilliance in arranging and conducting.  The music overwhelms the senses and the joy of Christmas overcomes you as you listen.  This is one of the most peaceful Christmas CDs I have ever heard.  "Wassail Song" is incredible, and if you are ever in a small vocal ensemble, this song is a must to perform.  You will not be disappointed when you purchase this CD</review_text>
This CD is a must for any Horn player or lover of the instrument!  Cerminaro has tremendous technique AND extremely sensitive mucicality.   EN</review_text>
I love this CD!  Everything they sing about is so true to life.  It's a great arrangement of songs</review_text>
Wrathchild alone is worth the purchase of this album. Its just that darn good of a song. But hey, the whole album is good. the title track is brutally awesome, especially live on the beast over hammersmith cd (iron maiden box set). and murders in the rue morgue is another classic. then there is drifter, and the two intrumentals the ides of march and ghengis khan (who papa roach would rip off the guitar riff from for their one hit wonder song last resort). Maybe not as good as their debut album, but still a masterpeice of an album</review_text>
Sony / Legacy does a fine job with this compilation, BUT it could've been much better IMO!! Here's what I did to improve this CD (fans can do the same thing!! There's enough CD space available!)...Include the FULL LENGTH VESRION of 'Encore' (the single mix has to GO!), and add the following RARE BONUS TRACKS...16. 'At Last You're Mine' (fr.'Heavenly Bodies' SDTK 1985)17. 'Steppin' Into The Night' (fr.'Armed & Dangerous' SDTK 1986).The single version of 'Got To Be Real' is fine because it includes Cheryl's trademark "Soo-Hoo, Soo-Hoo" vocal break that's absent on the longer album version.All in All, I'd recommend this CD to anybody that wants the best Cheryl Lynn compilation, but serious fans WILL want more!!'The Best Of Cheryl Lynn, Vol.2' has been LONG OVERDUE for years, but you may have to make that one yourself until Rhino does the job!Peace, SD(of 'Chaka's World')</review_text>
Coltranes recordings with his classic quartet of '61-5 varied between very good and stunning. Coltrane fans may want to get the Impulse! box set instead though (which includes this CD and the other works of the quartet</review_text>
This movie was a favorite in our household and my daughters always enjoyed the karaoke a the end of the DVD, so we searched for the soundtrack.  I actually chose this volume over volume 1 for two reasons...it contains the favorite from the movie, "I want to grow old with you" actually sung by Adam Sandler and secondly, because Volume 1 contains the song that Adam Sandler sings about his ex-girlfriend, which contains quite a bit of profanity, so I didn't want to get it for my kids.  I would have given it five stars, but we find the introduction by Billy Idol at the start of the last track, "I want to grow old with you," which is dialog from the movie, to be distracting and it gets tiring to have to listen to over and over when you just want to hear the song, which I mentioned was the absolute favorite</review_text>
only 2 words can describe this great Cd and they are (simply incerdible) im only 17 but i know great oldschool when i hear it and this is fantastic musi</review_text>
I am 62 years old, and seen them all.  I have NEVER seen anyone as visually and emotionally stunning as Beth Hart at the Paradiso!  Simply the most powerful stage performance I have ever witnessed!  She takes every single song to an epic level of entertainment, and just plain never coasts through a song. Some of the spectators in attendance looked almost scared by what they were seeing, and most were mesmerized by her on-stage and off stage sexually potent antics!  She has been compared to Janis.  I saw Janis twice, and Beth Hart would bury Janis in any category!  I can't imagine how she can possibly maintain a level like that captured at the Paradiso for very long--it just doesn't seem humanly possible!  I am so glad someone was there with so highly skilled a video crew to capture one of the most shattering evenings of music ever.  Magnificent in its fury!</review_text>
I first heard this album in the late 6o's when it was originally released.  Starting with the first track, &quot;Blood of the Sun&quot;, I was hooked.  Leslie West was and has been a vastly unnoticed guitarist treasure. His  throaty singing and driving band, featuring Felix Pappalardi, made  this band one that should be placed on the list of &quot;great ones&quot;.  Probably due to the many other better publicized bands, like Led Zeppelin  and the like, Leslie West and Mountain seemed to get shoved away into the  closet. Open the closet, you guitarists out there, and give this CD a try.  I don't think you will be anything but delighte</review_text>
Like Louis Jordan, his less well-known contemporary jump/jive artist, Cab Calloway fits into an area much beloved by Americans who recall the boggie woogie era or simply love the jumpin bumpin scufflin shufflin sound of that pre-rock and roll music. Though in truth I do love Jordan more and think he was a truely protean genius who was the grandfather of R&amp;B, Calloway was the consumate showwman whose jive/jump music can't help but bring a smile to your lips and a lift to your heart</review_text>
I have followed the Enigma project for a long time, and haven't found myself disappointed with a single release thus far. (That is, considering I am reviewing an older album.) 'The Cross of Changes,' the second chapter in the Enigma project, offers philosophical insight into Micheal Crtu's personal beliefs, in the form of an 'enigmatic' symphony of soft composition and chanson. While each album seems to hold it's own unique interpretation of life, I believe the purpose of this album is to inspire love, peace and wholeness within its listeners.The lyrical value of 'The Cross of Changes' seems to surpass that of its instrumental quality, which is, at times, rather poor in comparison to some of Micheal's other works. However, the lyrics are reassuring and inspiring, none-the-less, and make the entire experience worthwhile.Buyers who are curious about Enigma probably shouldn't start with this album, as it seems to be one of those things you appreciate only after hearing some of the latter releases. (In my case, at least.) The first album I purchased was 'Love, Sensuality, Devotion' (the greatest hits album) -- a good start, considering you will get a fair idea of what Enigma is all about.By the way, I am curious about track number 2 -- everytime I listen to it, I faintly hear Sandra chanting "open your heart, and push the limits..." in the background, though it could just be my imagination. It's strange that I mention that, because 'Push the Limits' was released after this album</review_text>
The slowed down almost spoken version of Downpressor Man nearly makes it worth the purchase price alone.  Sure I've got most of the tracks on other Tosh collections, but these recordings are excellent variants</review_text>
AC/DC is the greatest band EVER!!!!!!!!!!!! this cd has my fav song on it Rock N Roll Damnation I luv both eras, Bon Scott and Brian Johnso</review_text>
One of the greatest rap albums of all time.  Wicked backgrounds and rhyming</review_text>
Brubeck and Desmond work their special magic here and produce their finest live recording.  This is sophisticated improv to tame the beast.  I have listened to these tracks uncountable times and I never get tired of them.   This is truely a wistful soundtrack to transport one to a higher realm.   Try this the next time you are caught in heavy traffic on a rainy  afternoon.  You won't mind the delay.  It never fails</review_text>
Sometimes, debut albums present an artist in full bloom, with an assured grasp on their sound and message. Sometimes, debut albums are nothing but promise, pointing toward what the artist could do. Public Enemy's gripping first album, Yo! Bum Rush the Show, manages to fill both categories: it's an expert, fully realized record of extraordinary power, but it pales in comparison with what came merely a year later. This is very much a Rick Rubin-directed production, kicking heavy guitars toward the front, honing the loops, rhythms, and samples into a roar with as much in common with rock as rap. But, damn if they don't sound like they've already conquered the world! Already, there is a tangible, physical excitement to the music, something that hits the gut with relentless force, as the mind races to keep up with Chuck's relentless rhymes or Flavor Flav's spastic outbursts. And if there doesn't seem to be as many classics here -- "You're Gonna Get Yours," "Miuzi Weighs a Ton," "Public Enemy No. 1" -- that's only in comparison to what came later, since by any other artist an album this furious, visceral, and exciting would unquestionably be heralded as a classic. From Public Enemy, this is simply a shade under classic status</review_text>
What can you say about MFL that hasn't already been said. Sublime, perfect, classic. This is still the definitive recording of the show, and no one has ever come close to the original cast. Sadly, while the movie is wonderful, had Warner Bros. used Andrew's it might have been one of the greatest film musicals of all time. And while Audrey Hepburn gamely gives it her all, Andrew's had clearly made Eliza Doolittle her own, and she would have been uncomparable on film, and raised the level of the entire movie. Well, the rest is history, Andrews went on to be one of the biggest movie stars of the 60's.Still, probably the best example of a play being adapted into a musical. As George Bernard Shaw said (when he finally gave in and saw it during it's London run) " I don't know where Shaw ends and Lerner and Lowe begins.</review_text>
I just love this CD. Over 8 years ago my much older coworker turned me onto this album. It is definetly not just for St Paddy's day. This is an album you can listen to over and over. The Sinead songs are a bit whiney, but she does have an excellent voice. You can not get better that Mic and Sting. Sting's song is just incredible.</review_text>
I'm not sure what to call this CD other than genius. This was the first CD I've heard from Sonata Arctica and it's still my favorite.I'm not really really big on power metal/epic metal, but I defintely enjoy SA and Kamelot. With that said, I think this CD can even entertain those not interested in power metal. My friend enjors radio rock and rap, but after hearing me play this CD where we work, he begged me to make him a copy.Towards the actual CD, i'm not quite sure I can put what's in it into words. Songs like Silver Tongue and Broken have a very distinct, unique sound. The ballads, Draw Me and The Misery are both superb efforts, each making the listener feel Tony Kakko's pain. My favorite song would have to be a dead heat between The Misery and Gravenimage.The keyboardist in this band works in overdrive in each song. He plays fast, and keeps the melody in each beautiful and interesting (and lighthearted at times). The guitarist plays very fast when he needs to, and the right power chords other times. He's quite good. Overall, the sound they eminate is as uplifting as it is rocking. They do a great job.The lyrics seem much better than older releases (english lessons?) but still can be a bit odd. "...with long haired drummer in band" springs to mind. Still at least they write about mundane things... I love Kamelot, but the Knight in Shining armor routine will get old eventually. Anyway, the vocals are very well done, he obviously quite talented and the band harmonizes quite well, too. (They'd make Queen jealous!)Overall, I can't praise this CD enough. Every song is an adventure, none of them a tedious or unnecessary one at that. I would say that anyone could enjoy this CD, but I'd first recommend it to those who are tired of the American screamfest metal that's going on today. Then I'd recommend it to power metal fans, and so on.Simply put, this is one of the best CDs I own. Give it a chance</review_text>
A great recording.  "The greatest bass solo ever recorded" (as put by another reviewer) is certainly a stretch, but the album is still magnificent.  Heavy Sounds is a title that accurately describes the music.  Buy and enjoy.</review_text>
The most juiced-up Sountern Rock around.  Check out the Tango guitar on "Too Hard To Handle" and I always get a kick out of Rick's ole' man.  It's a shame that there aren't bands like this around today.</review_text>
I must agree with the comments made by other reviewers.  This album is great.  Nancy Wilson's voice on this album is unlike anything I have ever heard.  You can't honestly say you're a fan of jazz if you don't own this</review_text>
Very essential Music.The Arrangements&amp;Styles work very well.He has Great Depth&amp;feel here.it's Classic Ellington.He was always Constantly Changing Music</review_text>
I've always been a Terri clark fan but this is the first cd I've purchased by her. I was surprised at how much I really enjoyed this cd! Terri has an amazing voice and the songs kept me listening to the cd over and over again</review_text>
The Best of Taste compiles material from their 4 official albums released from 1969-72. The albums consisted of two studio albums &quot;Taste&quot;, &quot;On The Boards, and the two live albums &quot;Live Taste&quot;, and &quot;Live At The Isle Of Wight&quot;.  This band was a power trio led by Rory Gallagher before he disbanded the group to embark on a successful solo career.  The band led by Gallagher on vocals, guitar (electric, acoustic, &amp; slide), harmonica, and alto sax specialized in hard hitting blues rock.  The music has much in common with Cream.  However, the Richard McCracken and John Wilson could not compete with the stellar musicianship of Jack Bruce and Ginger Baker.  The undervalued Gallagher is an unsung guitar hero whose work compares favorably with that of Eric Clapton.  Like Cream the band favored extended versions of tunes like &quot;Sugar Mama&quot; and &quot;I Feel Good&quot; included here.  The music included here is varied.  It ranges from the slow gut wrenching version of &quot;Catfish&quot; to the more acoustic cover of &quot;Leavin' Blues&quot;.  The cuts from &quot;On The Boards&quot; become more jazzy at times.  Tracks like &quot;On The Boards&quot; and &quot;It's Happenened Before, It'll Happen Again&quot; highlight the band's more improvisational approach.  Hard hitting tracks like &quot;Eat My Words&quot; spotlight Gallagher's outstanding slide technique.  Two cuts I miss from this period which are not included here are &quot;Dual Carriageway Pain&quot; from &quot;Taste, and &quot;Morning Sun&quot; from &quot;On The Boards&quot;.  The live concert favorite &quot;Sinner Boy&quot; provides a bridge to Gallagher's solo career as the studio version was included on his first solo album &quot;Rory Gallagher&quot;.  This anthology provides a great overview of the early work of Irish blues-rock guitar hero Rory Gallagher and his battered Stratocaster.  It is even more essential as the four original albums are only available as imports</review_text>
Its kind of hard to deny what Krs-One has brought to the game. His flow is phenomenal and the insight he gives is precious even now. Standout Tracks: DUCK DOWN, RUFF RUFF(dope match up with Freddie Foxx), 13 AND GOOD(the story of a guy who sleeps with a teen that calls her father who is a gay cop will have you in stitches), POISONOUS PRODUCTS, QUESTIONS AND ANSWERS, LIKE A THROTTLE, WE IN HERE, THE REAL HOLY PLACE(the deepest track on here), WHO ARE THE PIMPS? and the reggae tinged joints like SAY GAL and SEX AND VIOLENCE are gems also. Filler: NONE! Bottom Line: BDP's six album is still a classic with a message that still isnt heeded till this day. Besides the slammin production, Krs showed that he was 100 steps ahead from the average rapper with this album. Any born again hip hop head would do well to start off with Edutainment and work their way down to this album.</review_text>
Originally released in 1972,this was Can's fourth record as well as their follow-up to 'Tago Mago'(see my review).Some really superbly written and played cuts here to fully take in(might take several spins)are "Pinch",liked Michael Karoli's(R.I.P.)stellar guitar solos,the somewhat stunning "Vitamin C" and this reissue's lengthiest track,the ten-minute "Soup".First rate German progressive kraut.After I listened to this CD a second time,I realized that 'Ege Bamyasi' may have very well been a heavy influence on later bands like Gary Numan,Pere Ubu,Public Image Ltd. and Stereolab.Silly cover,don't you agree</review_text>
A great sampling of one of top 10 musicians from the 20th century</review_text>
this is the only albulm i have of the exiesfor christmas i am getting the last albulm. if its the same as this one the exies must be good.this is the best albulm i have listened to.my favourites are ugly, babtise me, splinter and dear enemymy least favourites are none i like every songits an amazing albulm. ihave listened to some of the tracks over and over again and everytime i think wowthis band should be more popularfrom craig from the uk</review_text>
This record is one of the best that has found its way out since the new millenium. I am partial to good songwriting and Bill's particular folk-country-alt-emotive sound. The tracks to me all over the place and take it from someone who has been there and back -it was well worth the trip</review_text>
Building a library of oldies to listen to just wouldn't be complete without this album.</review_text>
Several tunes on 'Back to Oakland' feature Tower of Power at their best.  One in particular that keeps me coming back is the deeply funky instrumental track, 'Squib Cakes'.Featured soloists include a short, mellow guitar solo from Bruce Conte, followed by Greg Adams' fluegelhorn that first lurks in the pedal range (leading one to believe it's a trombone!) and then soars brilliantly higher and higher to a dramatic finish.Tenor madness abounds from lead saxman Lenny Pickett (known primarily for his work as lead Tenor for the Saturday Night Live band), wailing in-tune in the difficult altissimo range (jazz musicians call these 'freak notes' because they are not notes typically included in the range of the instrument ... ), while at the same time refusing to compromise on excellent rhythmic and melodic ideas throughout.Chester Thompson completes the soloistic foursome with a chunky Hammond organ solo that takes you back to a smoky bar in LA in the early 70s - without the probability of cancer.  Lyrical yet hard-driving, Thompson lulls us first into his solo space by filling in behind the band as they chant 'Squib Cakes', then takes off on his own flight, delving out perfect 16th-note runs as though Bach suddenly had learned some jazz Hammond himself.  In the middle of the solo, as if to a testament to the tightness of the groove, Thompson lingers on a treble note in his right hand, chunks out chords so symmetrically with the rest of the rhythm section with his left, that in the days of hearing this on vinyl, I wondered if my record was skipping through that section!To finish the groove, at the end of Thompson's solo, the horns return to fill in a bridge with quick triplets.  After he closes, we're back to the head to close out the tune.Even with so much to savor, this syncopated gem will leave you hungering for more, even after the final stroke of the last chord.  The musicianship and tightness of their groove more than make up for the bland lyrics on the album's other tunes.  I have listened to this album for 30 years and revel in its freshness every time I spin it. I recommend it as a definite primer for anyone wishing to explore Tower of Power's "sound."- Kathryn Shut</review_text>
I loved the CD, it took me back to the days of the original recordings, however the sound was not as good as the original.</review_text>
This was 2Pac's last good album before he joined Deathrow.He was a good rapper but never the best,he started too much beef with other rappers for no reason.He had alot of beef with east coast rappers like Biggie,Nas,Jay-Z and Mobb Deep,but he never opened his mouth about Wu-Tang because they would lyrically destroy him.This is one of the best albums from 95 right behind Gza's Liquid Swords and Mobb Deep's The Infamous</review_text>
On this album,Ice switches to a thrashcore style lovers of the style will go mad about.The songs are mega fast,with furious social lyrics and full of hatred.If you're into thashcoreand dig bands like Ratos De Porao,get this one at once.It suffers from some degree of dynamic compression   though,but if you can correct that,it'll blow your brains againt the nearest wall</review_text>
its quite difficult to sum up the impact of this cd with few mere words. suffice to say, level 1 is a timeless classic, in fact, it was my entry pass into the realm of d-n-b. logical progressions level 1 is a must-have for all d-n-b heads &amp; music lovers in general. demon's theme, western, danny's song &amp; horizons remain some of my favorite songs in any genre. bukem's level 1 displays his flawless production &amp; track mastery which cascades the listener with the ideal mid-tempo balance between dance-floor adrenaline &amp; ambient bliss</review_text>
I'll begin by saying this isn't the only "Ministry Of Sound Chillout Sessions" I've heard, in fact I love the MoS brand, so I can honestly say that EVERY single compilation has it's on flavour, from the "Clubber's Guide To" to "The Annual (Spring/ Summer/ Annual)" Which means, the previous and next instalments don't necesarily match this review. With that being said: This particular Compilation has a very elegant/ european/ underground feel to it. It's indie electronica and some rock-gone-acid-jazz, and of course, it wouldn't be European without some House music. It's fascinating that in the middle of an elephant-driven craze a song talking about taking a holiday so someone can love someone better starts to blend seamlessly. Yes, it's THAT type of record. It's not Pop, it's not a 'greatest hits' mash-up and it's definately not boring. I remember the first time I heard it (I was working graveyard shifts at that time) I'd listen to the first cd and it'd make me fall sound asleep after the first half. It's not a bad thing, it's just very relaxing, very soothing to the soul (Specially the Lior song "This Old Love", which helped me get through a rather painful breakup) Overall, it's THAT kind of session. It makes you think, it makes you apreciate it, it's a 'life soundtrack' from track 1 of the second disc ("we all live and die" from Kinda New) giving you a morning starter to the soothing track "Run (Jacknife Lee Remix)" on the first disc which invites you to THE promised dreamland. Nothing you'd expect from a regular MoS compilation, everything you'd expect from a really good chillout compilation. A MUST for any true Chillout Junkie</review_text>
A true musical theater classic.  Wonderful melodies that will last for years to come.Other classics not to forget about are:Mary PoppinsMy Fair LadyThe Wizard of OzChitty Chitty Bang BandThe first Charlie and the Chocolate FactoryThe Sound of MusicOliverWest Side StoryFiddler on the RoofSinging in the RainThe WizLittle MermaidAladdinBeauty and the BeastGreaseThe King and IOklahomaThe Music ManSouth PacificMy Voice Students are always asking me for recommendations so I though I'd post it for all! We can't forget about these great musicals</review_text>
The debut release entitled "Breathe" by artist called Blue Stone is one of the best New Age albums that I've heard in years! I would even go as to say that it is even better than any of Amethystiums albums. "I Am" is heavenly and "Contact" is an eerie number that is destined to be a future classic!</review_text>
The performances for every sonata and every partita are wonderful. This is the kind of material one can expect from Deutsche Grammophon. Wonderful music, a wonderful violinist, wonderful interpretations, and wonderful sound (not just for its time). There are also very few "squeaks" and he is almost always right on pitch! Often called definitive, this is the one to get. Highly recommended</review_text>
The only problem with Betty Buckley is that she isn't nearly as well known as she deserves to be, considering the length and quality of her career.  This album of somgs from her 1996 AIDS benefit concert at Carnegie Hall is simply flawless.  Naturally, it's heavy on music from Broadway, the London stage, and film scores, but she sings one Mary Chapin Carpenter song, &quot;Come On, Come On,&quot; that comes from none of those sources and is guaranteed to give you chills every time you hear it.  If you're tired of recordings by singers of little talent and less style, listen to Betty Buckley for fifteen minutes and you'll feel as if you'd never heard real singing before.  She is an original, and she has the best voice in theater of this or almost any decade</review_text>
This CD is a classic, a must for all those who loved the movie. I wondered if I would get a crackling type of sound, but it is as crystal clear as the movie sound. This is perfect for those who want to practice the songs for a "sound of music" event or a singing class!</review_text>
Rien a dire si ce n'est que Too $hort et ses potes a claque c'est tout</review_text>
There is nothing more intimate then the human voice.  I am a voice major at a university.  Nothing speaks to me more highly then choral music.  I was a little skeptical about this CD when I first got it.  I have since fallen in love with every aspect of it. Of course if you get this CD you must get the companion CD Lux Aeterna by the Los Angeles Master Chorale.  You cannot have one without the other</review_text>
All-instrumental collections of bluegrass are hard to find, and if you like it when a band takes a break from singing and just plays their instruments, here's your chance for total immersion. All the songs on this compilation are from Rounder Records albums released 1976-1998, by artists with familiar names like Alison Krauss and Tony Rice, and others you may never have heard of.  All are first rate, foot stompin' renditions of bluegrass traditionals, with a few great originals -- Bill Monroe's &quot;Bluegrass Breakdown&quot; and Earl Scruggs' &quot;Foggy Mountain Chimes.&quot; Best known for most listeners is a rousing version of &quot;Orange Blossom Special&quot; by the Johnson Mountain Boys. If you like bluegrass with plenty of pickin' at breakneck speed, this CD will keep you smilin' through many, many replays</review_text>
I am listening to Badfinger even as I type this review.This is the Best Of Badfinger Vol 2, and I thought volume 1 was great !! As previous reviewers have said, what an absolute tragedy the story of Badfinger is (Buy the Book "Without You" the tragic story of Badfinger).Well I have everything they have released, if you do buy any of the Badfinger best ofs, you will more than likely get hooked and start collecting all of their albums.Some of the best songs on this Cd are off "Wish You Were Here" their best album by a mile IMHO.In fact 6 of the 9 songs on WYWH are on this compilation.They were such an original group with every member capable of writing an exhilirating hit song. just have a taste of "Just A Chance", "You're So Fine", "Meanwhile back At The Ranch/Should I Smoke".They were just so good, Damn I miss them</review_text>
I really like this new singer, he has a style all of his own. I recently bought his new CD "A Swingin' Time" and I also had to have this, his first CD offered on Amazon. I'm really hooked on Monte Procopio's unique approach to these classic songs, can't wait for more</review_text>
I never have understood how some people have an inate quality for music and some don't. Well , Willie was one of those that definately did. It is hard to imageine the blues without the likes of Willie Dixon: the writer, the musician, the producer, the businessman. I listen to his work over and over again , each time learning new nuances I did not hear before.How incredible is that</review_text>
As one of the founding fathers of today's heavy metal rock music, Iron Butterfly has them power, drive, and sound that made them unique in the world of rock music. This live album serves as a testament to that fact. Eventhough the recordings of live concerts from the late 1960's through the mid 1980's was primative at best (by today's standards), this live recording of Iron Butterfly captures most of the groups best music durring their prime as a chart-topping group of that era. This is a "must-have" for all Iron Butterfly fans</review_text>
This is, I believe, the best Fleetwood Mac album ever record by the band. It begins with a nice quick paced tune, "Second Hand News" and proceeds to move into many textured songs from there.The album itself does not have a bad tune on it. In fact, of all the 'regular' albums from Fleetwood Mac (excluding Greatest Hits compilations), this album has more hits on it than any other. Hits like 'Dreams,' 'Never Going Back,' 'Don't Stop,' 'Go Your Own Way,' 'The Chain' and 'You Make Loving Fun." All of these get enormous radio play. Moreover, 'Dreams' was a number one hit, and the Album itself held the number one slot for months on end, and has sold over 18 million copies in the U.S. and over 30 million worldwide, putting into the top 50 best selling albums of all time.In fact, an interesting tid bit from the liner notes of the CD describe how the album had such an impact on America's youth that during that generation if you were to ask a student to spell 'Rumor' there would inevitably be two 'U's' in the spelling. Now that is a very strong impact on culture.Every song on this album is arranged on the album as if it flowed right into the other making for an overall well rounded album. One of my all time favorite songs from Fleetwood Mac is on this album, "Never Going Back" which contains some great acoustic guitar work from one of Rock's premier guitarists, Lindsey Buckingham, and, in my opinion, the best Christine McVie song ever written, "Songbird."Now, with this release, you can also get, on a second CD, the various rough takes and outtakes of the songs on this album. This makes for great listening, to hear how the songs developed and were recorded. Moreover, early demos are included along with two 'Jam Sessions." Now, more than ever, this is a must have CD for any lover of Rock music (or music in general for that matter).If you are a Fleetwood Mac fan, then chances are you own this album, but if you are just getting introduced to the band, then you must buy this CD. I highly recommend it</review_text>
Have loved this album since it first came out years ago (bought on vinyl - lost to the mists of time). The CD was out of print but I kept looking and found it on Amazon (it was re-released), Yeah!!!!Last Steam Engine, From the Cradle to the Grave, Louise, Owls, You Don't have to Need Me - some of my favorites.This, to me, is Kottke in his prime</review_text>
I don't know where this guy gets off saying that the drummer, Jorge Rossy, and the bassist, Larry Grenadier, &quot;are competent but do nothing overtly interesting&quot;.  Jorge incredible groove, use of space, and musicality is as good as one could ask for, and Grenadier's huge warm tone, amazing time, and great thematic development is unparalleled by other bassists of his generation</review_text>
I finally got this cd, I have been looking for this CD for awhile now, a great by well worth it</review_text>
Along with Son Volt's &quot;Trace&quot; and Nadine's &quot;Downtown Saturday,&quot; this is one of the best rock albums of the 1990s and certainly one of the best alt.country albums ever released.  Standout  tracks include &quot;Blue Canoe,&quot; &quot;Soul Sister,&quot; &quot;Eyes  of a Child,&quot; &quot;Wink&quot; and &quot;Let's Go Runnin'&quot; all  examples of first class rock songwriting.  The rest ain't too shabby  either.  Fans of the Allman Brothers and Lynyrd Skynyrd in particular  should give this Mississippi band a listen.  But so should any mainstream  rock fan</review_text>
This is Beck's coming of age album.  "Loser" was a single that was designed from the bottom up to be a hit single and "Mellow Gold" landed Beck right smack center of mainstream pop culture for an entire generation.  His earlier recordings, featured in an album entitled "One Foot In The Grave," were evidence enough of his musical genius."Mellow Gold" might have represented an electro-acoustic adolescence for Beck.  If that's the case, then "Mutations" was his rite of passage, a moment of maturation that moves beyond the playful tongue-in-cheek wittiness of his previous album.  "Mutations" has dark, brooding moments with haunting melodies.His lyrics inspire curiosity and sadness.   In one song, he sings, "Looking back on some dead world, that looks so new."  We can't always be sure of his references or implications, but the music in this album is fascinating and darkly beautiful.  His ambiguity of language is infectious and the compositions that he rests his words in are dynamic and graceful.With "Mutations," Beck has secured an important place in music history.  This is a body of work that really goes far beyond album sales and radio play.  The arrival of this album shows us an artist finding a moment of clarity and touching the world with his craft.</review_text>
I can only say that this was my favorite record of last year. This record is hard to find in your local record store, so search it out... Incredible - can't wait to hear more!</review_text>
I bought this because I thought this cd would be nice to listen to in the car while on out and about. I love that our 2 1/2 year old daughter who is from China loves this cd and will request it "Chinese Flute" please. This is just one way to keep her heritage alive and expose her to different kinds of music beyond the Wiggles & Lilo & Stitch CD.I would have liked to have had more information on the songs like what province of China. But not having this information really does not lessen the rating of 5 stars! Our family thinks this is an excellent cd</review_text>
With Freddie backed by Herbie,Ron Carter,and Tony Williams.This is high-flight crisp and inspiring music.Worthy of repeated listenings. Listen and enjoy.Williams is over the top,very creative and will continue to suprise you with his unceasing inventiveness.I've  always noticed how Carter and Williams really spur Hancock on as you will notice in this set.Hancock,one the the truly great pianist of post-bop era,sounds like he is his having the time of his life.It doesn't get much better than this.</review_text>
Stiff Upper Lip is a good AC/DC album, it's not a great AC/DC album.It kills me when people say that AC/DC have sounded the same since 1973 on every album they have done.  Nothing could be further from the truth.I have always thought that each AC/DC album has a sound and a feel and a story in it's own and that a track off each album would be totally out of place on another album.  For instance, can you image Shake a Leg on Stiff Upper Lip?  Or Ballbreaker on Back in Black?It doesn't work.  Stiff Upper Lip has its own kind of rough, bluesy feel to it.  Brian's voice sounds different, the tones and the guitars sound different.  It's good but not great.  The standouts...1. Stiff Upper Lip- Pretty rocking song.  Has a good attitude.  It's fun.2. Hold Me Back and Can't Stand Still.  Very odd rolling songs.  They sound a lot alike.  Again, these songs could NEVER have been on Back in Black.  I have heard that Brian sang Can't Stand Still in one take, that's why they all clap at the end.  I don't know if that's true, but it's an interesting song.3. Satellite Blues- This one is an instant classic.  I LOVE this song.  This song could have been done back in the days of Back in Black and if it were on that album I think it would be as popular as You Shook Me All Night Long.Everything else is ho hum.  Not good, not bad.  Better than most bands out there.  I am really hoping AC/DC put out a killer album with their new release, whenever that is.  I hope they don't turn into the new G&R and suffer from the Chinese Democracy syndrome</review_text>
this one came out in '91. its one of the very few albums that included the almighty Joe Preston on bass. one of the great things about this CD is that all the songs are all on one track. so it forces you to listen to this long, winding, sludgefest in its entirety. as most Melvins fans know, this (along with Houdini) was the pinacle of their musical career. after this, they made some great albums and some good ones, but never better than their self-titled album (previously titled "Lysol", but they decided to change it once they were threatened with a lawsuit). it would be ultra-cool if Ipecac records would give this album a deluxe re-issue treatment. it definitely deserves it</review_text>
Released is the kind of album you put in, kick your feet up with a good beverage, and head off to someplace on the silverscreen of your mind that is pure tranquility. Oster's trumpet echoes on long after the music is off. Here's hoping there's more from this new and amazing artist</review_text>
The beats is cool, but you understand his lyrics! &amp; its not bout all that pimp trash! SNOOP NOT A PIMP...but this is a bangin C</review_text>
Bo Diddley is one of the most underrated rock and roll artist. Such gems as &quot;Bo Diddley&quot; &quot;Say Man&quot; and &quot;Who Do You Love&quot; are just the tip of the iceberg. Add in the blues, like  &quot;I'm A Man&quot; and you have a truely outstanding set. The set also  includes a very informative booklet that includes a bio, pictures and  discography. Do not settle for less than what is offered here</review_text>
These 3 discs (there is a limited edition 10 disc set which has obviously sold out!!)are a continuation of Live Dead. If you haven't heard the Dead Live then start with this or Live Dead.You will realise why to many they were America's greatest improvisational rock band. The playing, the interplay between the musicians - particularly Garcia and Lesh is staggering. And how about a big hand for Bill Kreutzman on drums</review_text>
If you're a fan of Latin music and especially Spanish guitar, you will LOVE Cafe Tropical. Every song is different from the next with instrumentation ranging from guitar, to piano, violin, trumpet, and a whole host of spicy percussion instruments. Every time I put this CD on I hear new things, which I find makes for an even more enjoyable listen.As usual, Johannes Linstead delivers some of the most catchy and memorable melodies in the nouveau flamenco genre, and of course his guitar playing speaks for itself. Highly recommended</review_text>
This guy is amazing. I keep playing this for people and they love it and tell me they have never heard anything like it. I even got a huge discount at the auto shop for just having this CD. After the mechanic took my car from the parking lot and listened to one minute of this, he came in and said"that sounds crazy! you have to let me copy this"After getting a nice chunk of cash taken off my bill, this cd already paid for itself and never collects dust.I know everyone compares Clark to Aphex Twin, Boards of Canada, and Autechre, but for good intentions. He is already that good, after just a few releases</review_text>
Few "metal" bands can successfully integrate melody into their music without falling back on the overused "power ballad". Tesla seems to be able to turn it on when needed, and shut it off when unnecessary. This debut from the Sacramento quintet is full of enough speed to satisfy any metalhead, yet also contains enough substance to satisfy those who want more from their rock than double kicks and 140 on the metronome.The album starts off with a great rythym section groove, then growing and ripping into EZ Cum EZ Go, a song that takes the listener up and down more often than a Valencia theme park ride. Comin' Atcha Live seems destined to be the song that the band opens their live shows with, falling back into the rif-filled melodic offering of "Getting Better". Then the pace swells again into "Too Late For Love", and thunders into the anthemic fist-pumping "Rock Me To The Top". "We're No Good Together" may start like the dreaded power ballad as Jeff Keith laments about the proverbial one that got away, but screams to a conclusion through a profusion of lightning fast (pun intended) guitar solos. "Modern Day Cowboy" is the token political anti-war statement, slows down a bit for "Changes" but up next is one of their fans' favorites. "Little Suzi" begins with a tasty acoustic piece, and progresses into the culmination of the bands' melodic songwriting talents as they chronical the ups and downs (pun intended) of a young starlet discovering the high costs of fame. I'm a little surprised at the way the album closes, though. After the huge highs through the middle of the album, the final three cuts are somewhat disappointing to me. Don't get me wrong,  they're still decent, but I would have liked these three shifted to the middle of the album and slid the rest towards the end - "Little Suzi" would have been a great way to end the album. Overall, even though the band did a lot of great stuff (including their biggest commercial success) in later albums, this remains their best body of work</review_text>
No doubt about it, from start to finish, this is a classic for anybody's collection. I can remember back in the spring of '93 when the movie came out and it was a classic as well but the soundtrack matches up to what the movie was and this soundtrack sent a big message to a lot of us about what goes on the inner cities today. This was rap music at it's best from Spice 1 to DJ Quik. There will not be a soundtrack like this ever again that addresses what goes on in our neighborhoods. So add this to your collection if you still love the true gangster rap, west coast fan(like myself), or just want to hear a great soundtrack</review_text>
Eddie's first all-studio recording, and the album that got me hooked.  I must say that even though they are uncomparably fantastic live, this album demonstrates the range and diversity of Eddie from Ohio.  &quot;Oh My  Brother&quot; is a particular favorite with Julie Murphy Wells displaying  her amazing range and beautiful voice, and Robbie Schaffer's talent for  emoting the absolute best of a heartwrenching situation.  If this song  doesn't touch your heart, you have no appreciation for music.  A particular  plus on this album is a beautiful violin solo of &quot;Yerushalyim Shel  Zahav&quot; by guest musician Pete Wilson on &quot;Jerusalem,&quot; another  song by Robbie, this time also performed by him.  As always, the amazing  prowess of this group is displayed magnificently</review_text>
This is a really great CD. The Candian and American Idol winners are not usually that great, but Melissa is an exception. She just belts out her soul whenever she's at the microphone. My absolute favourite is definitely "Alive". It's just a beautiful song. Really, I recommend this CD who likes songs with great messages and a good beat. She's a great Pop/rock singer. You can't go wrong with this CD</review_text>
I've been listening to Satoshi Tomiie for a long time and this is definetly one of his best CD's yet. Its one of those cd's that is a must have before a road trip. Just play it and let it ride. From beginning to end it keeps your ears on high alert just waiting for that next track to hit. Before you know it your at the end, but who says you cant just hit repeat and start the ride all over again.</review_text>
The music intelligentia probably won't like James Morrison's new album because almost everybody else will love it.  Bourgeois = uncool.  However, if you just listen and feel this album, even if you have snobbish tendencies, it will move you.  Enjoy this amazing new album.  I am</review_text>
"Burnin'" was the last album by the Wailers as a collective group, afterwhich Peter Tosh and Bunny Wailer left the group to pursue solo careers and Marley reformed his group, calling it "Bob Marley & the Wailers" in 1974.  The album shows the original three at their best, balancing lead vocals on several songs between Bob Marley, Bunny Wailer, and Peter Tosh.  The album not only serves to further reveal Bob's soon-to-be legendary work, but also to show the talent of Bunny Wailer with his lead vocals on songs like "Hallelujah Time" and "Pass It On".The album also shows Tosh taking lead with Marley on "One Foundation" and alongside Marley on "Get Up, Stand Up".  The album's biggest gem, however, was "I Shot the Sheriff," soon to be made a favorite in the U.S. and the U.K. by rock artist Eric Clapton on his 1974 "451 Ocean Boulevard" album.The deluxe edition also features a concert from the tour in Leeds, U.K. just one week before the Wailers broke up.  (Bunny, however, was already absent, having refused to tour outside of Jamaica once and for all earlier that year.  His temporary replacement,the Wailers' old vocal coach, Joe Higgs was also absent, quitting the tour after they completed their shows in the U.S.)  1973's "Burnin'" shows the original Wailers at their very best before their breakup and is a timeless classic for music fans everywhere, I can guarentee it</review_text>
The Afro-Eurasian Eclipse is a groundbreaking suite, full of intriguing new sounds and grooves. Ellington didn't fade into predictability and mundanity in his last years; instead, his compositions became more and more original and exciting. This suite has rocking, swinging, waltzing grooves that, though seemingly disparate, work together and illustrate the theme stated in the Duke's spoken introduction to the suite: to show that "the whole world is going Oriental, and that no one will be able to retain his or her identity... not even the Orientals." Duke doesn't leave his standbys behind, though. The phenomenal playing of Ashby, Carney, Jones, and the rest of the Orchestra keeps The Afro-Eurasian Eclipse firmly rooted in virtuosity, even when playing to new grooves, melded with African, Asian, and Australian rhythm and sound.On a personal note, this is one of my favorite CDs. Aside from the remarkable music, it gets bonus points for the spoken introduction, at the beginning of the "Chinoiserie" track. Audio notes give the listener a greater understanding of the CD, especially one with a single focus, like this one.</review_text>
The first time ever I saw this group "Amici forever" as they were singing "Unchained melody", I have confused that song like classical music. Because, it was very familiar. Actually, I didn't know exactly what's that song that moment. Finally, I knew that song is popular music I used to sing. So, laughed myself.It was brilliant and great performance I ever heared before.I bought DVD, too. And I recommended my friend and he also felt their singing like me. He said great and thanks to me</review_text>
This was the first Queen album that I ever had so getting it on CD is great.  "Sheer Heart Attack" is an overlooked Queen gem</review_text>
This is a great collection of hits from the 70's. It is packed with hits. It is a great addition to a 70's hits collection</review_text>
This is the first of Alison's album's that I bought, many years ago.....I've watched her career blossom.....she was an unknown when she recorded this album but in my opinon, it's her best!  True bluegrass, beautiful voice, wonderful music!  I've had the opportunity to see her and the band in concert several times and their music never leaves me disappointed</review_text>
If you don't love this cd (and many people won't), then you must have a very different taste in music then me.  Yes, it's different.  Yes, it's offensive.  Yes, it's incredibly powerful.  Mutiny in Heaven is insanity on a disc, Six strings that drew the blood is awesome, as is everything on this disc.  Simply brilliant, and best disc to start a birthday party obsession with</review_text>
I went through a painful final separation from the love of my life when this CD was released in 1997, and I identified with every song.  I listened to this CD over and over for several months.  I saw Kim at the &quot;House of Blues&quot; in Hollywood during that time and sang along to every song.  This CD is my favorite &quot;bitter sweet&quot; CD of all time.  I love you, Kim</review_text>
Not as epically gorgeous as 'Once Upon a Time in America', but still lovely.  There's a South American influence that lends a very fresh sound to the entire soundtrack.  My favourite track is an Ave Maria--in Guarani.  Haunting.  However, "Gabriel's Oboe" is the theme that makes this score.  Being an oboist, it of course holds a particular appeal to me--and the oboe performing the theme is really something to be aspired to</review_text>
dope Cd..Im a huge Spice 1 fan..this CD is off da hook...Check out immortilized and bossalini cds...those are dope quality Cds..I have over 600 hip hop Cds in my collection..and i don't really express my fealings on amazon unless its worth it..I love hip hop till da day i die...and Spice 1 is one dope smokin hip hop lyracist...tru dat...plus im from da old school..NWA, PE,Rakim,Boogie Down, Naughty by Nature(1rst CD),Big Daddy kane, Old School Jazzy Jeff and Fresh Prince, Old School LL...naw mean..wor</review_text>
This is a great collection of the many "Atom Bomb" songs that are in movies such as "Atomic Cafe", Dr. Strangelove, and other films of the genre. I highly recommend this to anyone who collects "bomb" memorabilia</review_text>
I absolutely loved the string music on Track 3.  I remembered it from an old PC RPG called Quest for Glory IV.  I was disappointed to find out that Track 4 was only a minute and a half long, because I grew up loving that song from the various places I heard it (Fantasia and a kid Detective PC game from the late 80's).Overall, though, Grieg's greatest hits is a must-have for collectors of classical music.  Grieg is revered as Norway's greatest composer of all time and he certainly has a knack for creating imagery of bustling fjords and majestic mountainsides with interlaced river ravines.</review_text>
I love this CD! I often put it in my personal CD player and take it to the coffee shop to help me as I study French. The music is relaxing but not sleep-inducing. Steven Halpern composes great music</review_text>
I got Secret Story as a Christmas present last year. I had asked for Imaginary Day, because the only tune I had heard from Pat Metheny was "The Roots of Coincidence," and I was itching for more. I still couldn't wait to hear what was on Secret Story, but I was hoping it would be in the same vain as The Roots of Coincidence. What I ended up hearing was an incredible CD with a vast scope, filled with emotions that change from tune to tune. Searching for tunes to sound like Roots was not successful; instead, I joyfully found a complete and very unique set.I agree with others that for maximum experience you should have enough time to listen to it in one sitting, straight through. The musical roller coaster is the most extravagant when done this way.I found myself trying to pick out favorite tunes, but I ended up picking ones for only a particular "mood" (such as an upbeat or sedative one). I could just as easily pick a few different tunes for another mood. That's why it's fun to listen to it straight through: no other album of mine gives me so much in so little time. Of course, Metheny has apparently mastered the flow of the tracks, too: one leads right into the next, creating, oh, maybe a "story?" I don't know the story, but it's a lot of fun to make up a different story each time you listen to it.I guess the tune that I most like to play, no matter what mood I'm in, is "Cathedral in a Suitcase," with it's mesmerizing 3-against-2 beat and a well-crafted three-chord progression that it revolves around. Tunes range from the euphoric (Cathedral, Finding and Believing, Facing West, The Truth Will Always Be), to the sweet (The Longest Summer, Sunlight, Always and Forever), to the smooth (Rain River, Antonia, As a Flower Blossoms, See the World), to the calm and reflective (Above the Treetops, Tell Her You Saw Me, Not to be Forgotten). Of course, this is all the tunes, and it makes for such a satisfying experience.Since this is my first Metheny CD, I am definitely going to pursue more. Metheny seems worth my time and money</review_text>
King Elvis.Queen Madiona.Prince Justin.And now Princess Hillary!Duff is slowly making her way up to the queen of pop.It was espicially nice to here my teen idol singing all Christmas classics with some other pop stars too.If you LOVE Hillary Duff and you REALLY NEED some new CD's by her and it's Crhistmas time then this is CD for you!Let me tell ya somethin', that girl can sing.So go to the CD store.Buy it!Play it!Plop down on the couch and have a glass of egg nog.</review_text>
I recommend this cd to anyone stuck in a rut like I was.  Listening to the same artists over and over but wanting something new and fresh.  Life on Planet Groove will be a welcome addition to your collection.  Great for the drive</review_text>
For those of us who thought Phil Collins was to be lost in the mass pop culture, think again... that was back in the early 80s when I heard this.. it is mastery distille</review_text>
Not only do you get some great music with this cd, you get the beginnings of Climax as well. (The last 2 cuts are essentially Sonny Geraci solo songs done by 1/2 of the band that would play on Climax records)Includes their 4 hits (Time Wont let me, Girl In Love, Respectable & Help Me Girl) and a slew of other VERY like-minded material. If you like any of their 4 hits, you will LOVE the rest. If you like Climax, you should buy this for the 2 last songs which are essentially Climax tunes</review_text>
I got this disc for one song, the uncut, full length version of "Boogie Wonderland" by Earth, Wind and Fire (with the Emotions).  The rest of the disc is good - but "Boogie Wonderlan" is in a class by itself!!  Five stars!</review_text>
I saw this band open for Placebo in Tampa, Fl. I had never heard of them before that night. I bought the CD immediately. Though it's a bit plain, It's a GREAT CD. It's a comforting kind of plain & It rocks. I played it in my cd player for about a month straight. The lead singers voice is unique. This band definitely has much potential to become a well known group. A great debut album.If you ever get to see them live DO IT! Their live show definitely makes the cd come alive.</review_text>
Tears for Fears was not the average 80's pop band, even if they looked like it on the surfice. They used synthsizers, drum machines with a meliodic and hook laden sound. But the music itself was often melancholy and they brought up serious issues like family values like few contemporary bands at the time had the guts to sing about. Tears for Fears got their name from Arthur Janov's primal scream therapy and they band consisted of Roland Orzabal and Curt Smith, two highschool friends from Bath, England. Roland was the writer of most songs during the career while they both were co-singing. Some of the music may sound a little dated today (this being released in 1983) but the touchy subjects they bring up are still present today.The opener and title track is a great pop song and at the same time a good introduction to what is coming, it's about children suffering without anyone noticing or caring. Tears for Fears trademark was mixing good pop with serious subjects and they really succeeded with that. "Mad World" was one of the big hits and recently covered by Gary Jules and taken back to the charts again as the sountrack for "Donnie Darko". The moody alternative song brings up the sad reality we're living in, a world without rules or morals and the people suffering from it. Excellent and haunting ballad. "Pale Shelter" was originally released in 1982 but failed to make it big on the charts, so the song was re-recorded, remixed and re-released and the result was a big hit even for "Pale Shelter". The song is slow paced and distinct with guitars, synthesizers and percussion. It brings up the lack of love some children get cause of bad parenthood. "Ideas As Opiates" is almost minimalistic, it basically only feauture percussion and slow piano sound, the lyrics are also sparse. "Memories Fade" is also a stripped and melancholy song, with it's haunting lyrics and saxophone it's one of this album's highlights."Suffer Them Children" is a synth laden pop song about children with problems growing up cause they're ignored and not given too much love. Watch Me Bleed" got very strong lyrics "Heaven comes to he who waits/ But I know Im getting nowhere/ And all the deeds of yesterday/Have really helped to pave my way" and is overall another great pop/rock song. "Change" was one of three big hits on this album, it got a trademark marimba sound and a great hook which paved the way to the charts. The song is focusing on the destructive behavior of a loved one. "The Prisoner" is the darkest of songs with some very strong lyrics and arrangements suited for a horror film, the lyrics are sparse and they're almost whispered. The last song is called "Start of a Breakdown" feautures a catchy synthesizer sound and meliodic percussion. Why this song was not released as single is beyond me, but it's one of the best songs. This remastered version  feauture remixed of Pale Shelter", "Mad World" and "Change and the non-album song "The Way You Are" is present. It's another fantastic song by the way. Uptempo with great percussion arrangements. Nice it was added.Overall, Tears for Fears magnificient debut was one of the most daring and thoughtful albums of the 80's. It's equally intellegent and beautiful full of good lyrics and great arrangements. With this remastered version you get better sound + bonus tracks and the non album song "The Way You Are". Some of the songs may sounds a little dated today, considering all the new equipment used in today's music, but the lyrics and subjects they brought up are just as present in today's society. This album may get a little too personal and the lyrics get frightening when you listen closely to them at times, however if you're a music fan that likes smart lyrics and lyrics that make sense then this is something for you. It's a concept album and it very thoughtful and sincere. One of the greatest debuts of the 80's, let alone albums.</review_text>
I caught Sonny in a live performance this past November, so I got to hear at least 3 tracks off of his most current album...Sonny Please.  He opened the set with a fiery "Sonny Please" which smoked for a good 15 minutes (I believe that Victor Lewis was on traps that night so the percussion section helped do the driving).  For a man approaching 77 years of age, I was impressed with not only Sonny's playing and gracious presence, but his stamina in performing two 40 - 50 minute sets...trust me, the man can still play!   This album may not be another "Saxophone Colossus" or "The Bridge", but it is a solid recording and should satisfy a majority of Sonny's fans.  If you have no recorded music by this jazz legend, this CD is a respectable starting point</review_text>
The first cd from Baby Anne is fairly typical florida breaks fare. I wouldn't claim that's a bad thing, but don't expect to be surprised if you're familiar with the genre. Overall it's a solid offering from Baby Anne and delivers the bass.The second cd is a surprising mix from Jen Lasher, who has abandoned her old breakbeat sound and fully adopted a more electro feel. To those who have labeled this "industrial" I will say first and foremost that you are wrong. There is not one remotely industrial track on the cd. What she does provide is an extremely varied mix of synthpop, house, and a couple breaks tracks, all very vocal and sporting an electro pop flare, sometimes approaching the full-on ny electroclash sound. From someone quite familiar with electropop artists I can't recommend highly enough this diverse mix guaranteed to please newcomers and electro afficianados alike.My only complaint is the strikingly misplaced Wolfsheim track, which I can only assume fueled the misguided and completely false Depeche Mode comparison from another reviewer.</review_text>
Darren Aronofsky's movies are beautiful masterpieces. From "Pi" to "The Fountain", going through "Requiem For a Dream", they will forever stand as timeless jewels. So they are hard to top in any way, but Clint Mansell has been able to do it every single time, scoring each of them.For "The Fountain", he teamed up once more with Kronos Quartet and had Scottish post-rock band Mogwai join in too, to produce a score that fits the movie like a glove, in a very organic way. The central theme to the movie is instrumented in a way that works fantastically well across all the time periods the movie encompasses.The combination of the talents of Mansell, the Quartet and Mogwai yields a relatively dark, yet breathtaking musical piece that will stand the test of time much like the movie it was meant to score</review_text>
We really liked the CD of music from the sound track of the movie, Elf. It was what we expected and we appreciated getting it promptly since it is Christmas music and we we able to enjoy it all through the holiday season.</review_text>
This album has some of the best country songs in the business.  Mark sings songs straight from his heart.  There are songs for every occasion from the slow ballads like &quot;Too cold at home&quot;, &quot;I'll think of  something else&quot;, and &quot;Almost goodbye&quot; to the fast, heels  kicking &quot;Bubba shot the jukebox&quot;, and &quot;Going through the big  'd'&quot;.  These songs are about real life realtionships  and how they  affect the heart. So if you're in the mood to cry about that lost love or  smile now that they're gone this is the album for you</review_text>
Another typical funk classic album from the brilliant tenor sax sounds of Lou Donaldson. The album released on Blues Notes features Lou's popular and individual classic jazz funk tones. Lou even opts to 'chill' out on a  number called 'Over The Rainbow' but on other numbers like 'Donkey Walk'  Lou's style and also his unique band really shine. The unmistakable hammond  adds yet more funk and along with the jazzy guitar sound and funk and  swinging drums this brings together another great album.Keep on funkin Mr  Lou Donaldson!!!!</review_text>
Do I mean the best album or the best singer?  You are correct if you said both!  I saw Kristin Chenoweth on a PBS show "Broadway's Best at the Pops," (though it was not the first time I had heard her) and decided to check out the offerings here.  This is a collection of the kind of music and performances I love.  She has a great range, a precise pitch, and a great style that is at the same time true to the music and to herself. In an era when singers try to outdo each other re-interpreting the composer's original work, not usually with great success, she is a blessing</review_text>
I really enjoyed the song Kids in America by No Secrets.  Both of my children enjoyed it as well.  In fact I have been looking for their CD or for more information on them.  I thought they were cute, fresh, and brought a new touch to the song</review_text>
The Best R&B Band Ever!!! I know some will disagree with me, but this is the band that really rock my boat. I mean, they were awesome and it wasn't forced or fake. The rawness of their funk is sooo addictive that you will never put this cd down. I am in the process of getting ALL their cds, but this one is a great way to be introduce to their music</review_text>
Like it says in the ("33 1/3") liner notes: "...world class chops and originality".  If jazz is your bag and guitar licks get your attention, these tracks will set off fireworks!  My music collection started circa 1960, but these guys made it to the top of my list in a heartbeat!  If I could, I'd give it 10 stars</review_text>
Hermann Baumann is one of the greatest horn players ever and he shows why he has been given that honor on this cd. I don't think that there is recording of the Haydn concerto that even comes close to this masterful performance, even better than Tuckwell's. The cadenzas are absolutely awesome. I haven't listened to the Rosetti before but Baumann sounds excellent in this concerto as well. Clevenger plays ok on the Haydn but his articulation is a little sloppy. I'm a saxophone player but I can recognize  true musicianship when I hear it and Baumann certainly is a brilliant musician. Highly recommended</review_text>
This is one of the truly great Handel opera recordings of the last twenty years. As usual, Nicholas McGegan proves himself to be one of the two or three greatest Handelian conductors of our time. The singing from beginning to end is first class. This opera is known for the famous largo "Ombra mai fu," but the music in this entire performance is a sheer delight</review_text>
Although a couple of reviews said this was a great product, I was wary as I have never found anything that actually worked.  I have a job where my mind is always on the go, and often have a week or two a month where I just can't get to sleep.The CD arrived during one of these times, I put it on my portable CD player not expecting too much, and almost imediately felt a bit queazy, nothing too bad, and on later research this basically proves the Delta wave theory Dr. Thompson is working.The only time in the past when I have gone to sleep so easily when I have been out partying all night when I was younger.  I play the CD on a stereo I have in my room, and I rarely wake up at all.I am certainly going to buy more of his CD's</review_text>
While Photek was (and still is) reknowned for his minimalist approach to breakbeats and electronic sound, his approach changes significantly on &quot;Solaris.&quot; Starting off with the first three tracks, his beats still retain some of the stattacco nature of his earlier work (especially on &quot;Modus Operandi&quot;), but sound more full, more resonant. The tracks where he wanders into the realm of House were quite repeditive, and despite Robert Owen's wonderful efforts (first time I've heard him), they were lacking. The best track on the album, and one of the best Photek works is definitely &quot;Infinity.&quot; The rumbling bass really cuts right to the core, and reminds me a little of Source Direct. The trip-hop efforts are good for his first attempt at such music, but the more ethereal &quot;Halogen&quot; left an impression. A wash of sound that previously Parkes would be itching to rip apart with a snare roll, it comes off much better for the lack of any true form. Not a great album, but solid and indicative of where Photek would like to go in terms of his future works</review_text>
Love.This.Album.  EVERY song is awesome!  This is the kind of album you play over and over because you feel great after listening to it. My favorites are "In A Moment" and "Know".  Half Past Forever rocks!</review_text>
Link this CD of great melodies with  "The Best of The Browns (1954-1967).  You'll not regreat the quality.  Such easy listening.  This group is simply the best.  I also suggest reading Maxine Brown's book "Looking Back to See, A country Music Memoir."  It's a well written (and interesting) cover of the the history of The Browns</review_text>
As a kid, Out Of The Blue was one of the first albums (actually, 8-track) I paid for.  That decision was made after hearing "Sweet Talking Woman" as a single, and after I bought it, the album grew and grew with me.  Every few weeks, a different set of songs stuck with me as memorable.  The first few weeks, it was "Sweet Talking Woman," "Turn To Stone," and "Mr. Blue Sky" (all pop perfection); the next few weeks, it was "Wild West Hero," "Across The Border," and "Jungle."  After three months, there wasn't a corner or edge of the album I didn't know and like.Thirty years later, the remastered CD finally comes around and, through the fan club at [...](Which I heartily recommend because of their labors of love) I bought this and Balance Of Power (review coming).  I have to say I was a little scared to put this on again after all this time as my tastes of music have evolved and the label of "pretentious" has been placed on them by my 16 year old son ( a prog rocker, nonetheless).A big sigh of relief--the CD holds the same joys it did before.  The Moog synthesizer riff by Jeff Lynne in "Turn To Stone" still pumps the heart, while "Sweet Talking Woman" and songs like "Wild West Hero" and "Jungle" still delight.  But I'm amazed at how things like the "Concerto For A Rainy Day" (four songs including "Mr. Blue Sky"--still the brightest jewel on this album) still hold together, and songs like "Stepping Out" and "Sweet Is the Night" step up to dig their hooks into you even today.While the remastering is very good and makes some tunes step up ("Across The Border"'s horns beg you to crank them up), there are a few drop outs ("Night In The City" has a couple), and of course, my tastes probably don't translate to everyone.  But, my 16 years old has given the album a careful listen, and he hasn't returned it to me yet--I imagine for the next few weeks I'll still enjoy listening to "Out Of The Blue" from downstairs for a few more weeks..</review_text>
The title track is one of the best country songs ever performed proving the talents of Hank as a true caftsman when it comes to song writing. Fitting that category as well are Outlaw Women, and Women I've Never Had. Hank also lends his southern rockin' style to White Lightnin' written by J.P. Richardson a.k.a. the big bopper.  What Bocephus album would be complete without at least one tribute to his father? Hank serves up a whopper here along with Waylon Jennings in a classic called The Conversation.  In a time, much like today, when country was straying from it's roots Hank finds a way to keep the southern bluesy traditions alive on all ten cuts of this must have country album</review_text>
And he know's nothing about popular music and really should get back to work and stop sitting around convincing himself that he does.  Dumbass</review_text>
people, what a killer release this is. i bought it in '92 when it was released, not knowing what to expect, as i had never heard a single cut from it. i knew Schonn was the axeman on this baby, and that was all i needed to know. i popped this cd in the player, and was instantly floored. what great melodic, poweful tunes filled my ears. i'm not much of a ballad fan, but even those are great. Dean Castronova on drums was the perfect choice for this type of release, as he adds the power to Schonn's precision. this is how Neal would have played with journey, had the suits let him do so. the Gioeli brothers, unknown to me at the time, do a masterful job as well. it's such a shame that great bands make an album or two, and just fade away, ie. Lynch Mob, Badlands and these guys, to name a few. this release is far superior to their second offering, but that one is pretty tasty as well. i suggest paying the coin for this cd, as it's worth every penny. Hardline 2 will run you about twice as much, but imports often do. get 'em both if ya' can, but this one is the best of the 2. peace.</review_text>
Being quite the fan of Grace Slick, Jefferson Airplane, and other 60s groups, I bought this album only having heard two songs on it--"Daydream Nightmare" and "Outlaw Blues".  At first I was a little puzzled--The Great Society sounded different than any band I'd ever heard before.  After listening to it about two more times, I realized this uniqueness was a good thing!  They sound a little rougher than your average 60s band, and they were--Grace, her first husband, and her brother-in-law assembled this band out of a few of their friends and it only was around for about a year.  The Great Society definitely isn't a band for everyone, but if you love interesting-sounding music, want to hear some of the earlier forms of psychedelic rock, or are just curious about how Grace Slick sounded before the *smoother* recordings of Jefferson Airplane, this is the band for you!A quick review of all the songs:Sally Go 'Round the Roses: A great way to open this CD.  Pay special attention to the instrumental break in the middle--it's amazing!  (Any time this group does an instrumental solo, it will be VERY good.)Didn't Think So: In my opinion, one of the weaker songs on this album, but a fine song just the same.Grimly Forming: An overall fantastic song to listen to with intriguing lyrics and another great instrumental section.  (I love the tambourine--it adds an interesting air to the song.)Somebody To Love: Yes, here it is--the ORIGINAL version of the Jefferson Airplane hit, written by Darby Slick, Grace's brother-in-law.  This has a much less *psychedelic* sound than the JA version, but they're both equally as good.Father Bruce: This is a very catchy song written about Lenny Bruce as if he were a preacher.  Fun to sing along with.Outlaw Blues: This is a cover of a Bob Dylan song, I think.  Grace's voice on this is incredible.Often As I May: Another fun song that's almost as catchy as Father Bruce.Arbitration: This song is mostly some great instrumentals but features some singing from David Minor (he did rhythm guitar, I believe.)White Rabbit: Yup, another original version of a JA song!  This song's about 6:20 because there are 4 minutes of great guitar/sax playing at the beginning.  Almost better than the JA version!That's How It Is: A cheery song with fun words.  You'll definitely be singing this one aftewards.Darkly Smiling: This is another "weak link" on the CD.  (There aren't many, thankfully!)  It does have some interesting lyrics, though.Nature Boy: Grace's singing/recorder playing make this song memorable.You Can't Cry: This is a fun rock song, with the usual great guitar playing from Darby Slick.Daydream Nightmare: This is one of the more *psychedelic* and dark songs on the album, with great bass and guitar playing and more of Grace's recorder.  This is definitely not a song to skip over.Everybody Knows: Also a fun rock song, and yes, another catchy one.Born To Be Burned: This song is a little less exceptional, but it does have a good bass line, and some good guitar.Father: A FANTASTIC way to end the album!  This song is a nearly-seven minute long instrumental that builds up to an amazingly frantic crescendo.  Not a song that will keep you bored</review_text>
I agree with most of the reviewers that this band was very underated.great singing electric and acoustic guitar playing and great songs.why were songs like Natures Way and I Got A Line not huge hits?I Got A Line made the top 40 I think.Natures Way was a great acoustic ballad.also Nothing To Hide has a nice acoustic/electric section.also Mister Skin could of been a hit catchy.this band was better than a lot of the crap that came out in the late 1960's all the bad hippie bands of that era.as for the whole album I think it would get  five stars if it had some live tracks as bonus cuts,like a live I Got A line or Natures Way live hearing that live would of been fun. I heard samples on a live Spirit cd.a great unknown band that everyone should give a listen to and to remember what real musicians and songs were about in the old days</review_text>
Tunisian Anouar Brahem's "Le Voyage de Sahar" finds him in the same company- pianist Francis Courturier and accordionist Jean-Louis Martinier- as 2002's highly acclaimed "Le pas du chat noir."Having toured in support of that CD, the trio developed into a true group, something that Brahem accentuates to great effect on this program of new compositions and three favorites that are recast with the new ensemble.With "Voyage" Brahem continues a trend of creating music that is not as overtly "jazzy" as some of his earlier outings.Nonetheless, he remains a master a crafting deliciously vivid, richly evocative compositions that distill Arabic music and European jazz sensibilities with a warm, sonorous chamber music vibe.Among the ports of call on this "Voyage" are "Zarabanda," whose elegant lope recalls the French Riviera.Elsewhere the title track exudes mysticism tempered with intrigue, while "Cordoba" and "Ete Andalous" are meditative pieces with a decidedly cinematic scope.  The gentle bounce of "Nuba" and introspection of "Les Jardins de Ziryab" both include uncredited but effective passages of voice.Rarely do you hear music this gorgeous</review_text>
I originally purchased this CD at a local store.  So many of my friends and family loved it that I ordered 4 more from Amazon at a fraction of the cost.  It is a superb CD and I recommend it to all.</review_text>
1990. It dosen't seem like that lond ago. When a barley known Mariah Carey stuns the world with a powerful 5 octave voice that hasen't been heard since Minnie Ripperton. She made her appearance when she signed on to Columbia Records after the now forgotten Brenda K. Starr, whom Mariah was a backup singer for at the time, gave Tommy Mottola a demo tape of her songs and the rest was history. Now about the album.The album starts off with her first single "Vision of Love" a powerful song that spent weeks atop the charts and made Mariah a star. You can feel the suspence as Mariah builds up to the bridge and gives the world their first hearing of her beautiful 5 octave voice. Truly to this day, still one of her best songs."There's Got To Be Away" changes pace from love to world issues that are still relevent today. This was released as a single in the U.K. (it wasn't released in the U.S. for fear that it would break her string of four number one hits) yet it failed to chart."Someday" is the next song and was the albums third single. It too hit number one in 1991. This song is great to hear after a breakup as Mariah warns an ex-lover that "the one you gave away will be the only one your looking for." This song may seem a little out dated now as it still has some heavy 80's synth beats."I Don't Want To Cry" was the albums fourth and, in the U.S., the last release. It too hit number one in the summer of 1991 and within a year Mariah had a whopping four number one hits under her belt. Something that will not be accomplished for a long, long time. Though Mariah has declared her hatred for the song as she fought over the production of the song and was dissatisfied with the final product, the song still has all the work of a great Mariah song and it is the only song that Mariah does not hit her famous whistle register with."Vanishing", though never becoming a single, is probably one of the best Mariah recordings. A gospel like song with amazing vocals over a pounding piano is enough to make anyone think their in heaven. Though the song is spookey enough at the chorus when she softly coos "swiftly you're vanishing, drifting away." It has also been called a "hidden treasure" by many reviewers."All in Your Mind" is another song that realy showcase Mariah's vocal capabilities. Though this is one of the few songs that sound dated, but definatly worth a listen."Alone in Love" is a song that is soft and pleading would make anyone run back to Mariah. Truley a Mariah great.The next two songs,"You Need Me" and "Sent Up From Above," really are the weakest tracks on the album and do bring down the feel of the album. They also sound dated and are not the style in which Mariah is famous for. Still, every Mariah song is worth a listen, so go for it!"Prisoner" is a truley a great Mariah tune. Though this has a rock influence as well, she does a great job with the vocals and the lyrics stay insode your head. This almost became a single in the U.S. but Mariah finished her new album quicker than originaly planned."Love Takes Time" truly will have a place in my heart. Every time I hear this song it takes me back to 1990, almost like a little time machine. Putting this song on her first record almost didn't happen, as Mariah har intended it to be on her next record. Though Tommy Mottola and other executives persuaded her to. The style is not that different than "Vision of Love," where it build untill the brige where Mariah lets off her signature high note. This was also the second single of the album and became her second number one in late 1990.Though Music Box, Daydream, and The Emancipation of Mimi would go onto break records and are considered some of Mariah's best albums, there is no way you can leave this one out. This album truley is the one that started it all. To this date it has gone 9X platinum and made Carey into a star and would be the start of years and years of great music from THE voice of this generation. Though this album was heavily criticized for being to similar and formulaic to Paula Abdul, Janet Jackson, and especially Whitney Houston, it still ranks as one of the best albums of the 90's and of all time. For some people this album may be a time capsule of 1990 and for others who are now expiriencing this music for the first time one fact will always be true. This is one of the best debuts and albums ever and was the start of a simple Long Island girl named Mariah Carey, who became a superstar.</review_text>
This was one of the first Hiphop albums I ever purchased and I still listen to it today I think that krs's style was best suited to Primos production. Once he lost Primo (with the exception of a few albums) he couldnt hold it anymore musicly. krs didnt care about the latest trends in music or about bein a thug or topping the pop charts he just showed his incredible talents on the mic and stomped all the wack MCs that deserved it. This was also the album that introduced the world to krs as a solo artist and he proved that he had plenty of ammunition left from his BDP days as well as few musical/lyrical tricks up his sleeve This album along with any other BDP release should be considerd mandatory listening for all you youngsters out there who are just getting into Hiphop this was the era that I belive Hiphop was the best about 93-98 its a shame that kris is doing the crap hes doing now I wish he would find a better producer or just stop doing albums and continue his carrer as a live battle rapper.</review_text>
This truly is a masterpiece of pop music. There is not a wasted moment. The songs all blend together majestically one after the other. You really must listen from beginning to end to get the full effect.I agree with the reviewer that stated that 'Don't Look Back' is one of the best songs I have ever heard. I told a colleague that my heart melts when it plays.I don't mean to be gushing but this album stands apart. I had to put it away for awhile because it is somewhat addictive.</review_text>
Gerry Beckley is "timeless". His new CD is awesome and seems to go back to his roots. His songs over the years last lifetimes and bring back amazing memories.This new CD just proves he hasnt lost his touch. Anyone who does not agree, doesnt know the real Gerry. I have had the privilege to meet him and talk with him many times, including being able to celebrate New Years eve with them after a concert with the rest of America and their families.He is one of the nicest people i have ever met, and his songs have always been a part of my life. I hope there are still many more CD's still to come and look forward to seeing him again in the near future in concert and afterwards</review_text>
THIS IS A CD THAT EVERYONE SHOULD HAVE! THERE ARE FOUR GREAT VOICES AND THEY DO COUNTRY MUSIC THE WAY IT SHOULD BE! LORRIE MORGAN IS THE BEST AND I LIKE EVERYTHING ON THIS!! BUY IT AND ENJOY! CHERY</review_text>
If you like the Beach Boys and appreciate the technical quality behind Telarc recordings, then this disc is a must have in your collection. First, Papa Doo Run Run does an excellent job covering Beach Boys tunes to the point where some people can't tell the difference, but you can still hear the uniqueness they bring to it. Second, you'll feel like your hearing parts of the music you've never heard before because there is so much more foundation and clarity to the recording. You can hear each instrument clearly. The beginning of &quot;I Get Around&quot; is almost explosive, they way the original recording should have been. Telarc and Papa Doo Run Run have made a special album here. When I feel like listening to the Beach Boys, I usually grab this CD first</review_text>
I assume you already know what's on this recording or you wouldn't be here, right?  Don't you probably have a thirty-year-or-so old vinyl copy of this that you haven't listened to for years because it's dusty and has scratches and pops and who listens to that stuff anymore anyway?Well, I won't review the music here because others have done better than I would, but I will say that listening to this remaster through a high quality set of headphones (Sennheiser) has enabled me to hear this as if it were the first time.   It's totally worth the money to get this new version, and the bonus tracks just make it even more fun.</review_text>
Joe Bonamassa is a blue/rock musical phenomenon that is awe-inspiring to anyone who will take the time to listen to his music. In his musical style/class, I would count him the second greatest musician on the planet - with Walter Trout weighing in first place.  As you can easily see from all of the other reviews, I believe that you will find this CD well worth purchasing - as I have found all his material is. (After purchasing this item, I eventually went on to purchase everything he produced and haven't been disappointed.) As with any CD, you may not like all the selections but I believe the vast majority of his material you will. Among my favorites on this CD are: `Pack It Up', `You Upset Me Baby', and `Man of Many Words'. Bonamassa is an extraordinary adept and versatile musician. Since he is young and gifted, we can expect many more superb CD's in the future. Highly recommended</review_text>
Does anyone know whether this set will become available on SACD or DVD Audio format?  How would you contact GRP records to ask? I only give it four stars until multichannel format appears.</review_text>
Together with  'THE BEST OF KOOL&amp;THE GANG'.....    T H I S is the ULTIMATE  bit of funk that i've found so far.  The tracks may not always have a &quot;song structure&quot; (and for me the women singers may be omitted..)  -  the funkiest bits in history are found here!!!!!!</review_text>
In August 1969 five session singers were invited to form a new session group. Main singer was Tony Burrows of Ivy League and Flowerpot Men fame. The first success came with the second single United We Stand. This CD  collects together the three US hits of the session group plus the only US  hit of the group that was the face of the session group in concert during  1971-1973 and that would become the second outfit of the group, the  Eurovision winning song Save Your Kisses For Me. The rest of the songs are  a mix of songs from this second outfit 1974-1980. This outfit is still on  tour at the end of the centur</review_text>
First off, to the above comments, while I thoroughly enjoyed your well articulated history lessons, and would be interested to read other history lessons from you, you have to realize that this story is not directly based off of the 300 Spartans at Thermopolye, but of the Graphic Novel. Now this is not to say that it is historily accurate in some sense, but the movie is tuned more to the direction of the graphic novell itself.**** Caution SPOILER ALERT *****Besides that the Soundtrack is amazing and it is always a Joy to listen to a soundtrack that really captivates the real emotion of that particular scene, I especially enjoyed the music when they fight the "beasts" and it is really hard rock, and I especially LOVED the ending music when the entire Spartan Army is gathered and the one spartan is telling them to remember Leonidas (It is called Remember Us on the Soundtrack).May we all find our own "Glorius Death</review_text>
"The Essential Jimmie Rodgers" is highly recommended for any serious country music fan. If anyone is the genuine article, it is Jimmie. Listeners will recognize some old favorites among the tracks including "Frankie and Johnny", "Mule Skinner Blues" and "T for Texas".  There are also fine versions of "Waitin' for A Train" and "In the Jailhouse Now" though some may prefer Jerry Lee Lewis' version of the former and the Webb Pierce recording of the latter. The most interesting tracks are less well known.  These include "My Old Pal", "My Old Sunny South by the Sea" and one devoted not to a mother but a father (!)-"Daddy and Home". For this reviewer, the album hit its high point on the final track, a mournful "TB Blues", a reference to the disease that took Jimmie's life at 35. While Jimmie's yodeling style may not be for everyone, this reviewer considers this album a safe bet.  Keep in mind that JR was elected to both the Country and Rock and Roll Hall of Fame.  Further, the "Essential" series of albums rarely disappoints. These almost always sponsor well- produced compilations of our past heroes best efforts. "The Essential Jimmie Rodgers" certainly falls into that category</review_text>
I have to tell you Lionel Hampton has yet to be matched in talent, and drive on the "phones." Funny Story, it was Tito Puente the late and legendary " King of the Mambo" was the one who showed Lionel (by carefull persuation) the light of the "phones" and shuned him away from the piano. Unfortunatly not much was known on this subject of the two meeting but I believe they meet in the service or right after Tito was discharged for WW II. I can tell you Lionel, to me, is best know for His BIG version of "Flying Home". A bigger, badder version of the small groups version he did with Benny Goodman, and teddy wilson. Lionels closest match would have to be Red Narrvo form the 1930's, but still Mr. Hampton 's drive and moves on the stage has yet to be matched</review_text>
For someone who knows little about Bach and wants to learn something, you couldn't do better than to give them this CD.  Ormandy and the Philadelphia Orchestra give their signature warm, plush sound to the work of the great Johann Sebastian Bach, making him sound very nearly like a Romantic rather than a baroque or classical composer.  This is not a bad thing--some complain that Bach, with his mathematical leanings, leaves them cold.  That isn't possible with the inviting material on this CD</review_text>
This is one of his older CDs, but one of my favorites.  The music is smooth and wonderful to listen to.  Great CD after a long day or to play on a special night</review_text>
I have to say I was getting worried that John Adams was becoming a has-been.  El Nino's first half was much better than the second, I didn't particularly like Transmigration and I defy anyone to listen to his 2001 piano work American Berserk and tell me it's any good.  But after this release, I stand humbly corrected -- he's still, in my opinion, America's, if not the world's, best living composer.Dharma at Big Sur is scored for an electric violin and orchestra and uses a tuning system that's not well-tempered.  What really makes this work special is the way the electric violinist plays soulfully and beautifully above the orchestra for almost the entire work in a sliding style I've never heard before in classical music.  The first movement "A New Day" with its quiet and contemplative opening really feels like it's the creation of an entire universe.  The climax of the second movement might be the most satisfying conclusion to any of Adams's works to date.  Dharma is an absolute masterpiece.My Father Knew Charles Ives is wonderful too, even if it's not as powerful or moving as Dharma.  The work is both an homage to Ives and a reflection of Adams' life.  Clearly, Adams had a great childhood.  The first movement, Concord, is playful -- the clearest tribute to Ives, since it's sounds structurarlly similar to his Fourth of July.  The chaos in Adams' Concord is a little more rigid than Ives', but it's still fun.  The second movement, "The Lake", features a beautiful clarinet line that evokes the composer's father.  The scurrying of the last movement, "The Mountain", seems needlessly frenetic at times, but the cathartic ending that results of it makes the voyage worth it.My one bone to pick is with Nonesuch.  The two works together represent about 52 minutes worth of music -- an amount that many would already consider stingy on a single CD, especially when other works like Guide to Strange Places go unrecorded.  So why put these two works on 2 CDs?  Is it to justify the $20 sticker price?  An artistic statement to completely separate the two works?  It just seems silly.  But it's also forming a nasty pattern of sub-30 minute CDs that really should stop.  People want to hear the astonishing sound world that Adams creates -- why try to limit it to 25 minutes at a time?Buy this disc, even if it's split into 2 pieces.  It's the best of his works yet</review_text>
I love almost all of these songs on this cd. If you want songs that grab your every emotion...this cd is for you! I also recommend their other cds also</review_text>
Ace rolls out its second volume of early girl and girl-led group sounds.  This time, there are six tunes that did not make it into the top 100 and that may seem to be a bit of a letdown in content but when looking at the overall repertoire, this series still beats just about anything else of the genre out there.  With enough (ten) top-10 songs to keep the music familiar, there are lots of seldom-found sides making the listening much more interesting and not sounding like every other oldies comp.  Between such monster hits as Lesley Gore's pre-womens' rights anthem &quot;You Don't Own Me&quot;, the Exciters go-and-get-him &quot;Tell Him&quot; and Kathy Young's barely pubescent &quot;A Thousand Stars&quot; are cradled such rarities as the Secrets' &quot;The Boy Next Door&quot; (a Madara-White, of &quot;You Don't Own Me&quot; and other Gore tunes fame, composition ), April Stevens' &quot;Teach Me Tiger&quot; (later with brother Nino Tempo striking it big with &quot;Deep Purple&quot;) and Timi Yuro's (of &quot;Hurt&quot; fame) &quot;What's A Matter Baby&quot;.  In this volume three of the tracks are acknowledged as having been lifted from disc but only track 10 is of substandard sound quality even so.  Many of the tracks (2,3,6,8,12-15,17,23,25,28) appear in stereo, the remainder in mono.  The 16-page booklet accompaning the disc provides pages of fascinating backround to the artists represented.  Ace again hits the mark with this new compilation</review_text>
Undoubtedly, Marnie belongs to the top list of Bernard Herrmann's best film scores, a wonderful musical image of Alfred Hitchcock's underrated movie. Written for small ensemble (strings, woods, harp and horns) Herrmann gives the music a wonderfully flowing mood, tasteful and delighted along with the dark characteristics in every second bar that Herrmann so masterful handles in all his works for Hitch. Joel McNeely's reading is simply stunning as ever, so is the performance, but I just don't like the overall acoustics on these Varse rerecordings with the large hall reverb giving the orchestra no room for details. They simply are overheard in this muffled sound. This is far from ideal for recording a film score and I bet Herrmann would not have liked this! But, it's a great, great score</review_text>
I am new to Ron Sexsmith. Where have I been? This Cd is outstanding and so soothing.... The instrumentals are soul syrup, the melodies are whipped cream and the lyrics are full of cherries, nuts and fudge sauce.....It is putting something so sweet and so nurturing into the hearts and minds of the hungry and starving. I am still in the stage where his songs resonate in my mind just before I fall asleep at night and that waking up means I get to hear his "comfort food" again.... This honeymoon will last forever....  Fall in love folks, it's worth the risk....Calorie free, I promise...Thanks Ron, God Speed !</review_text>
I am realtively new to country music. I purchased this because I had the pleasure of hearing Willie sing "You Don't Know Me" on CMT one afternoon. I was quite taken with his rendition and recalled hearing this song growing up. From this one time "soft rocker" I couldn't be happier. Go Willie</review_text>
This will be short.  It is worth the price of this album just to hear the Branford and Harry Connick Jr. duet Carolina Shout.  That being said, all of the other tracks on this album are excellent. From Jungle Blues to Doug Wamble's solo guitar on Autumn Lamp, with this record you get a pile of blues and at the same time gain an appreciation for Romare Breaden's art.  A must have.  Branford keeps outdoing himself</review_text>
Ice Cube is back for his 6th solo with the Peace Disc.  This may be my favorite album from Cube (close with "Lethal Injection").  His lyrics are much different then his first few albums and the beats changed with tthe times but it's still nice to hear from Cube.  With 13 songs, none ar ebad, 5 are ok, 1 is almost a classic and the rest are good.  Guests are on 4 songs so you still get enough Cube to satisfy you.  Production is decent as well, Chuckey Thompson & One Eye each do 3 songs, Puff Daddy, Younglord, Bud'da, Battlecat, Dr. Dre, T-Bone and Charley Bear all do 1 song.  A must have album for fans of Ice Cube.#1 - 8.5 (f/ MC Ren & Dr. Dre -- N.W.A. reunion)#3 - 8.5#4 - 8.5 (f/ Jayo Felony, Gangsta from the Comrads and Squeek Ru)#5 - 7.5 (1 minute intro before he raps)#7 - 8.5 (nice beat)#8 - 9.5 (f/ Krayzie Bone -- nice beat)#9 - 7.5 (f/ Mack 10 & Ms. Toi -- also on the "Next Friday" soundtrack)#11 - 8.5 (nice beat)#12 - 7#13 - 7#15 - 7.5#16 - 8 (good beat)#17 - 8O'Shea Jackson -- b. 6/15/69check all my review</review_text>
Nas' Street's Disciple definitely has plenty of memorable/outstanding cuts on it. Nas sounds very confident and his lyrical skill is prevelant throughout both discs. The subject matter varies which is way cool in that, it delivers to all audiences of his fans. Every Nas fan will be doing themselves a huge favor by supportin him and pickin this up today. A</review_text>
I hesitated for so long to get this.  Having followed Moby's rise since circa 1994 it has been amazing to watch what an impact he has had on music and on various cultural media over the years.  I like his early techno/rave stuff and have enjoyed the gift he has for using electronica to score some beautiful and haunting hymns.  But I wondered: has Moby gone soft?  has he sold out?  I was pleasantly surprised.Look at the cover and add rain.  That's the overall mood of this album.  I find rain to be cleansing on many levels, often building a mood of pensiveness, reflection and a fragile peacefulness.  There is a glorious melancholy in the music, the lyrics and the singing on the album.  Take the chilled out moments from Moby's other albums and build on it.  That's what he's done here.Almost every song has singing - primarily Moby's longing, almost cyring, voice - and almost every song is for those rainy nights, when the world doesn't make sense, when longing for companionship and understanding burdens the heart, yet with a subtle hope underneath it all.It's downtempo, mellow, moody and sometimes sad.  But it is beautiful.  Don't expect "old" Moby, don't look for the commercial jingles of Play.  Just put it on and listen</review_text>
"Animal Farm" is a personal favorite of mine. And I dont understand why this song does't get more recognition - in my opinion, the most underrated song ever written (yes i know, its a bold statement). Theres something about Davies' voice in "Animal Farm" that makes this song unforgettable - particularly in this part:'While I lay my head upon my pillowLittle girl, come play beneath my windowThough she's far from homeShe is free from harmAnd she need not fearShe is by my sideAnd the sky is wideSo let the sun shine bright'The build up to Davies screaming "She is by my side" is really breathtaking. The title track and "Starstruck" are just as excellent. This album is a real treat and should be in everybody's collection</review_text>
...yes, the Beatles by which I'm not comparing Supergrass to them. No, Supergrass are riding the road built by not only The Beatles, but other British rock'n'roll greats like The Kinks, David Bowie, The Zombies and many others. But the exploding energy of Supergrass delivers a deeply satisfying listen that does not exist as frequently in the present 2000's. This will definitely be a group that will represent the virtouso side of British rock'n'roll of the 1990's and 2000's, and without doubt represent the Bohemia-Intellectual-Hard Rocking spark that has lighten recent generations that has been going on since Circa-Sgt. Pepper. An intoxicating and highly addictive album. 100% recommended for anyone any age.</review_text>
When I bought this cd I did not know that much about supergrass.  The only songs I had even heard were "pumping on the stereo" and "sun hits the sky" and I liked both of these songs a lot.  So while I was cruising the aisles in the record shop, my eyes caught a glimpse of Supergrass is 10, so I decided to buy it because it was at a great price, and I am glad I did.  The CD has not left my car since I bought it two months ago.Every single one of the songs can get stuck in your head, and you won'tbe upset.  From the opening track "caught by the fuzz" to the finale "Wait for the sun" the album just rock throughout, and everytime I listen to it I want more.  The album clocks in at 71 minutes, but everytime I am done listenintg to it I feel unfulfilled.  That is a sign of a band making great music</review_text>
I had first bought the "Here and Now" hoping to hear the original recordings, but was slightly disappointed that on that CD the older songs were live performances only. If you want their hits as you remember hearing them on the radio or your old album that may be trashed, this is the CD for you</review_text>
This is the best CD I have ever listened to! I highly recommend i</review_text>
To start off i am a huge grateful dead fan and i have prabably about 150 cd's that cover many years of there carrer.  This release is very good and worth buying.  it has some great music on it and the price of the album is worth the eyes of the world with Branford Marsalis on the sax alone.  All and all this was among my first bunch of grateful dead cd's that i got and it got me hooked so do yourself a favor if you are thinking about listening to the grateful dead and you want to hear something from the 1990 era buy this cd.  But i would also get something from the 77 era too</review_text>
Buy this CD now if you don't have it, it is an instant classic. The beats are banging, and fit Cougnut and C-Fresh's lyrics perfectly. The lyrics are tight, and touch on many different things. &quot;The Last Breath&quot; is real life song about death and injustice, and decisions we all have to make in life. &quot;Protect What You Hustle Fo&quot; is gangsta, about the individual struggle/hustle. &quot;Tell Me Something Good&quot; (remix) is even better than the West Coast Bad Boyz version with Master P. Its about real life in the ghetto</review_text>
This Mos Def album is a good album to listen to.  He shows off his lyrical skills and gives social commentary that is on point.  Why listen to a bunch of guys who have "lil"  in front of their names when you can listen to a man give his views on life, love, and this country we live i</review_text>
Plain and simple...Cage is one of the best Underground rappers around.....And soon after Hell's Winter drops I think he will be accepted into mainstream......This CD is Cage at his craziest, the beats are hott, the rhymes are hot...BUY THIS CD....and if you like this CD buy some of his other CDs, Weatherproof, Night Hawks, Smut Peddler's : porn Again, The Leak Brothers: Water World, and Hell's Winter</review_text>
While nothing in the film works very well except perhaps the chemistry  between Travolta and Stowe, the sublime soundtrack is another story. Descriptions such as "haunting" and  "soul moving" are right on the money,  one might also add ineffable to the list.</review_text>
The Clean kick-started the illustrious New Zealand label Flying Nun in 1981, providing a key blueprint for indie-rockers from Australia (the Chills) to California (Pavement). Over this two-disc, 46-track set of rarities and essentials, the trio takes the chugga-chugga racket of the Velvet Underground and stretches it into an entire garage aesthetic of excited, rudimentary playing, shaky, Kiwi-accented vocals and endearing melodies. Disc one, as influential for the lo-fi sonics as for the songs, ends with the Clean's 1983 breakup. Disc two spans their 1988 reunion and 1996's Unknown Country, mining similar material with even more exciting (and even better-sounding) results. But by then, lots of bands were doing what the mighty Clean had helped pioneer.</review_text>
Stick to singing in Spanish, Shak</review_text>
Vet producer Don Was is aboard for this one and he pushes the Ladies to write some of their most mature material, relying on their trademark humour as a flavoring rather than a sole ingredient. The result is that even the radio tailored material is better than on "Stunt".Best tracks here are: lovers sparring in "Too Little Too Late", twangy "Go Home" (possibly the only time you'll hear a country tune with glockenspiel. Parental warning: this is one you'll want to skip if young ears are in the car because of a gratuitous F-bomb at the coda..), the tale of a co-worker dalliance in "Conventioneers" that ends with them feeling awkward about it ("So I wait, come in late, It'd be great if you transferred out of state"), the cheater finally caught in "Humour of the Situation" ("Have you heard the one about the boy who moved into the henhouse to sleep? He woke up with egg on his face, When he found that all the hens had crossed the street") and the ethereal "Tonight is the Night I Fell Asleep at the Wheel", which utilizes an almost Disneyish melody in its tale of a man in a traffic accident who, disembodied, surveys his own demise ("In all the confusion, there's something serene, I'm just a posthumous part of the scene").The least interesting tracks are "Off the Hook", another cheater gets him comeuppance tune and "Baby Seat", a gentle nudge to accept responsibility instead of wanting others to look after you.Bottom Line: While not as consistently fabulous as "Gordon", this one hits on all cylinders more than it misses and it utilizes more of the band's talents by allowing more lead vocals from Ed Robertson ("Pinch Me","Falling for the First Time"), as well as Kevin's first on the hidden track "Hidden Sun".You also hear the Ladies do things they haven't before: Steven's flute on "Tonight's the Night I Fell Asleep at the Wheel", Tyler's 808 drums for "Off the Hook", and a dash of retro courtesy of Ed's wah-wah pedal on "Conventioneers" and Kevin's vocoder on "Humour of the Situation"</review_text>
This is one of those rare CDs that you'll leave in your car CD player for months and not get tired of, because it fits most moods. Feels like Melissa Etheridge meets Cheryl Crow, with an old blues feel here and there, and some nice, heavy Tori Amos-like piano and vocals here and there too</review_text>
The Rosary is very well produced. A powerful tool to crush the devils head</review_text>
This cd is so awesome, It stays in my cd player and I have recently added it to my MP3.</review_text>
Just loved this CD!!!!  You'll be singing or humming this to yourself for hours after you hear it.  If you are 35 years old or older you'll LOVE it.  The memories will come flooding back to you.  Enjoy it!!</review_text>
What a wonderful and diverse CD.  Sit in front of a fire on a rainy day with a nice glass of Oregon Pinot Noir in your hand.  Close your eyes relax and let the sounds of Liebert surround you.  His talent is evident in the expressions as he's playing.  The guitar seems an extension of his own form, not a separate instrument.</review_text>
Spice 1's just different from every other rapper. And he's awesome. If you love hardcore rap, you'll love Spice 1</review_text>
This album is essentially a fusion of great musical minds.  The legendary Khan payes more attention to making this a better experience for the western audiences of the Sufi music by playing more with his (brilliant) vocal skills then with the lyrics.  Micheal Brooks' music stands out and enhances the experience further.  This is not to say that the mainstream Indo-Paki audience won't enjoy this album ( This is one of my all time favs).  It is fabulous background listening while doing work which may need focus - for those who need music to do such things... :)For those who have been thinking of testing out Sufi music, this is the place to start.  This is a fine introduction to the great NFAK and Sufi music.</review_text>
Despite the excellent screenplay by Sam Shepherd and the solid acting by Harry Dean Stanton, I found "Paris, Texas" a rather unimpressive film, and the only thing that kept it together for me was Cooder's astounding soundtrack. The music here is simple, yet very moving and even haunting. His guitar stylings really captured the mood and feel that the film was otherwise supposed to convey. It seems to seep right out of the desolate landscape of the Southwest. Every time I listen to this CD it reminds me of driving along some deserted highway in Nevada, SE California, etc. Also, it's really nice that the soundtrack contains the story ("I Knew These People") told by Stanton's character, since to me that was the best part of the movie. Even so, seeing "Paris, Texas" is not a prerequisite for enjoying this CD, the music is phenomenal in its own right</review_text>
The first four albums are so unbelievably great that for me it's almost impossible to say one is better that the others. Taken together, they are almost like one long album. The Family That Plays Together shows the band turning a slightly more commercial corner without sacraficing any of their artistic integrity. Their blending of styles is a bit mote intergrated than on the first. Randy California's influence on the music was becoming stronger as well. One thing that differd Spirit from most of their comtempories was the strength with whch they were able to convey their songs in concert. I saw the original version 11 times and they never failed to astound me. It's a shame that the only legitimate live recordings of the band are of the later Ed Cassidy/Randy California version. Not that the later versions of the band weren't great - they just weren't quite as good as the original band. If your'e just being introduced to Spirit, The Family That Plays Together is a fine place to start</review_text>
Eloy (name taken from H G Well`s Time Machine) is a German Atmospheric, Progressive Art Rock band that was formed back in 1969. Through the years, personal wise, the band has totally turned over, in some positions, several times. Their originator Frank Bornemann (guitars/vocals) has persevered, presiding over a three decade band, that has turned out some of the best progressive rock music, I've had the fortune to hear.OCEANOcean, their sixth album, released in 1977, is a concept album, depicting the rise and fall of Atlantis. Though there are only four tracks, they average almost eleven minutes each. Many Eloy aficionados point to this album as their `tour de force'. It is excellent, but as far as I'm concerned , based on what I've heard so far, there is no album that stands heads above the others.Overall, Ocean has an atmospheric ambience reminiscent of Hawkwind or a more unknown band that I once reviewed named Ship of Fools. It also reminds me Jeff Wayne's, War of the Worlds.Track listing1. Poseidon's Creation (11:38) **** Has a long droning medium pace and a whinny guitar intro. At the 4:40 mark, Bornemann finally begins the vocal. There is quite a lot of guitar playing on this song, augmented occasionally by the synth.2. Incarnation Of The Logos (8:25) **** Has an atmospheric vocal beginning. The song doesn't seem to have much of a melody until the 3:40 mark when the synth/organ takes over with a pleasant one, assisted by some percussion and a bell now and then.3. Decay Of The Logos (8:15) *** The shortest song at eight minutes seems a little jerky at first with more monologue than music. When it does get going after about three minutes it's still jerky in a medium paced beat. Strong synth playing through the middle.4. Atlantis' Agony At June 5th - 8498, 13 p.m. Gregorian Earthtime (15:35) *****This is a monster song. It is like nothing I've ever heard. Except for a fifty some second monologue at the beginning, "Atlantis..." starts with a truly intriguing eight minute plus instrumental intro. Not just any intro, like you're used to, with a full orchestra and violins. No this is an spacey atmospheric intro that would make the great Pink Floyd, envious, with the propitious use of ghostly sounds and special effects segueing into an amazing five minute organ bridge, with no beat just the Hammond a few side effects and you. No it doesn't get boring. Instead it sets you up for the vocals, which issue forth at about the eight minute mark. Slowly the rhythm section establishes a slow beat, while the singer does a great imitation of Bob Dylan, with a remarkable spacey synth breaking in between the vocal. But we're not done. With about two minutes left, the band picks up the tempo to a medium fast tempo (the first time I`ve heard them play at this speed). Now the violins join in with the guitar and synth for the finale of this great finale.Total Time: 43:53Line-up- Frank Bornemann / guitars, vocals- Klaus-Peter Matziol / basses, vocals- Jrgen Rosenthal / drums, percussion, flute- Detlev Schmidtchen / keyboards, mellotron, xylophone, voice- The Boys Of Santiago / chorus (1)CONCLUSIONOne of the factors, I find appealing about this band, is that in the span of three decades, they managed to present a style of music which was compatible with each era, so listening to their albums from different periods gives us a window into the progressive music of various time periods. Eloy's musical tempo almost never exceeds medium and on Ocean tends to be more in the medium slow range.Listening to this and other Eloy albums I hear influences from numerous other bands. Like many prog bands I hear Pink Floyd but I also hear Uriah Heep, Moody Blues and Bob Dylan (really, on track four!)</review_text>
Very good piece of music history. I still like the LP's sound a bit better then CD's due to some of the characteristic noise flaws but unfortunately LP's do not play in the car.</review_text>
I remember hearing of this band when I was just a lad, but I never owned any of their albums, and none of my closest friends played this for me, so this is a great discovery for me. I'm only on my second listen, but it's already obvious to me that this is going to become a favorite. It's from my favorite rock period, the early seventies, and it's not only nicely remastered, it's also remixed, meaning they went back to the original multi-tracks, not the stereo master. I wish more reissues were done this way</review_text>
Really enjoyed hearing all of them again. There is some great talent on here. I hope they all get their own opportunities! I do think in some cases there are some better songs to show off these great singers voices.</review_text>
If you want to learn about Texas music just buy this disc.  Tom's love of life and artist's eye infect every song.The opening number "Tonight We Ride" is hard to beat.  He sang it on David Letterman's show (Paul Shaffer played the accordian!).  Letterman described it as a "song that will make you want to saddle up a horse, ride up to Connecticut and rob a liquor store." Me, I just went out and bought some good Reposado Gold. Letterman's got a point, though- the songs on this disc will move you one way or the other.My other favorites are Bucking Horse Moon, and All This Way for a Short Ride.  Tom Russell is true American artist like Woody Guthrie or Pete Seeger, and this is one of his best.</review_text>
IF YOU LIKE BEATLES, MONKEES AND THE WHO, THEN YOU WILL LIKE THE GROUP THAT IS BETTER THAN ALL OF THEM ; THE RASCALS ! "LONELY TOO LONG" IS A SAD ROCK POP PAINFUL STAPLE IN YOUR 60'S ELBOW...IT HURTS...THEN THERES ALL THIS OTHER GOOD SH*** HERE...AND I DON'T MEAN GROOVIN ! THE HARMONYS AND THE KILLER KEYBOARDS AND TIGHT DRUMMING IN THESE LITTLE POP ANGRY YET CHEERFUL NUGGETS IS WHERE ITS AT !...I CAN REMEMBER LISTENING TO THE RASCALS INTERMITENTLY WITH BLACK SABBATH AND THE STOOGES...AND I REALISED THAT ABOVE ALL...I LIKED MY RASCALS RECORD THE MOST BACK IN 1987 UP IN THAT COLD LONELY BEL AIR GARDENING CABODE ! ALSO KNOWN AT TIMES AS 'THE YOUNG RASCALS' BUT TO ME...THIS BAND WILL ALWAYS BE THE ONE FROM WAY BACK IN CHILDHOOD THAT GOT ME LISTENING TO QUEEN AND THE WHO LATER ON........ITS HARD TO SAY THAT THEY ARE UNDERRATED SINCE IN ANY GIVEN CONVERSATION, YOU REALISE THE RASCALS GET TONE OF RESPECT AND PEOPLE WILL TAKE OVER AND TALK ABOUT THEM ; FIVE STARS...BUY THIS THING</review_text>
Fluke's latest album had been long in coming, and plagued with issues (word on the grapevine is one of the trend-setting trio left some point during production).  Still, years after their masterpiece Risotto, Fluke has returned intact and delivered another album, the oddly titled Puppy.Puppy is for the most part a dark album.  It's clearly the evolution of the track Absurd (off Risotto) and its particular taste of big beat techno, with numerous tracks featuring similarly styled lyrics and vocals.  The sound has been expanded with touches of industrial guitars and beats that would sound right at home in Prodigy's Fat Of The Land or at a Nine Inch Nails concert.  The opening Snapshot shows this most evidently.  The album takes up a rave feel with the tracks Another Kind Of Blues (a remix of the stellar number Zion featured in The Matrix Reloaded and its soundtrack) and Hang Tough, which flow into each other and result in a mesh of old-school rave beats with new-school industrial grooves.  YKK is a wicked track that would easily be at home in a big-budget spy or action flick, while Expo is a sweeping and epic song.  Blue Sky is as close to an uplifting number you'll find on the CD, with a full choir used in the song's chorus.Compared to Risotto, Puppy inevitably comes up short.  Like BT's Emotional Technology, Puppy has the misfortune of being the follow-up album to a complete and utter masterpiece (Puppy to Risotto, Emotional Technology to Movement In Still Life).  And let's face it: it's hard to surpass yourself when release an album that's nigh-perfect.  Still, I wasn't sure what to expect with Puppy and I found myself pleasantly surprised.  It's darker and meaner, but it's an overall rock-solid album, and fans of the grittier side of Fluke (Absurd, Atom Bomb) will likely be pleased with Puppy</review_text>
I recently decided to go through some of my old cds that I haven't listened toin ages. Dj Cheb i Sabbah's Maha Maya: Shri Durga Remixed&quot; was one of those cds that I came upon. This was my first exposure to Indian music, let alone world music. I wasn't really familiar with music outside of western culture. So this was a new experience for me. Listening to &quot;Maha Maya&quot; Shri Durga Remixed&quot; certainly takes the listener on a trip to India with its traditional Indian melodies. I envisioned myself in the Taj Mahal and watching a slew of belly dancers performing. The music took me awhile for the melodies to grow on me. It is certainly by no means your traditional dance remix album. I however dug Transglobal Underground's version of &quot;Kese Kese&quot; (Where's the Sarangi Mix&quot; right from the get go. It has a nice beat. Dj Cheb i Sabbah did a good job at mixing and making sure that the music flowed well together. I am definitely curious to hear dj Cheb's other cds now that I have re-discovered this little gem of a cd</review_text>
Hey there all, want to listen to some great songs by a country  artist, Chely Wright, then go ahead and purchase this CD you will be amazed at the talent Chely has. songs spanning from her ealier days to her current hits, a great collection for the diehard fan, and a great gift for those who have not been able to experience the very TALENTED Chely Wright</review_text>
This mix starts off heavy, and never lets up, with the quirky, yet hard hitting vocal track Grace (Anxiety) by Troy Pierce (as Louderbach) starting things off in a very energetic way.  This track worked well in Sascha Funke's Boogy Bytes 2 mix, but it was deep into the mix.  I feel it's even more effective starting a mix off.  Things quickly lighten up with the bloopy Claude VonStroke next, and then it's into the M.A.N.D.Y. remix of Tiefschwarz's excellent track Damage, featuring Tracey Thorn of Everything But The Girl on vocals.Two solid tech house tracks follow, especially Touane's snappy track Bassic, and it's right into the gritty, churning, techno sound of Thomas Schumacher's incredible track Rotor.  The mix then hits a very slight snag in track 7, which I feel is one of only two so-so parts of the mix.  It's not bad, it's just a little too light and bubbly tech house for my liking.  It's quickly forgotten as the mix races through with 4 solid tracks in a row, and right after the melodic Freefall, it's into Tiefschwarz's own remix of a Depeche Mode track.  This is the only other slight miss in the mix for me, as I feel the track was a tad too long at nearly 7 minutes, and could have been trimmed to better fit the flow of the mix.  Another solid melodic track is next, and we end with the dubbed out vocals of Kate Wax.Overall, it's an exciting tech house mix that's a full lineup of solid tracks, with not a bad one in sight, and very few dips in the scorching pace of one, very sound, top to bottom mix.  Do not miss picking this one up, as it's easily in the top 5 techno/tech house mixes this year</review_text>
How dare you compare Oasis to Phil Collins. Phil Collins sucks and Oasis rules! How come you don't get the message? You're retarded</review_text>
As much as I hear time and again that "Mindcrime" was the Seattle quintet's finest, I always have to argue that this 1986 gem is the pinnacle of their career. While I was a big fan of Mindcrime and it's predecessor "The Warning", Rage For Order is QR's most consistent release and is mezmerising from start to finish. In a word.."perfect".So few bands can boast having made a perfect album. I can think only of The Beatles (Sgt. Pepper & Revolver to name a few), Pink Floyd (The Wall, Dark Side), Dream Theater (Images & Awake), and Boston (Debut). Rage is an album to be listened to and appreciated. Released in the hey-day of "hair metal", this album has not one single song that lends itself to the tag. None of the songs, while very image provoking, could be easily made into an MTV hit. Although "Gonna Get Close To You" aired on MTV (rarely I might add) it didn't even scratch the surface of this album's potential.Overall, the performances of each member outshine anything before, or since. DeGarmo and Wilton trade licks masterfully. Rockenfield and Jackson keep a very tight bottom end. Tate...well...Tate was THE metal singer at that time and this was his finest performance.While the mix was somewhat lacking, the production was incredible. Each song blends into each other perfectly. This was metal that was unique and completely original. I think the term "thinking man's metal" was coined at the time. That said, I can think of no other release at the time to which that term could be applied. Unlike most of their metal contemporaries at the time, Rage was athmospheric, intellectual, and surreal. Rage succeeded where Priest's "Turbo" failed abysmally. It was a stark vision of the future and the metal was more futuristic than we'd ever heard before. It was like listening to a whole new machine. It still holds it's own 20 year later, seeming as fresh and "now" as anything in progressive metal.</review_text>
"Debut" is used to describe someone's first release.   Not their third.A Classic, 5 Stars...PMG in an exciting, formative mode</review_text>
This CD was beautifully sung by the Cambridge Singers, a boys/mens choir, mostly a' capela.  It's the first Christmas CD I've bought that really tempts me to crank up the volume so I can revel in every note</review_text>
This album / CD rocks! Can't stop playing it! Nuff said</review_text>
this is what music is all about, the emotion in a simple legato trumpet note, or the raspy, delicious vibrato of vocalist David Sylvian; it makes me melt and feel so good and pure. think if Tweaker were to make jazz--and really chill out--this is what it would sound like. you'll never hear a sweeter sounding clarinet, ever. there is everything one could want. possibly the perfect record. it's jazzy and cinematic and the double bass throughout is enough to make anyone melt and feel the emotion of the music course through their soul.absolutely brilliant and definitely essential.  one of my favorites from the year.</review_text>
If you like late 60s British rock-psych, tough-not-fey production/vibe, white-soulful vox, and mixing electric/acoustic elements (think: a cross among BEATLES + ZOMBIES + TRAFFIC + SMALL FACES, even a lil' BYRDS feel occasionally), you shimply MUSHT try ROLLED GOLD, which compares to the cream of these groups' output!!-"the Ac-WHO-"!? you might well say...'Where have they been all our life?'; 'A gem beyond price has languished all these years unsavored,' we repeat nearly speechless. Not since our belated introductions to Moondog...Skip Bifferty...Billy Nicholls...Stones' "Metamorphosis"...Dantalian's Vehicule...It can easily be yours.We very rarely care to replay any c.d. over and over but this one warrants such: well-crafted blend of nonchalance poetry and passion, delicacy and yarbles, hooks and chops and pacing and SONGS up there with the legends. The news that this cohesive album was only DEMO'S* ('haps fortuitous in retrovision) catapults one's estimation higher still.Singer Reg King: on ROLLED'S strength his visage deserves a spot on some Rushmore-in-Avalon alongside fellow soulful Brits Winwood/ Marriott/ Reid/ Lloyd/ Stewart...: just hoarse enough/just sweet enough (+ a 'secret': optimal use throughout of unison doubletracking)...perfection.ROLLED GOLD'S production is on the raw/monoish/hotly-compressed side-- a flute/piano occasionally to augment the basic guitar quartet formula & keep things unexpected-- suiting the songs & performances to a Tee (just to offer another clue to their magic brew).Homey's in no way related to any bandmember..</review_text>
I'm not sure what took me so long to get it, but I'm just coming across this album.  It never made a blip on my radar I guess.  Anyway, I saw it at a local record store in the used bin for $2.00 and it was hardly used -- even the jewel case was flawless (it looked like it was only played once and then taken back to the store).  Obviously the owner before me didn't know what they had on their hands and the store manager didn't know either due to it's low price tag.  Balance is a must have album without question.  It came out in '03, I'm just getting it here in late '05 and it still sounds fresh.  There are so many bangers on this album that listing them would make this a five paragraph review.  Of the 16 joints (including the bonus track), I'd have to say that 14 of them are amazing.  Akrobatik rhymes with an honesty and realism that is rarely heard in rap (even amongst underground emcees).  The songs compliment and play off of each other without them all sounding the same.I did mention that there were two songs that I could've done without.  Those songs are "Hand That Rocks The Cradle" and "Always Bet On Ak".  They aren't bad, but I find myself skipping them everytime I play this CD.Balance is a must have LP.  I still feel a bit cheated since I just found out about this album.  There has to be some sort of promotion for this guy.  I did get the Black Dialogue (Perceptionists) album and I knew about The Lost Adats and The EP, but somehow I completely missed this one.  Don't be like me, if you haven't heard this yet, grab it as soon as you can.  You won't regret it.  This is one of the best albums on 2003.  Highly reccomended.Standout Tracks: Time, Woman II, Remind My Soul, Balance, Hypocrite, Limelight, Front Days, Here & Now, Wreck Dem feat. Mr. Lif, Cooler Heads, Feedback feat. Diamond D, and Bone Crushe</review_text>
A great series concept - highly significant artists performing material which taken individually or collectively represents a major section of the  American Music Library. Ofcourse the originally withdrawn [w. new  at-the-time Funky people] &quot;Talkin' Loud..&quot; by JB (I bought it  retail! ) is the highlight, along with the live  &quot;It's My  Thing...&quot; by Marva Whitney. (Yes, I saw MW sing it **l-i-v-e** at  Madison Square Garden in July, 1969). The prev. unrel. Bobby Byrd track and  Vicki Anderson's contribution to the &quot;Cold Sweat&quot; session also  reinforce the value for listeners</review_text>
In 1976, MY FAIR LADY returned to Broadway, in a revival touted as the "20th Anniversary" production.  Perhaps most famously, this particular revival was the first big professional splash of a young soprano called Christine Andreas...At long last, this much sought-after cast album gets its CD premiere.  Christine Andreas is one of the best Eliza's ever captured on disc, and Ian Richardson's performance as beleaguered tutor Higgins is full of wit and humour.  George Rose (in a Tony-winning turn as Eliza's dustman father) is very enjoyable in his main numbers "With a Little Bit of Luck" and "Get Me to the Church on Time".  Jerry Lanning also makes for a fine Freddy, with the winsome "On the Street Where You Live". This recording also features the "Embassy Waltz" sequence, which was never included on the OBC, and only featured as a bonus track on the reissue of the OLC.The production itself heavily recreated the original production, complete with Oliver Smith's sets and Cecil Beaton's costumes.  Hanya Holm's choreography was revived thanks to original dance captain Crandall Diehl.  Christine Andreas picked up a Theatre World Award for her breakthrough performance.  The show opened at the St. James Theatre on March 25th 1976, but later moved to the Lunt-Fontanne Theatre where it closed the following year after 377 performances.The following year, Andreas returned to Broadway in another important revival, the 1978 production of "Oklahoma!" in which she made a thrilling Laurey (cast album available on RCA); before cememting her position as Broadway's ingenue of choice, with the role of Frankie Frayne in the 1983 revival of "On Your Toes" (cast album available on Jay/TER).  More recently, she played Marguerite St. Just, in the original company of Frank Wildhorn's flawed "Scarlet Pimpernel" (cast album available on Atlantic).I heartily recommend this particular MY FAIR LADY</review_text>
.and SO worth the price of admission.  6 CDs worth to be exact.   Coleman's musical voice is so free and full of life!  It really is beautiful</review_text>
I discovered this album some years ago as i'm workin' in big music stores i've got the opportunity to listen to so much music....well!! this album is a very difficoult one to find in a record store nowdays, and every time i have it in stock i play it straight away and some customer who listen to it buy it instantly,Blakey and Potato are swingin' so much in those &quot;salsa like&quot; rithms Mobley is -as usual with Art Blakey and K.D.- in such a great shape givin' a wonderfull touch to evry note he plays,basically one of greatest Blue Note of all time!</review_text>
This is by far one of the most beautiful recordings made by the Bill Evans trio. This was I'm told  Bill's first all ballads record. Riverside records released it on vinyl way back in 1962.  None of the music sounds dated. considering it's 41 years old. This is the first recording Bill made with Chuck Israels taking over for the late Scott Lafaro as the bass player. This album has a very haunting and romantic feeling to it. The music is sad in tone and suggests feelings of longing and sobering reflection. One goal that Bill always strived for was to ballance intellect with passion to make intelligent and  original sounding jazz. I dont even know if jazz is the right stamp to put on this recording. To me it sounds more like European classical music. Also thank god for Bill's college music theory teacher at Southeastern University Gretchen Magee.  Because if it werent for her motivation {Evans often thought of his work as unsatisfactory and sometimes needed alot of motivation from from bandmates and peers} he might not have composed his gorgeous original composition "Very Early" {which is the last track on the CD its just breathtaking...}Being an amature pianist myself, "Very early" and "childrens play song" were the first two Evans' compositions I taught myself to play. The piece is a composition played in C major at a slow waltz tempo. He played the tune until the end of his life in 1980, but the original version on "moonbeams" might be the all around finest one.  It is given a very slow and delicate treatment, and when he restates the theme at the end you can almost feel an imagrey of leaves or snow  falling gently around you. I also really like his interpretation of "It might as well be spring". I think that Bill Evans was a beautiful person and pianist because he was never flashy and this album proves that. He didnt play anything he didnt have to. He always played just the right amount of  notes and chords. With this record it all comes together coherently to make a truly stunning musical statement. Evans once told Tony Bennet to forget everything else and just concentrate on "truth and beauty." With the album "moonbeams" fans of Evans' music and important legacy will clearly be able to hear his own truth and beauty about life glowing from this gorgeous album. Highly recommended</review_text>
sounding thing occurred when ex-Springfield Messina melded with Loggins,and it was LARGE!C.S.N.&amp;Y. strove to be this good every time they released a tune. This compilation not only displays the music-crafting  abilities of these two in conjunction,but also showcases their power to  deliver dynamic LIVE performances. dedicated to Todd j</review_text>
A top quality recording with all of Artie Shaw's favorites.  Artie's music as fresh today as when it was recorded - with the power and appeal that hits you right between the eyes</review_text>
The opening song "Cups" by the Salt Lake City Orchestra was one of the first songs I downloaded on my ipod.  It is such a great mix!  I just love it!Oh yeah... and the rest of the CDs aren't bad either...  ;-)</review_text>
Leo Kottke is a national treasure.  He is our greatest living solo acoustic guitar virtuoso.  Having said that, you'd expect his CDs to be at a very high level of brilliance.  I have at least a dozen of his titles.  If there is any trouble in deciding the merits of any one disc, it's because there are so many Kottke releases to choose from."One Guitar, No Vocals" clearly ranks as one of the best.  The compositions tickle my brain, warm my heart, and put a bounce into my step.  The guitar playing is dazzling.  You really get a glimpse of the man behind the guitar by listening to this music - brilliant, thoughtful, odd, complex, quirky, a huge heart, and the wackiest sense of humor.  It's spirited music, so thoroughly drenched in the personality of its creator that it's unmistakably and immediately recognizable as Leo.The world is full of acoustic guitar instrumentalists these days.  Some of them are quite excellent.  Many are not.  But there is only one Leo Kottke.  And his guitar music is a gift to the world.A very strong recommendation for this CD</review_text>
I saw her perform most of these songs on Austin City Limits. I must admit I hadn't paid much attention to her since her debut album, back when I was playing in country bands.Much of this material is kinda introspective, but hey, on the plus side you get great vocals, well crafted songs, tons of sincerity and just flat out integrity from this great artist who doesn't have to pretend she is anything she isn't. And these days, that is pretty refreshing!I think I am becoming a fan</review_text>
And finding stories of stacks of old vinyls, dripping Yesterday and glowing Always.  Cali's finest, Madlib, is definitely one of the heirs of DJ Premiere, Pete Rock, DJ Quik and other previous beat konductas that helped established the sound of true hip-hop as a platform where old school soul and new school technique are amalgamated.  The latest Madlib Invasion is not for everybody; those of us who's butts were undeniably moved by Tribe's "Low End Theory" will definitely appreciate this endeavor.  Those of you who are tired of what MTV and other corporate entities and pass off as hip hop, clean out your crazy Uncle Otis's attic check out the Beat Konducta. Then walk down the street to Mr. Yancey's house, go into his basement and check out J Dilla's "Donuts.</review_text>
It's a testament to the noncomformity of the era that XTC's quirky debut album had the band initially lumped in with the late 70's first wave of British punk rock. Those were different times, after all. You couldn't find a teen punk these days who could make head nor tails out of the herky-jerky, spastic wit of &quot;White Music&quot;. Come to think of it, not many people could make much sense of it back then, either. Andy Partridge's elastic vocals refused to clearly enunciate any words with more syllables than &quot;pop&quot;, and Barry Andrews' keyboards were more an attempt to interrupt rather than complement each song. Nevertheless, the album worked. It rocked in its own art-damaged way, and fearlessly toyed with the sacred relics of the previous generation. That lone strum of a single chord at the beginning of the Fab Four's &quot;Hard Day's Night&quot; was cleverly appropriated for the intro to &quot;This Is Pop&quot;. A few songs later Dylan's &quot;All Along the Watchtower&quot; got twisted into ominous goofball paranoia. There may have been more intense punk artifacts from the Class of '78, but not many were anywhere near as smart as &quot;White Music&quot;</review_text>
Jeff Beck is the best guitarist on the planet and has been for a very long time.What you get here is an abbreviated version of him live.His song selection is not the best, but Freeway Jam which is one of my all time favorite Beck songs is included.You also ger Scatterbrain and Blue Wind.She's a Woman the old Beatles song is also included.Jeff Beck at this time was playing some of his best guitar and his solo instrumental career was taking off.The songs with the Jan Hammer Group to me are very average and infact distract what Beck is trying to to.Unfortunately this is his only Live album from his instrumental era. I truely wish he would release a DVD of himself in concert for those who either havent seen him live or would like to see him live on DVD.The idea was good, the Cd is too short and not up to snuff</review_text>
This is one of his best cd's. You really have to listen to the words on the cd, he takes you to  whole another level. He is one of the best r&b singers ever, just close your eyes and listen to the song "maybe" and think of that special place for you and your lady</review_text>
Europe and Japan - the final great pop frontiers !....last I heard it was Austin ?  - OH WELL !Canada shows love too...our favorite neighbors....do ya a favor !There are some really interesting Japanese based labels...search on web and be impressed !</review_text>
I have listened to this wonderful soundtrack and I think it is superb!! I now know that the ALIEN movies rock! The tone of the music fits the movie. I especially like &quot; Ripleys Them&quot; Because it reflects on what has  happened with Ripley through-out the movie. The cloning, learing,  remebering and also meeting her clones. I would also like to say that the  movie was  excellent aswell. The cast did a great job, acting their hearts  out.  Jean-Pierre Jeunet should be proud of the music and his film.So if  you aren't an Alien fan, you sure as heck will be after you listen to the  soundtracks!               ~   Jenna</review_text>
Its a pretty good mix, good song choices, its mostly a harder mix, thought it could be smoother flowing though, but all in all its pretty good, also thought the robot walk to the party deal woulda made a better begining, it was a lot of down time during the middle of the cd, but hey people gotta switch it up now and then, like the last 3/4s better...</review_text>
Hard, smart, creative funk can be a hard pursuit in life these days.  Even with the age of the reissue firmly upon us, finding a decently accessible funk album can be a real biyatch.Thankfully, "Secrets," under the usually readily available  Columbia jazz header is probably just sitting there in your jazz section pleading with you to pick it up for $9.99.  Should this be a hard decision? Emphatically: No.Although I can see where previous reviewers are coming from, trying to compare this outing to Headhunters is truly unnecessary.  With this '76 effort Herbs is definitely toeing the fine line between jazz, funk and disco but it all works.  "Doin It" is a super, super heavy funk jam and sounds like it was culled from the "Man-Child" sessions.  And although "Gentle Thoughts" can be interpreted as a dated sound it probably stands as my favorite rip on the album.  It's got a great walking bassline and super funky breakdown and, as always,  Herbie dancing on the keys.Go get "Secrets," don't think about it.  It'll always be an easy go-to funk bomb just when you need a little infusion</review_text>
For hard-driving well-crafted rock-and-roll from the late 70s/early 80s, you can't do much better than Pat Benatar (and Heart) and this collection carries most -- but not all -- of the singles that dominated the airwaves for 4 years: Heart Breaker, Hit me With Your Best Shot, Love is a Battlefield, Fire and Ice, Promises in the Dark.  But no Benatar collection is complete without 'Treat Me Right', 'You Better Run', and 'I Want a Lover who won't drive me crazy' (superior, in my opinion, to the John Mellencamp version), especially if you prefer Benatar's hard-driving rockers to her slower ballads.Nevertheless, 'Best Shots' is a great place to start and certainly - at $10-15 versus $50 for the more complete 'All Fired Up' --  the best value for the money.</review_text>
I was thrilled to see this available on CD .......... it is the most delightful Christmas 'album' of it's time & IT CONTINUES TO DELIGHT!  I purchased several and gave to friends for Christmas - every single receipient was immediately thrilled to have this 'album' on CD stating, 'this was my favorite, where'd you find it?"  Great gift</review_text>
Throb was my introduction to jazz back in '69 or '70.  I havelistened to it all of these years on LP then CD, and it neverlost its charm.  Steve Swallow was just as nutty then as he is now, "Chickens"is my favorite cut.  The play between electricviolinist Richard Greene and guitarist Jerry Hahn is a thing ofbeauty. Hahn is still a player who can put just the right notein just the right place (like that other countrified genius ofjazz Bill Frisell), he can fuzz and wah-wah then tinkle thestrings just right to make his musical point.  One interestingthing is the organ playing by Burton on Throb, besides his vibes.The Jarrett-Burton album also has Hahn and Swallow, and drummerBill Goodwin --It is very much an album that shows all the newideas sprouting in music.  Fortunately, the ideas of that timedid not die out, but have continued to grow, making room for allsorts of fusions in Jazz, many of which have been remarkable toexperience. These two-LPs-in-one is like having a Superstaralbum before they became superstars.  As I said before, Istill play this CD after almost 35 years, and I still get a kickout of it, and still find things that amaze me</review_text>
Which I suppose I'm not allowed to say, what with the worldwide phenomenon that was Songs From the Big Chair. But I think it's right. Roland took the opportunity following the breakup with Curt to make an aggressively postmodern record, and return to the steely-eyed austerity that the lyrics on The Hurting always suggested.  Indeed, this album is continually proving to be ahead of its time; as a previous reviewer noted, "Goodnight Song" has what has since become a familiar AOR sound. I call it the first "Coldplay" song, and it's fair to suggest that band would never exist without Tears For Fears.Roland also finally nails the pacing of an album here. On Songs and Seeds, 8 tracks was not enough to allow for a full dynamic arc, a sense of opening, progression, and completion; the 10 songs here have room to breathe, vary significantly between each other and finally close satisfyingly with "Goodnight".As both Roland and Curt have matured, they have also mellowed. The anger they felt at the world and towards each other seems to be gone. And their latest album, Everybody Loves a Happy Ending, has none of the dge that made their older stuff so energizing. But CDs don't age, so pick this sucker up. It really doesn't get much better</review_text>
I have both the &quot;Heat&quot; and &quot;Seduction&quot; CD's by Oscar Lopez and listen to both of them with wonder.  This man is magic.  I have about 20 &quot;new flaminco&quot; CD's and these are right at the top as  far as my tastes are concerned.  Oscar, if you're listening, I check at  least once a month for your next one</review_text>
The Animals, a group that included Eric Burdon and Alan Price, were the first major pop stars to emerge from Newcastle, a city located about 300 miles north of London, therefore far removed from where most talent scouts were searching. It is fortunate for us all that the Animals were discovered because they recorded some of the best R+B music to come of the UK in the sixties.Their biggest hit was House of the rising sun, a re-working of a folk song (apparently inspired by Josh White's version of the song) that gave them a transatlantic number one hit. They had five other top ten UK hits with Mickie Most, these being I'm crying, Don't let me be misunderstood (a cover of a Nina Simone song), Bring it on home to me (a Sam Cooke cover), We gotta get out of this place (the version included here is the UK version - a markedly different recording was released in America but was unavailable for inclusion in this set) and It's my life.Apart from their singles, the Animals recorded many other covers including Boom boom, Dimples, I'm mad again (all John Lee Hooker), Around and around, Memphis Tennessee, How you've changed (all Chuck Berry), I'm in love again, I've been around (both Fats Domino), Talking about you, Hallelujah I love her so and I believe to my soul (all Ray Charles). These covers clearly demonstrate what their main influences were, but they also wrote some of their own songs.All the music I've mentioned so far and much more can be found on this excellent compilation. Nevertheless, despite the title of the compilation, it isn't actually their complete recordings - there is a sub-text explaining that these are the complete recordings that they made with Mickie Most as producer, although the liner notes describe their whole career. After the split, they switched to another record label, where they had some success using the name Eric Burdon and the Animals, including two more UK top ten hits (Don't bring me down, San Franciscan nights) and several lesser hits, all of which can be found elsewhere (search for Eric Burdon). Alan Price left the group before the split with Mickie Most and had several hits as a solo singer. These are also outside the scope of this collection but are easy to find.This complete collection (apart from the American version of We've got to get out of this place) of the first and most important part of the Animals' career may be more than some people want - there are single CD collections available if you just want the hits - but if, like me, you like to explore beyond the hits, this is for you</review_text>
When this first was released I really wasn't expecting much. The last two releases Mega-Dave put out Risk, and the World Needs a Hero excluding the live Rude Awakening while certainly had some moments were 3 out of 5 material, but in defense they had to do what they to do to stay around. However, this album from the up tempo Blackmail the Universe, Kick the Chair which could have been on Rust In Peace, the Scorpion another return to form, and Back in the Day definitely were a few of the many highlights of this album. I wouldn't put this up there with Rust In Peace or Countdown, but I certainly would put this up there with So Far So Good or Youthansia actually this album kind of takes elements from those albums, and put's it into one. If your a new fan and just getting into Megadeth this isn't a bad place to start. Certainly a must have, and am looking forward to the brand new album next year. Long Live Mega-Dave</review_text>
Other than that this is a proper introduction to the Heavster</review_text>
Quite different from his later big-band recordings. Some of the songs that you may find on Wes' 'BEST OF' collections sound too much like elevator music. Not so with this debut album. A drummer, a organist, and a guitar player; no horn section. Stripped down in the sence of band size but very deep and articulate playing. He shows of his trade mark octave playing, his chord solos (played over the organs rythm chords none the less), and flashy runs across the fret board when needed. A good CD to start with for the guitarist who wants to play jazz.</review_text>
This is the latest entry in the lost legend series and it is the best alblum since the very first lost legends alblum release. The songs match up and compliment each other better than any of the previous alblums in this series, so well that it sounds like a dance alblum. I give it a high recommendation for any surf music fan. Try alldirect.com for the best prices on this series of alblums</review_text>
My personal favorite dashboard cd.  Every other one of their cds have maybe a few good songs that I like, but the places you have come to fear the most has pretty much a solid tack lis</review_text>
Five stars may be excessive if you judge this CD alongside the greatest classics, but when compared to similar CDs within the singer-songwriter folk-rock genre, this beautifully simple and powerful collection really shines.  I find myself coming back to this CD more often than to many better-known classics because it has a freshness and originality that sustain interest.  The writing, while occasionally a bit awkward, is consistently interesting, honest and moving.  The themes of introspection, nostalgia,  regret, and defiance are presented in a searingly personal manner.  The song "If I Were a Man" is a rich celeration of the wonders women bring to relationships and the world; "Child of Steel" plucks the heartstrings with an achingly wistful delicacy; and "Take my Body" is a strong lament about the objectification of women.  I especially love the pared-down guitar arrangements; the simplicity really works with Ms. Cash's strong vocals and makes me wish some of my other favorite vocalists would occasionally just get back to basic guitar accompaniments.  I've seen Ms. Cash perform live and, while she has other hits that may be more popular, this collection reveals her unique brilliance</review_text>
Even though Mitchell wanted to feel reckless in this album, she accomplished one thing with her music: coming closer to Weather Report.  It's obvious she loved its jazz-fusion and admired Jaco Pastorious and Wayne Shorter so much to have invited them to reach their peaks, but as master musicians they could only achieved what Joni allowed them to do. In "Paprika Plains" (a song over 16 min. long) Joni unloads wonderful lyrics but only allows her group of pioneers to explode at the last two and half minutes. I would have hoped to hear a longer and more robust instrumental finish worthy of Weather Report's reputation.  Over all the album is interesting because Mitchell is not afraid of going out on a very tiny limb....</review_text>
The Soundtrack is great but some of the good songs from the movie arent on it.  Overall it is a good produc</review_text>
Yeah, Johnny must've been drinking heavily during this recording. It's evident in his slurred lyrics...It's Raining is the song where he sounds totally wasted, although you can get the sense that he is infact quite happy and very relaxed. BUT  all this inebriation actually adds to the authenticity of this c.d.---- Johnny Winter really becomes the archetypal BLUESMAN on this c.d.  His guitar work is quite sparse, no long solos on this one but, nevertheless, the feel on this album is wonderful.   I have to say this also..Johnny must've been VERY, VERY brave to release this album back in 1977. That was a very bad year for the blues, appalling infact...disco music was king. Alot of bluesmen, like Johnny Guitar Watson etc were opting for the commercialism of the disco dance floor. Johnny might've thought of releasing a commercial type rock album , like Edgar was doing. Instead he chose to stay faithful to the blues and I have to admire the determination and resolve of Johnny Winter. Very few would've stayed faithful to the blues.The last track with Muddy Waters ..Walking Thru The Park...captures Johnny in his element. He was SO happy back then and it filters over into the song itself. I remember seeing them both do this song live at the Capitol Radio Festival, Alexander Palace, London/England in July 1977. Never again to be repeated, sadly</review_text>
I really like this cd a lot and I am looking forward to seeing them live</review_text>
I prefer the live versions of these pieces. Its nice to get more material from that period but you can hear the strain that was going on at the time of this final album by this line-up. I was at the concert for live record and think that they (the pieces that are on this CD) really come alive when being performed live</review_text>
OK (I imagine there's still drool over my &quot;earlier&quot; review...and my wife is none too pleased either...) TRUTH OR DARE time! I bought this CD out of none-too-scientifical curiousity, that, and &quot;Let Me Blow Ya Mind&quot; - and guess what?  I'm beginnin' to dig the entire CD.  As I mentioned, 99 &amp; 44/100th% of &quot;rap music&quot; fully explains to me what Gregg Allman meant when he sang, &quot;It's not my cross to bear.&quot; OK, that being said, Eve pulls no punches (although the &quot;skits&quot; on the thing about wet myself laughing), and she's not a lady whom'd I'd like to cross.  But &quot;I bought the ticket, so I'm gonna take th' ride.&quot;  And enjoy myself mightily while doing so..</review_text>
A friend of mine at work just recently introduced me to the music of Chris Rea via this very nice Best Of comp. He also recommended getting his Road To Hell cd. Both of these cd's were money well spent. I'm surprised that this artist flew by my radar screen in the 80's when he was at the peak of his songwriting and popularity, mainly due to his top 20 hit "Fool (If You Think It's Over)". For some reason I never equated that song with this artist. The thing I like most about Rea is his musical diversity. He can lay down a very memorable AM pop hit like "Fool" or "Let's Dance" and then turn around and make a great blues rock album like "Road To Hell". No matter what the genre of music, this artist is very good at laying down a nice groove. There's plenty of catchy tunes to be found throughout this cd. "Auberge" and especially the wonderful "On The Beach" stuck out for me. But you get many styles here. And each song sets a different mood. From the easy listening "Winter Song" or the catchy "Looking For Summer". Or some excellent blues rock like "Road To Hell", "God's Great Banana Skin" or the excellent instrumental hidden track at the end of the cd that shows off Rea's tasty slide guitar skills. I don't know how I missed this artist after all of these years. But I'm a new Rea fan who now looks forward to his next album. Whatever style that it might be, I'm betting it will have some versatile playing and some very well composed melodies like this superb Best Of. This is a nice place to start listening to this fine artist. If your like me, after hearing this cd you'll probably want to search out some of his individual albums. I've since picked up his late 80's album "Dancing With Strangers". Another very nice cd. Most of the music on this Best Of cd is almost 20 years old, but it feels like it could have been written today. In other words it's well composed music that holds up very well over time. And I'm sure if your like me and not familiar with Rea's music, the minute you hear "Fool" or "On The Beach" it's going to bring the good part of the 80's back to you. Greatest hits cd's should all be this good. Highly recommended</review_text>
This record is a must from the middle of the 50's .Excellent singer , very good musicians and an excellent recording .This record is still amazing and seems to sound very modern due to the quality of the recording and the mastering.I recommend this record to all rock and roll fan</review_text>
Ummm if you buy it you will know I borrowed it from a friend and he never  got it back...so I bought him another</review_text>
I pretty much agree with EJ Rupert, but the good songs on this soundtrack are so strong that they make this album damn near classic all by themselves.  I gave this album 4 stars for that very reason.  Though it was never released as a single, "My Block" is one of Tupac's best songs (pre death row era is the best 'Pac in my opinion).  I don't think there's any question that every rap music fanatic recognizes Red and Meth's "How High" as an unquestionable classic (and this is the grimy version of How High....not the fluffy remix).  I still get open to that beat 11 years later.  Though it is somewhat formulaic, "Poppa Luv It" is still a dope cut from LL Cool J.  Bone Thugs N Harmony, Mary J. Blige, and  Onyx contribute "Everyday Thang", "Everday It Rains", and "Live!!" which show each artist in vintage form in my humble opinion.  Also, "Sowhatyousayin'" is the ideal west coast gangsta track in my mind.  Even when you get past those great tracks, you have other bangers like "Kill Dem All" [Kali Ranks], "Glamour & Glitz" [A Tribe Called Quest], and "Still Can't Fade It" [Warren G.] that still make for a great listening experience.  Hell, even The Dove Shack blew up on the strength of "Summertime In The LBC".  And the live version of Biggie's "Me & My B*tch" is definitely different from the studio version and it's great.  There's plenty to love about this album.I also agree that there are too many filler tracks.  "What's Up Star", "Ol' Skool", "Domino's In The House" and "Zoom Zooms & Wam Wam" all fall under the filler category.  Actually, the filler tracks are the only things wrong on this album and I'd say that only 10% of the album is filler.  The rest is bangin'.The Show Soundtrack is definitely a worthwhile pick up for any hip hop fan.  There are bangers on this album that make it a must own.  If you were into hip hop around the time this came out, you remember when half of these songs were played for the first time.  There are definitely some classic tracks on this album.  I highly recommend it.Also, for those of you that want more artists represented, check out the "Rhyme & Reason" soundtrack (which is pretty much similar to this, but with better collabos).  You'll find a lot of artists there too.Standout Tracks: Poppa Luv It, My Block, Live!!!, Kill Dem All, Summertime In The LBC, How High (My Favorite), Everyday Thang, Everyday It Rains, and Me & My B*tch [Live</review_text>
This is an awesome EP Slayer owns all even when the production isn't that great. Kerry King and Jeff Hanneman shred fast as hell with their blazing fast riffs, Tom Araya's vocals are very hellish and gruesome and Dave Lombardo's drums are fast as well. This EP is Slayer at their prime and even if it's only four songs it's well worth the price. Below are my views on each song.Chemical Warfare 100000000000001/10, Yes it is that awesome, this is a legendary Slayer song and a fan favorite. If you're gonna buy this for one song this is it, the lyrics are great and I love the riffs in this track.Captor Of Sin 10/10, The opening of the song is great. The song is really good too. My second favorite on this EP as well.Haunting the Chapel 7/10, I didn't really care for this song much, it's good but not mind blowing.Aggressive Perfector 10/10, Slayer's first song ever, the opening sorta reminds me of Metallica's "Hit The Lights" but the song is very different though. A part of this song sonds like the guitars are making video game like noises. The vocals are also a little different from other releases but it's still awesome.Overall this EP was a great follow up to their debut. It also led to what the band would later become, thrash legends. A must have for fans and general metal fans alike. Highly reccomended</review_text>
We bought this - on cassette - in Washington DC on our first day of honeymoon in September 1997. Having flown from Northern Ireland, it provided us with the perfect honeymoon soundtrack as we drove from  Washington to Nashville, along the Skyline drive, down through South West  Virginia, across Eastern Kentucky to Berea, and down to Smoky Mountains  National Park in Tennessee. We are from an Ulster-Scots/Scotch-Irish  background, and during those three weeks we fell in love with the land that  our forebears had settled in so many centuries before, bringing thier  fiddles and folk songs with them, creating what was the core of mountain  old-time music and bluegrass. From the Carter Family right through, every  song is a classic. You must buy this</review_text>
This album is hard! E-40 always come sic wit it. If you don't got it, ya betta git it. It reminds me of his (my fav.)&quot;I a major way&quot; album. Sluppin' from intro till outro. He is the bay area's finnest. Please belave it</review_text>
More like 3.5.So. Half of this album is excellent. The rest is filler. But, due to "Times Like These", "All My Life", Disenchanted Lullaby (the intro irritates me but it gets better), "Have It All" (kinda sappy but I love the intro), "Low" (have you SEEN the video?) and "Overdrive" (again, kinda sappy but there's something about it I love), the album is pretty enjoyable. It doesn't compare to the first three, but it has its moments. The riffs are slightly heavier, most songs are pretty upbeat. "Times Like These" is an instant classic with awesome lyrics, while "All My Life" rocks harder than pretty much all previous songs. Kinda sucks how the best songs are/were singles, but if they had released other songs, no-one would buy the album. Mind you, my friend loves "Burn Away", so listen to the previews and make your own mind up</review_text>
I heard this music on the excellent P B S Documentary: &quot;Liberty - the American Revolution&quot; and I knew I had to have it! It is the finest music I have heard, capturing the heart and soul of the American Revolution. The documentary &quot;Liberty&quot; was a masterpiece that was beautiful and moving. So too this music with its most wonderful arrangements and accompaniment. I love it! I could hardly wait to get it in the mail. It framed the documentary (which I also bought) like a great frame compliments a beautiful canvas painting. Superlatives fail me. This music must be experienced by first watching the great series on the American Revolution and then by listening to it apart. This is some of the most wonderful music I have ever heard. It reminds me of the genius of Aaron Copland who wrote the Applachian Spring and Rodeo suites</review_text>
This is a great CD. &quot;Back Where I Come From&quot;, is on of those feel good songs that gives me chill bumps every time I here it. Chesney is a extremely talented artist whose passion is shown in every song. I  recommend all his albums</review_text>
Very rich in music, fully orchestrated and full of energy. I highly recommend this album for everyone who loves New Age music and to all those who like Classical Music. David took it to another level on this one. I myself like New Age artists that incorporate Orchestra to their music and that is why I loved this album. If you like this album, I recommend you to explore Yanni, Secret Garden, Giovanni and Bernward Koch</review_text>
The music here frequently reminded me of Pagan's Mind with a touch of Porcupine Tree and flashes of Iron Maiden.  A fantastic mixture of 1970s Progressive rock bands such as Yes and Kansas molded with European-style Power Metal and Brazilian folk music.  While this can be extremely interesting there are a few moments here and there that don't quite mesh.  In actuality I give the CD 4.5 stars for its superb songcraft and inspired, sometimes flawed ambition.  But as an overall package, this Special Edition of "Temple of Shadows" is an excellent place for newcomers as the bonus DVD holds a concert in 5.1 surround sound that is loaded with songs from their back catalog.  This is a great album filled with high quality Progressive Power Metal and a DVD concert that gives a taste of their other albums (not to mention it's just plain fun to watch as the band members are clearly enjoying themselves, smiling throughout the show).  Highly recommended.</review_text>
Solas' previous CD &quot;Words That Remain&quot; is a classic in Irish traditional music and the loss of Karan Casey certainly affects their sound on this album. However, instrumentally they are incredibly strong and as inventive as ever and Deirdre Scanlon is a gifted singer with a wide range of styles. I don't think the choice of tracks is quite so strong but it is a powerful performance of a very high order of music. The instrumental playing at times leaves you breathless and the energy levels are very high. There are some lovely songs - i like &quot;Bonnie Mae&quot; and &quot;Miner's Life&quot; in particular and &quot;I Will Remember You&quot; is an original gem. I am disappointed to hear critics complain of the lack of &quot;traditional&quot; music on the CD and about the use of &quot;rock&quot; instruments. Based on those criteria the only instruments tolerated would be harp, uillean pipes, wooden flute and fiddle (tin whistle (flageolet), guitar, mandolin, bouzouki, accordion and banjo being modern, foreign invaders)and what a pity! What defines traditional - is it pre-Planxty? Can no more traditional songs be written? Seamus Egan and Co have done their apprenticeship in the rigorous disciplines from the book of traditional music (rhythm and melody) and have enriched it with a new chapter. In general i agree that bass and percussion is often unnecessary but in this case the augmentations are tasteful and generally effective. I would also highly revcommend Liz Carroll's &quot;Lost in the Loop&quot; although if you're a purist it has the Solas rhythm section playing on it and features many of Liz's &quot;brand new&quot; traditional tunes (brilliant)</review_text>
First off, I'd like to say that I am not a Country music fan, but I am a Johnny Cash fan. He transcends the genre that turned his back on him in his later years, but here the man can do no wrong. Now, I bought the 2000 "expansion" release of this concert which at the time was dubbed the "complete concert recording". It was misleading because I had seen the British documentary (the DVD of this is included in the set)in which Johnny &  friends were performing songs I never knew existed from this legendary event because they were absent on CD. Now this is the full sha-bang, complete with amazing packaging, the concert spread over two CDs, and the DVD mentioned above. If you bought the previous CD like I did, let me tell you, this is worth the upgrade as it seems this is the "definitive end to all release" of Johnny singing to the boys at San Quentin.For new fans, the single CD release might be the best place to start since it has at least 85% of what Johnny sang that night at San Quentin. The rest of the legacy tracks feature The Carter Family, Carl Perkins, and The Statler Bros.So if you're looking for a "Johnny Cash" solo concert, then get the single CD version. If you want the absolute complete version in a great package, 40 page booklet, and he Legendary British Documentary of this concert for the first time on DVD; The Legacy Edition of this memorable night is the way to go</review_text>
Mountain Music offers what Alabama is famous for, great music and great harmony all packaged together. The title cut is great, that harmonica and &quot;old man of the mountain&quot; intro is unique. As for &quot;Close Enough to Perfect&quot; if any man sings that song to his lady, she is his forever. The cuteness of &quot;Never Be One&quot; also reminds us of the sadness that our children grow up so fast we hardly know it. There isn't a bad song on the whole CD and will make a good addition to any collection</review_text>
Better balance of songs on this Cd. This Cd shows growth in a the band.They are great fun live check them out if you get the chance!!!!!!!</review_text>
This is a wonderful view into what is the best and worst about a Tedeschi concert.  She can be as soulful as the best of the blues singers but it also exposes her weakness:  She just can't rock enough to provide the balance her act needs.  She's terrific on the ballads but isn't a good enough guitar player to hold up the guitar playing for a band so they have to make do with her fabulous vocals.  She's got solid keyboards and vocals in support, so it's not apparent until half way through the gig.  But keyboards can't provide enough of an edge to the very few fast, upbeat songs and the whole concert lags.  Zzzzz by 2/3rds of the way through.  Look at the audience at the end of the concert when she plays a lethargic version of "I Fell in Love."  Very few people (besides the B3 player who has kept the only energy up through the show) are energized.Put this DVD on when you're in bed with a glass a red wine with your loved one and the fireplace is going and it'll be terrific, at least until you fall asleep</review_text>
"The Passion of the Christ - Songs" is a fine collection of great songs, each in their own way a reaction to the spectacular film that Mel Gibson has created. The standouts are the song "I See Love" by Steven Curtis Chapman, Third Day an MercyMe; Scott Stapp's powerful solo debut song "Relearn Love;" "Rainy Day" by Big Dismal, and the emotional "New Again" by Brad Paisley and Sarah Evans.  Despite a couple of songs that don't reach their true potential ("The Passion," and "How Many Lashes"), this is a fine CD that belongs in anyone's and everyone's Christian music collection. Grade: A-</review_text>
if you are a fan of Oscar Peterson this belongs in your collection</review_text>
If you are a fan of the Winter's Solstice series, than you will enjoy this cd, especially if you like the earlier volumes with the more original pieces rather than mostly traditional christmas music.</review_text>
Sorry, ya just can't replace Michael Hutchence. This is a great overview of all of their greatest hits.  I am not a huge fan of greatest hits CDs b/c people tend to buy them and, therefore, miss all of the excellent songs that weren't released as singles.  All INXS CDs are worth buying separately. But, if you must.....this will work</review_text>
Miss Saigon is my favorite all-time musical!  I was hesitant when buying this recording because in my mind Lea Salonga is and always will be Kim!  But I was pleasantly surprised.  Joanna Ampil as Kim holds her own.  While she doesn't have the vocal range of Lea, she has a beautiful, crisp voice which she uses to emote the emotional turmoil of Kim.  She expresses herself in a way that makes you feel her love, pain and anguish and in turn she makes this part her own.  The rest of the cast is superb (especially the amazing Ruthie Henshall as Ellen) but make no mistake, this show belongs to Ampil!I also fell in love with some of the material left out of the LCR.  There a beautiful bridges and songs which enrich the story.  "Back in Town" stands out for me because of the gorgeous melodies.  Anyone who has fallen in love with the story of "Miss Saigon" will appreciate these added gems!  This cast recording is definitely worth a listen!</review_text>
In many ways, this album is everything one would have expected-- somehow the natural successor to "No Pussyfooting" and "Evening Star".  In other ways, its nothing like I would have expected-- the usual stamps of Fripp and Eno's recent work seems to be missing.Its really quite hard to largely identify the identity of the musician generating the sound on much of this material, there's obvious stuff (we'll come to that in a minute), but as a rule, the backgrounds could be either of them.  Sonically, it moves through a number of backdrops, with delicate, percussive, synthish loops dominating the early part of the record ("Meissa", "Lyra", "Tarazed"), wheras the middle of the record feels more like their old collaborations updated, the sort of modern Fripp soundscapes being more apparent ("Lupus", "Ankaa").  The remainder of the album features on track that is totally unexpected, the downright funky "Altair", with its train shuffling rhythms, drum loops, and funky guitar (in ways similar to material from the Eno/Schwaum "Drawn from Life" record), and the closer, "Terebellum", is an aggressive, haunting, and almost angry sounding piece almost reminiscent of "Radiophonics" or the other more aggressive soundscapes.Over this material, Fripp largely solos using a variant of his legendary fuzz tone-- its a bit mellower, and rounder though, similar to his leads on "Starless" and "The Power to Believe Part II" but in a more hushed feel.So that tells not much, the real question is, what's it like?  Largely an ambient affair, the collaboration is what you'd expect-- there's no real incindiery moments here-- don't look for a "Baby's On Fire", but it is comparable to their previous collaborations in quality, and it certainly sounds nothing like Crimson.  Some of it is full of delicate beauty ("Lyra"), some of its just a blast ("Altair"), some of its actually quite hard to listen to at all ("Terebellum").For fans of ambient music, especially the work of these two gentelemen, this one will be quite rewarding.  It falls short somehow of being a masterpiece, but it is really a great record.  Recommended</review_text>
Hands down, a 5 star, two thumbs up, classic joint.  After it dropped, Puba reigned supreeeme.  Disregard the Amazon reviewer, there are no "gaffes" in this one, period...  These guys were true to their beliefs.  They weren't packaging a product for "pop" consumption, they were telling a generation what THEY THOUGHT.  Check it out and the music will speak for itself.  The best track in my opinion was "Wake UP", but the whole album was great.  As someone else mentioned, fast tracks put it in the 90's but most of the tracks are relevant sound as good as ever.</review_text>
My roomate from two years ago had a cd of Doris; and I must admit, at first, I was a little skeptical.  But soon I became stunned by her vocal prowess and the emotional heart juice that she brought to these classic  songs.  Plus, you should see her in a football uniform!  Man can she catch  the pigskin</review_text>
This is Roxys last gasp...I mean "wheres Eddie Jobson??" Actually this really a good recording, its just that the first 5 Roxy Music albums were so flawlessly perfect that its hard to stand up against that level of perfection...anyway..with that said...I have NO IDEA why they took off the great rock version and put the disco-fluff version of Angel Eyes, which is hard to find on CD. This, to me is really the last Roxy Music Album, because you just CANT have Roxy Music without Paul Thompson...sorry. I mean Avalon and the others are nice pieces, but they really should have been Bryan Ferry solo albums because Andy and Phil are really playing more as session players there</review_text>
I wonder if the two reviewers who said they were disappointed in this soundtrack watched the film? My guess is that they did not. The film was ENHANCED by the James Horner score and it would have been hurt by anything that was not light and subtle. It is a unique and amazing film and the score is a perfect match. By the way, the bigwigs at Universal nearly died when they heard it and then were equally stunned when they asked Horner for the written score and he had to admit that none existed!WONDERFUL MUSIC</review_text>
What can I say about Vince Gill that his many fans haven't already mentioned.  I had never been particularly interested in country music.  But, one day I was listening to a country radio station and Vince Gill was singing &quot;When Ever You Come Around&quot; and I was hooked. This CD is as consistant as all his others. Great lyics and superb musicianship. I rate this five stars as I believe Gill is one of the best singer songwriters in the world today</review_text>
Brilliant, glorious music--all of it, although I agree with those who have come to feel that the Ellington/Strayhorn version of &quot;The Nutcracker Suite,&quot; in particular, is an all-too-often-buried treasure that no Christmas season should be without (and if you can ignore it for the rest of the year, you have more willpower than I).  What happens to Tchaikovsky's marvellous music--and Grieg's, too--in these hands is creative homage of the highest order: the music is re-imagined from the inside, in wholly jazz terms, in a way that simultaneously illuminates and completely reconceives the original.  What Balanchine did for Tchaikovsky and Stravinsky in dance, Ellington here does for Tchaikovsky and Grieg in another realm of music, and leaves us with works that deserve to be every bit as loved and celebrated as their older and better-known prototypes.  And to top it all off, you get Ellington and Strayhorn's own superb &quot;Suite Thursday.&quot;  Listen and rejoice</review_text>
This CD is Dave Bromberg's best effort. Playing solo allows his guitar playing capabilities to be clearly demonstrated.</review_text>
I love this album but the other review from Anonymous is wrong. this cd is not remastered. I baught this cd because of that review and got burned. The cd even says right on it AAD. in other words analog recording/analog master/digital playback. I will say this much though, the transfer is better than MCA's version which I own. However, If you want a remastered version of the song Monster look to the "All Time Greatest Hits/Original Recording Remasterd" cd From MCA. It also Has Move Over from this cd, I Love this cd and want it remastered. If you gotta have this album (I Do) than this version sounds better than the MCA version</review_text>
This is one of the ultimate collection's of pure music at its finest....1 problem thou...on the inside cd cover all the tracks have the wrong names...kinda crazy if u like to rip songs for your collection :(</review_text>
This album has new meaning to me now in 2007, where I go to a college next to a high school, where I see a bunch of "punk rockers" spending lots of money to make sure their hair is pretty and that their clothes are properly tattered to maximize trendiness.  There are plenty of punk rock bands out there that keep the spirit of Social Distortion alive, but sometimes their music is hard to find, and all the posers you see start to slowly extinguish that old punk rock fire.  Albums like this exist for times like those.  Just stick it in, turn up the volume, and rock out</review_text>
I felt compelled to write a review having read another written by someone who gave it one out of five stars.  I felt it a grossly misleading and inaccurate review, so here I am...As a musician I could think of nothing more intimidating than attempting to cover a Buckley song.  Their fan bases are fiercely loyal and protective of their material.  So first things first I would like to congratulate the artists for their bravery.  Furthermore a quick glance down the list of performers will quell any suspicions that this is 'just another tribute record cashing in on someone else's success', these are musicians that know what they're doing.What struck me the most was the variety of voices on this disc; you have the ethereal whisper of Sufjan Stevens, sweet folk harmonies of the Magic Numbers, the lazy drawl Micah P. Hinson.  Not only that, but these are great interpretations from the Jeff & Tim cannon.  Very inspired and innovative - a beautiful accordion riff on 'Grace' , an Irish-jig inflected 'No Man Can Find The War'...these artists do not desire to replace Jeff or Tim, they're merely reuniting us with what they left us - their music.</review_text>
Basie's best players come to Duke's place, the Columbia Records 30th Street Studios in 1961 and face Ellington's finest. Not a battle, but not quite a merger, either, since the Count's contingent is heard in one speaker and their hosts in another channel. There's more than an hour of good music on here, laid down in the dying days of big jazz touring orchestras. Popular tastes had changed and the costs of keeping large groups of players together were impossible. This is one of those rare CD's in which the booklet is almost as good as the music. This one reveals that during this 12-hour late-afternoon-to-early-morning session, one of Ellington's long-time employees quit the group forever because the boss would not take his side in a fight with a colleague. Also interesting is the dispute over the title and cover graphics. Basie hated Columbia's first idea to bill the date as a competition, and his agent even destroyed the only copy of the original cover art. The end result is an album whose sales over 40 years have been hurt because no one knows its name. The cover finally chosen says "The Count Meets the Duke" but in larger letters it declares "FIRST TIME!" and then adds "2 Great Orchestras" and finally states "Duke Ellington and Count Basie." The label Columbia/Sony put on the disc itself for this reissue says "Duke Ellington MEETS Count Basie" which makes no sense because they had known each other since the 20's. If you already like both orchestras, you'll want to own this late career session. If you want an introduction to each group in its waning years,  the CD serves nicely for that, too. This disc really jives, so don't be expecting any ballads here</review_text>
This arrived the other day, I pre ordered it. Two of the greatest songwriters ever in my opinion. Its about time this was available on CD and here it is. Sounds great! Go get it for the collection</review_text>
I get the sense that The Fleetwoods'body of recorded work isn't given the respect it deserves. Over the course of their career, the trio recorded thirteen albums and yet this collection, as good as it is, is pretty much all that's out there on cd, save for a few other compilations that cover much of the same ground. Rock and roll has always had a soft side and it's in this area that the Fleetwoods really shine. Their cover of Thomas Wayne's &quot;Tragedy&quot; is an evocative slice of 1961 teen angst-I can't put it any other way. Maybe that's the reason why the Fleetwoods are given short shrift today: they're the perfect embodiment of a (then)nascent teen culture's soft and gentle side.This collection features all of their hits, some well chosen album tracks and the original pre-overdub version of &quot;Come softly to me&quot;. If you like this recording, try looking for their original lps. (My personal favourite is the 1963 &quot;Goodnight my Love&quot; album.</review_text>
If you're a Dion fan don't miss this CD. All the hits including my favourite - Donna the Prima Donna</review_text>
I don't like this album as much as their earlier stuff. I have liked each release less than the previous, and this one falls right in line with that trend. The opener &quot;Quality Revenge . . .&quot; is one of their best songs hands down, though. This is a very good CD, but the farther from Braid we get in time the less I seem to like their music</review_text>
My first Monk album was Monk's Dream from Columbia.  I loved that album 15 years ago and had been searching for the same satisfaction from the multitude of Monk recordings from the Blue Note Years, Presitge, and Riverside.  What Monk's Dream offered that the prior work lacked, was production.  Raw, edgy, spontaneous ...yes all those recordings offered that.  But I longed for that sense of confidence, tightness and richness of sound Monk's Deream provided.  I found that in this set which makes sense since Monk's Dream came out of these sessions at Columbia.  So what if these are reworks of the old stuff...they sound just as new and gripping &quot;produced&quot; as they did in their earlier days without big money helping out.  WIll I throw out my older stuff and just play this? No chance..there is a time for polish and a time for purity</review_text>
What makes a voice distinctive and memorable? Nat (King )Cole I believe had the smoothest voice of any male singer. Clarity and a sureness in phrasing was also gifts of his. Aside from 'Unforgettable' the songs I best remember are 'Mona Lisa' and 'Nature Boy'. But this recording also includes originals of the 'Nat King Cole trio'. It also includes  the famous duet put together of 'Unforgettable' from his early version and his daughter Natalie Cole's recording made after he had passed on. That particular recording was a 'knockout' sentimental and beautiful.</review_text>
This is their best studio album.  What more can I say?  Brokedown Palace may be the most beautiful rock song of all time.  A must</review_text>
I purchased my first Weill recordings in 1960, the off-broadway Threepenny Opera, and Lenya's Berlin Theater Songs. I have treasured them all my life. Lenya was, of course, incomparable, but Ute Lemper carries on her special genius. This new recording is as near a perfect realization of this unique masterpiece. John Mauceri gives the unique orchestration nuance that even Klemperer missed in his masterful Kleine Dreigroschenmusik. Every member of the cast, even the bit roles, is perfect in the characterization. Kollo is the first performer since Harald Paulsen (the origninal Mackie Messer) to bring all of the tradition of Viennese operetta to this music. He is a miracle. Macheath has subtle characteriztion hitherto unknown except from Paulsen. Most noteworthy is the Jenny of Milva. Two delightful bonuses in the recording: a reprise in Act 2 of Seerauber Jenny by Milva (the Jenny) and the inclusion of Lucy Brown's aria after the Jealousy duet. There is brief dialog before most pieces which  adds a dramatic integrity to the recording. I cannot find high enough praise for this new treasure</review_text>
I admit when I listened to this album I was blown away by the powerful content of Kenny G's music. I was moved by the story line and also by the music that was used during  the movie. Kenny G's music is perfect for this kind of movie. Not only that it adds flavor to the movie by his sensual playing of saxophone but also adds mood to the entire show. This is the perfect soundtract for the movie Dying Young because it just simply shows the real mood in the movie</review_text>
That Nigga's Crazy and Bicentennial Nigger both surpass this album in laughs, but it would still rank high if it wasn't for the poor sound quality--there's a few audience members who can be heard a lot more clearly  than Pryor himself half the time.  But some great classic bits, and believe  me you're never bored</review_text>
THREE SIX MAFIA has out done there self with this new guy CHROMEabout every song is decent which is hard to find these days</review_text>
This talented woman can sing anything. I really enjoyed this cd with the lights turned down and a glass of wine to relax after a very stressful day at work. Renee could definitely have another singing career outside of opera should she choose. Hearing her drop that gorgeous voice down one octave rivals the best chanteuses in the business - Cassandra Wilson, Nancy Wilson, Regina Belle, Sarah Vaughan, etc. This cd of different musical styles reminds me of Nina Simone and Cassandra Wilson, two great singers whom could interpret any song genre and make their versions special. I loved all the songs and the standouts here are "Haunted Heart", "River", "My One and Only Love", "My Cherie Amour", "Cancao do Amor", and Beatles "In My Life", and "Hard Times Come Again No More".I hope Renee keeps recording whatever catches her fancy because I'll certainly always listen</review_text>
I can't believe the harshness of some of the comments on this album.  Not a lot of in between among the notices -- those that hate are mean and heartless.  Very hurtful.  Lousy counterpoint to her warmth.  I don't think they understand that she doesn't have to lose control to be meaningful and touching.  Take her as an original instead of as a mimic.  What do I hear?  I love her lush voice on this album and Fred Hersch's brilliant piano accompaniment.  Bill Frisell is very good, too.  I love jazz & pop as well as opera.  Ren?e Fleming can make it any of these genres. These songs are very much her own interpretation.  They are 'deeper' than what you've heard before.  Even if I prefer Nancy Wilson or Eva Cassidy singing "You've Changed," Ren?e Fleming sings it warmly and beautifully, in her own style, and very touching, too.  She's not carried by full orchestration, mostly just Fred and her.  I was going to write that "My One and Only Love" was especially good, but as the cd kept playing, I must say that they are all especially good.  Enjoy</review_text>
When a young artist names her first two albums not &quot;Judy&quot; or &quot;Collins&quot; but &quot;A Maid Of Constant Sorrow&quot; and &quot;Golden Apples Of The Sun&quot;,you know she takes herself seriously.Originaly released in 1961. and 1962. their names were all I knew until I saw this CD recently.&quot;Who will buy this?&quot; I wondered just to see the only copy snatched right in front of me.The comparisons with first two Baez albums are inevitable (some songs were recorded by both) althought Collins shows much more passion and involment where Baez seemingly seduces herself with the beauty of her voice.On these early albums Collins is frighteningly devoted keeper of the flame and her repertoire is almost exclusively traditional - which means not only ethereal beauty but also a certain (to some ears,overpowering) seriousness,cleverly mellowed by inclusion of joyous &quot;O Daddy Be Gay&quot;,a cousin to her &quot;Grandfather&quot; recorded years later.Althought I honestly love these songs and listen only this CD for days,these early albums are today much more significant as seeds of Collins later trademarks (voice will soar much higher in the future,she slipped W.B.Yeats into traditional folk collection just to later blossom into first-rate art-pop singer) and as they were product of their Greenwich Village times,they may sound a bit dated to some modern ears.But they are still hauntingly beautiful to me,I waited their re-release for too long</review_text>
Excellent 24 track compilation of this surperb psychedelic Dutch band. Each tune was a single sometime between 1965-69. These guys are NOT to be confused with a U.S. band from the same era of the same name. Cuts that make this CD a true keeper are "Sun's Going Down", the tripping "Feel Like I Wanted To Cry", "Keep On Trying", the familiar sounding "Touch" and "Ballad Of John B". This is yet ANOTHER band I've heard at least one or two tracks on the Rhino release of 'Original Artyfacts: Nuggets II' 4-CD box set.Should appeal to fans of Pretty Things,Q65,early Beatles,Creation and The Action.A must-have</review_text>
La pelicula es mas o menos, pero la banda sonora es buena, en especial la cancion #1 CRUSH de GARBAGE, es una excelente cancion...</review_text>
I put off buying this for many years.  Having heard many posthumous albums that were just hideous, I didn't want to taint my perceptions of the Queen legacy.  So I ignored this album.  Then, one day, I was listening to Innuendo and that old curiosity crept in again.  I came here and read many positive reviews, so I took the plunge.  I came out the other side very content. The legacy had not been tainted.The album is uneven in places, but the songs that are good are VERY good (Mother Love, Let me Live).  With some albums like this, it is often easy to tell that the vocals were spliced in.  Now, I don't know exactly how this was done, but the songs feel seamless, even the dance track "You Don't Fool Me," which I can picture being blasted at high volumes in a late-night club.  Of course there is some sadness in the songs and that feeling that time is running out (especially in "Mother Love"), but upon the conclusion of the album, I want to say to the Brian and the boys (men), "You've done good.</review_text>
Ms. Melua is from Georgia.  Her voice is quite like the Swede, Lisa Ekdahl.  Neither has range or power; both have a little girl voice and plenty of finesse.  Both have musical partners.  In Ms. Melua's case it is Mike Batt who is to her what Nelson Riddle was to Linda Rondstadt, except that, in addition to arranging and conducting and coaching, he writes songs.  Most of this album are her and/or his songs.  They are well written and well treated.  They are are a careful team abnd do not cut corners.  Mr. Batt, among many other things, worked with Steeleye Span and Art Garfunkel long ago.The original sogs are interesting and liquid pleasant in rendition.  But my favorite cut is her rendering "Blues in the Night", which some might remember from Looney Tunes cartoons many decades past; "My mama done tole me..." it starts.  Knowing she cannot belt it, instead she works it.One short note on Steve Sale's engineering because another reviewer was crabbing about reverb and above all, clipping.  Perhaps because I bought it on vinyl, but I hear none of these defects.  My set is revealing, and it reveals excellent engineering, considering the largeish ensemble Mr. Batt has assembeled.  Fear not, unless the CD really is badly made</review_text>
Watching the Melvins evolve was extremely interesting and entertaining. They began as an unassuming punk band, and proceded to incorporate the heaviness of 70's rock into their sound. Then they stripped away any and all of the "punk" trappings and went for pure HEAVY. It all culminated with this record. It just doesn't get any heavier than 'Roman Bird Dog/Hung Bunny'. 'With Teeth', rumored to actually be written by Joe Preston, is one of my all time favorite Melvins songs. Speaking of Joe Preston, he was the by far best of the Melvins' 7000+ bassists they had over the years. Shame they got rid of him shortly after this album. As soon as they fired him, they went straight down the greased pole to mediocrity Hell. Bad karma. Thank God that rock bands record their music so that it isn't lost forever every time they make stupid decisions. The only song on this record which I don't like is the cover of Alice Cooper's 'The Ballad of Dwight Fry'. Thankfully they made up for it with a cover of Flipper's 'Sacrifice'.Some of the Melvins' subsequent records have their moments (Stoner Witch's 'Shevil', Stag's 'Cotton Mouth'), but for the most part it seems to me that the Melvins gave up the ghost after recording this. Maybe someday they'll make a comeback</review_text>
When I bought this CD it was for a little bit of nostalgia - Those Were The Days.  Since playing it once when it blew me away with the tracks and the memories, I have played it so often that if it were vinyl it would be worn out by now.  If you liked Mary Hopkins then this is a fantastic selection of her music and well worth a place in your collection</review_text>
I am a Motown,Oldies,R&amp;b,Soul,Love Songs, music Lover.I like the songs  that hit the heart and soul and hearing them brings back memories that come  alive to the rhythem and Bill Withers definately fits right in there. I  don't realy have a favorite artist because I like sooooo many of them but  if I had to pick my top 10, this album would be in there</review_text>
no diggity was a monster hit in 1996. If you love this album you will also love michael jackson's dangerous, which was also co-produced with teddy riley, the lead singer of blackstreet</review_text>
I just saw the movie and throughly enjoyed the performance by all the actors involved.  Kevin Spacey has a velvety, smooth voice.   I was surprised to learn his background is in musicals.  He has a beautiful voice and in this movie, it rocks!!!  Love the music!  I highly recommend you buying the CD and the DVD</review_text>
All of the Isleys early work without the younger Isleys is just as good with them. But these early workouts are more raw-stripped down and pop-oriented. Ron Isley has a way of making country, and rock remakes sound like they were never before recorded. Not too many black artists can do that. To get a taste of the &quot;Real Isleys&quot; before the &quot;Mr. Biggs&quot; persona, get this with &quot;Get into something&quot;, and &quot;Givin' it back&quot</review_text>
Julieta Venegas did it again. She scored an album that is not alternative in style, however it is very catchy pop music. Her melodies are perfect for a morning drive with the radio on. You can sing along and express day to day feelings. Julieta continues to use instruments I like such as the harmonica. And of course, Julietas nice character and her lovely behavior shine through in her public appearances. My personal favorite is "Me voy", a very positive song about a not so positive event, breaking-up. Keep up the good work, Julieta. Your songs are appreciated.</review_text>
I thought this album was good not great, but saying that i do recomend it to everyone because it does have some great songs it.The best songs on the cd to are.2. Comfortable Liar3. Send The Pain Below4. Closure5. The Red6. Wonder What's NextAnd my favorite track is #2 it sounded so sweet, you will love that song</review_text>
One can't go wrong with this one.  A classic, which according to the well written liner notes was recorded 3 days after opening night.  And, a pit orchestra that sounds like a pit orchestra...before the days of electronic music</review_text>
...heart-wrenching break-up with his girlfriend of 8 years, Elastica's Justine Frishmann.  13 is a dark record, produced by William Orbit.  Nearly every song is injected with despair, sorrow, bitterness, and an achy, heart-breaking sadness.  These moods are encompassed on such tracks as Tender, 1992, Battle, and the tear-jerking No Distance Left to Run.  Also included are the trip-hop masterpiece Trimm Trabb, the humourous Trailerpark and B.L.U.R.E.M.I., and Coxon and Albarn's co-written pop-masterpiece, Coffee and TV</review_text>
The relaxation set is just that, pure relaxation.  I love the active relaxation CD.  I can read or work and I am real calm, on an even keel, feeling like when you go to sleep at night, not quite asleep and not quite awake.  I also enjoy the water and the piano playing.  Highly recommended</review_text>
Ministry Of Sound has always had the reputation of putting out the best music.  They have a way of findind the best DJ's, Artists, producers and remixers from the 4 corners of the earth and bringing them to us on a CD.  This CD is no exception. Soothing beats without lacking in tempo or energy, this CD could literally be enjoyed by a cowbow from Kentucky.  It's just that palattable</review_text>
It all started when I was a little kid and my dad gave me this album (he wasn't a fan, he probably picked it up with a crate of used records.)  It was one of my first exposures to rock and roll.  Nearly 30 years later I still own the original vinyl (the one that had the exploding fire extinguisher rooster album cover.)  I am glad to have it now on CD, the vinyl being about as scratched and pitted as can possibly be and still be remotely playable.  I dissent the reviewers who praise DuCann over Crane, for really, it IS after all Vincent Crane's project (Crane, also organist for Crazy World of Arthur Brown.)  A keyboard player myself I consider Crane one of my biggest influences and I hold great admiration for his playing.  DuCann and Hammond also deserve praise for their performances, but it should be painfully obvious who the star of an organ driven rock band is: Um, the audience ... er, no the organist!  Take a trip back in time and enjoy this classic work</review_text>
This is such an good industrial album, that I was sitting and listening to it and all the adjectives that I wanted to use seemed not good enough. However, if I have to put one then it has to be these, brilliant, astounding, stupendous and awesome. This is probably one of the best industrial albums of all time. The first track is good and then it just gets better and better. In fact the first track is not as good as the other ones and could have been replaced with another track. The book-let is ok but the lyrics are missing, but still it is an important release since it showed that inudtrial bands are tallented muisicians and can sing. Minphaser, Life Line, Guna are some of the best made industrial tracks ever with the intricate layers of sounds, bets and samples. The keyboard sounds are constantly amazing and this is an album not to be missed if one likes industrial music</review_text>
Adios Marks the real goodbye from KMFDM.  After they went on to do MDFMK which was decent and then they came back.  Attak, was really weak because it was all Sascha and Skold and though I like them both, the absence of Gunter Schulz and En Esch really made this album absent in itself.  WWIII though it is a better and pretty decent album, KMFDM is still a little less present.Adios gives us the remnants of what KMFDM fans know as KMFDM with Skold present but not taking over completely (Though I like Skold, But we need a break) We saw Nina Hagen lend her voice in "Witness" which is amazing, along with Ogre from Skinny Puppy in "That's All" and "Full Worm Garden" great tracksA little bit of Pig and Schulz's insane guitar riffs and you are all set. Even though En Esch was very minimal in the recording, infact I barely remember him...  Currently Working on "FUBAR", we'll see if KMFDM will impress again, They have it still, they are just not using their talents as of late, C'mon Sascha, you're great man, but get over yourself and get Schulz and Esch back... Bring back KMFDM... What would Skinny Puppy be without Cevin Key? what would Ohgr be without Ogre? What would Foetus be without Thirlwell? c'mon man.. Bring us back KMFDM...</review_text>
My 8-month-old son and I listen to this CD every night, and by the Pachelbel Canon (track 7) he's usually sound asleep.  It is NOT ALL SYNTHESIZER.  The jacket clearly states that the "Music Box Orchestra" includes flute, piano, cello, percussion, english horn, and oboe.  As a musician, I am not offended by the "easy-listening" versions of these classics.  In fact, I enjoy them.  They introduce my son to the timeless melodies WITHOUT OVERSTIMULATING HIM at bedtime.  I find them relaxing too</review_text>
This CD was well worth the wait!  It contains music and artists that were previously unavailable and not even heard on the radio in years.  I took one of the CDs out of the box, put it in the player, and within minutes my wife and I were dancing.  The sound quality, in my judgment is solid, the packaging is fun and creative, and the booklet containing the Cameo Parkway "story" was an interesting read.  There will always be arguments about stuff that was included and not included, but this is an excellent overview of a wonderful era.  What great fun to hear the Orlons, Chubby Checker, The Tymes, The Dovells, Bobby Rydell, and Dee Dee Sharp once again.</review_text>
I can't say enough how great this album is. Grant Green was one of the most soulful jazz guitarists who ever graced the planet. His soloing on this CD is filled with beautiful melodicism matched with a bluesy grit that is such a pleasure to listen to. And for me as a guitarist it has been an encyclopedia of how to play blues from a jazz perspective. My favorites are &quot;Miss Ann's Tempo&quot; and &quot;Blues for Willarene&quot;. It is such a shame that he died so young and never collected his just due</review_text>
This is one of my personal favorites.  I bought this CD when my daughter was 1 month old.  We would listen to it during those "late night" feedings to create a peaceful environment.  I'm pretty sure it was a benefit for her.  It was definitely a benefit for me</review_text>
I was introduced to Nitin through my cousin who lives in England. She saw him live in London and raved about it...so off I went in search of this artist. He was difficult to find; nonetheless I was determined. I am one of those people who love music from almost all genres, cultures and corners of the globe. In other words, I am not a radio-pop saccharine sweet loving music listener. I look for music that proposes thought (although I do believe even top 40 has its place) If you are looking for an album/artist that resonates emotion, along with a powerful subtlety check Nitin Sawhney out. You won't be disappointed.</review_text>
Chandos' Grainger Edition is a significant contribution to modern art.This particular volume (Vol. 14) features Grainger's settings of various folk and popular songs which he made in the first quarter of the 20th Century.  The accompaniments are set for small ensembles, and Grainger utilized the harmonium on many of the song settings on this disc.Sound is 24-bit</review_text>
This is Jeff Beck's best album.  A masterpiece of guitar work.  This is an all instrumental album that features what Jeff does best - play guitar.  The supporting band is excellent especially the drum work.  Production quality is excellent as well.  While I wouldn't consider JB a blues guitarist I would consider him one of the top 10 guitarist ever and this album show cases why.  A great companion album to Blow by Blow is Wired.  It's a shame that after Wired his record company made him go back to albums with vocals.  He has on a roll and at a level that he has rarely gotten back to. If you like guitar and can live without vocals buy this album. You will not be disappointed</review_text>
Forza Eros!  May you live to make much more great music! Whether you  understand Italian or not, I heartily recommend this CD. In Ogni Senso  lives up to its billing- it delights each and every one of the human  senses, in ALL &quot;sense&quot; of the expression. This is a must-have for  any true music lover</review_text>
Lead singer and co-founder David Gates was recently inducted into the Songwriters Hall of Fame.  This album is one prime example of why.  David has consistently provided beautiful melodies with easy, sensitive lyrics.   His last album was a country album called &quot;Love Is Always  Seventeen,&quot; which was a genre-crossing mix of pop and country,  co-produced and performed with Billy Dean.  But back to this gem.   &quot;Guitar Man,&quot; and &quot;Aubrey&quot; were the big hits off of  this album, and they still stand the test of time.  &quot;Tecolote&quot; is  one of their most unusual departures, and still makes me laugh, while  enjoying its musicality and orignality.  &quot;Didn't Even Know Her  Name&quot; is a poignant lost love song; &quot;Welcome to the Music&quot;  is one of those opening songs bands sometimes did to orient their fans to  what to expect.  Even Larry Knechtel gets in on the vocals with the  intriguing &quot;Picture in My Mind.&quot;  It's a great album---in fact,  there's not a bad &quot;Bread&quot; album out there!  Enjoy, and relive  those magical moments of the glorious seventies</review_text>
This is what I grew up with on the radio, and listened to at the dance halls.  This is not some sissy nashville sound.</review_text>
I purchased this CD after reading one of the reviews.  I have another Streetwize CD that I love, but I was a litter weary about getting this one (Jazz meets Dre and all).  But I am glad I made the purchase, as I am thoroughly enjoying it</review_text>
Like many before me,this "blue" Beatles best-of served as my first,in-depth sampling of The Beatles' output from their post-'Revolver' era from early-1967 onward... You couldn't find a better 100+ minutes of music to listen to straight through than the superb 28 tracks that make up 'The Beatles 1967-1970'. I bought this initially back in the winter of 1988 (I was 18 at the time) on cassette,and it changed my life. True; the 2-cd version often retails at $34.00,which is a bit much,but the material contained is beyond priceless.. About the songs. The songs!! There's not a lame one among the batch of 28. What's even cooler is that -even as the songs unfurl chronologically- they pack a flow to rival any of anyone's favorite best-of albums... The flow of all 28 is remarkable... A fantastic mix of all their late '60's #1 hits as well as choice album cuts ("A Day In The Life","I Am The Walrus")... Seriously folks; anyone who is feeling the itch to discover The Beatles' later output should get this "blue" best-of first,then graduate onto the studio albums themselves.. That's what happened to me and I wound up (so far) buying all of the albums from 'Rubber Soul' (1965) onwards... This blue '1967-1970' never disappoints. Because the liner notes/inlay booklet doesn't tell you which album each track is culled from,I'll happily fill you in:Disc One:1.)Strawberry Fields Forever(John in vocals)2.)Penny Lane(Paul on vocals)(Both originally released as a stand-alone single in early 1967 and both served as the first tracks recorded for what would be 1967's "Sgt. Pepper's Lonely Hearts Club Band". However,the two songs weren't released on any Beatles' album until late-1967's 'Sgt. Pepper' follow-up 'Magical Mystery Tour'.)3.)Sgt. Pepper's Lonely Hearts Club Band(Paul on vocals)4.)With A Little Help From My Friends (Ringo on vocals)5.)Lucy In The Sky With Diamonds(John on vocals)6.)A Day In The Life(John and Paul on vocals)3-6 from the legendary 'Sgt. Pepper's Lonely Hearts Club Band'; 1967.7.)All You Need Is Love (John on vocals)8.)I Am The Walrus(John on vocals)9.)Hello,Goodbye(Paul on vocals)10.)The Fool On The Hill (Paul on vocals)11.)Magical Mystery Tour(John on vocals)7-11 from 'Magical Mystery Tour'; 196712.)Lady Madonna(Paul on vocals)13.)Hey Jude(Paul on vocals)14.)Revolution(John on vocals)12-14 all stand-alone singles released in 1968. All were/arehuge hits. Sweet!Disc Two:1.)Back In The U.S.S.R.(Paul on vocals)2.)While My Guitar Gently Weeps(George on vocals)3.)Ob-La-Di,Ob-La-Da(Paul on vocals)1-3 taken from 1968's double-album 'The Beatles' (aka "The White Album").4.)Get Back(Paul on vocals) (Originally recorded 1969 as a single and not released on album until 1970's 'Let It Be'. Twistedly,'Let It Be' was recorded prior to 1969's final Beatles' studio album 'Abbey Road',but not released until later...)5.)Don't Let Me Down(non-album b-side to the "Get Back" single; John on vocals)6.)The Ballad Of John And Yoko (non-LP stand-alone single; John on vocals. One of the very few Beatles tracks recorded with only John and Paul playing all the instruments..)7.)Old Brown Shoe(b-side to "The Ballad Of John And Yoko"; George on vocals)All of the hits plus some choice b-sides as well.. Yeah!!8.)Here Comes The Sun(George on vocals)9.)Come Together(John on vocals)10.)Something(George on vocals)11.)Octopus's Garden (Ringo on vocals)(All culled from 1969's *true* final Beatle masterpiece,'Abbey Road')12.)Let It Be (Paul on vocals)13.)Across The Universe(John on vocals)14.)The Long And Winding Road (Paul on vocals)12-14 from 1970's (actually recorded early 1969) 'Let It Be'.So there you go... 28 of THE very best music ever to grace the world... (Seriously.) Please do yourself a favor and check out *any* Beatles' music. But a choice place to start certainly is here. Have Fun/Enjoy/Peace!Thanks for your time.Tim GoyerAlbany,NYUSA6/28/0</review_text>
Sombre Romantic is a step up if you will in the gothic metal genre. It is a very solid album from start to finish but has alot of layers that keep things interesting. Its not what you would really consider to be a "religious" album but there are many undertones that help get the message across. This point being made very clear in "Museum of Iscariot" which talks of Jesus from Judas' point of view.Rowan's vocal stylings change to meet the moods of every song on this album, from low opera type to screaming, in a superb way that stays consistent and never gets old. If you are into  relaxed darkwave/goth music this is a perfect album to purchase</review_text>
This is a great Movie Soundtrack!. I'm a PASSPORT Fan since I was a kid back in the 70's. I have all Klaus Doldinger's official releases with his Passport signature. Please go and look for this CD "Running In Real Time" from Passport and listen to track number 2: Auryn. Then go and get all his Passport releases (almost 20 CDs since the 70's). Then you will see why Klaus Doldinger is very creative</review_text>
Great Music, Great band. This is a must buy. Recommended to all hard rock lovers</review_text>
After leaving (or being dismissed from) Pink Floyd in 1968 due to his LSD use & erratic behaviour, singer/songwriter/guitarist Syd Barrett re-emerged in 1970 with his debut solo album, "The Madcap Laughs." The album did not come easy, as Syd never fully recovered from his drug use, and it clearly shows in his ragged performances on "Madcap Laughs." Producer Malcolm Jones did what he could with Syd for about half of the album, before handing the production reigns over to Barrett's former Floyd mates Roger Waters & David Gilmour to finish the job. Throughout the album, bum notes are played, beats are missed, and Barrett sings off-key. And on the rocker songs, the session players (from the group The Soft Machine) sound like they are struggling to keep up with Syd, who could hit a rough patch at any moment. For any other artist, this would all be nothing short of disastrous. And YET....in the case of Syd Barrett, any and all mistakes are immediately forgiven. Why? Because Barrett's songs on "The Madcap Laughs" are all wonderfully written, and although Syd's voice and guitar-playing are obviously not in tip-top condition, you can plainly hear on this album that he's trying. He's really, really *trying* to do his best, and his efforts really do shine through. For every bum note there's a passage that Syd plays beautifully, for every missed beat there are many beats that are hit right on schedule, and for every note that Syd sings off-key, there are many moments where his very distinctive, British voice is magical. And of course, there's Syd's lyrics. You may not know what all of them actually *mean*, really, but to my ears, they're still poetry. The rockers are still powerful ("No Good Trying," "No Man's Land," the rockabilly fun of "Here I Go," and the classic "Octopus"), and the softer numbers still have great beauty to them ("Terrapin," the passionate "Dark Globe," the effective "Golden Hair"---based on a James Joyce poem---and "Long Gone"). Even the more ragged numbers like "Feel" and "If It's In You," somehow still hang together quite well (amusingly, we even hear some brief banter from Syd in the middle of "If It's In You," as his voice goes wildly off the map, he stops playing, prepares for another take, and finally gets through the song). When all is said and done, "The Madcap Laughs," warts and all, is an excellent album. It is a flawed masterpiece, and it shows that Syd Barrett, even with his mind irreversibly fractured by this point, was still a genius musician.</review_text>
Though I am only 33 years old, I grew up listening to Bob Wills.  Merle Haggard did a great job with this one (as he always does).  I got goose bumps listening to it.  It took me back to my childhood when I would sit on  the porch with my Grandfather listening to Bob Wills.  The only thing  missing is the scratching of the needle on a nearly worn-out album</review_text>
This is just a great CD. Whenever I need to restore inner harmony after work, or dealing with any upsetting situation, this is the one I go to. Instantly I am transported to the calm, soothing setting of a traditional Japanese house and garden. It is fantastic for meditation, too. Let all the nonessentials of life slip away while you listen to this beautiful recording</review_text>
Del the Funky Homosapien has been my favorite MC for years, and this album doesn't dissapoint. The DVD is raw, and packs in lots of live footage, interviews, and is well produced.If you are a fan of Del, you know you have to pick this up.</review_text>
Metheny's an innovator and has been all over the map over his long career in terms of styles, moods, textures, and sounds.Here we have an early effort in which he takes his guitar and overdubs an introspective, wide-open-spaces musical journey across America, weaving in jazz, folk, country, rock, mountain music, and everything in between.  If you love his work on Joni Mitchell's Amelia (performed live on Shadows and Light), you'll love the sound of this record.The mood is mellow but not dull, quiet but not silent, and the results are spectacular.  This is the cd to take with you on a trip across the western frontier, or a short hop to Burger King.  Works either way</review_text>
Tame's music is all about the beat. It's what got me right from the start, a grinding, repetitious backbone to every song. Tame One rides every beat on these tracks without faltering and shows some true style in his delivery. Tame gets rid of the verse-hook standarda, periodically ad-libing and allows the music to play when he feels like pausing. Its an amazing album well worth purchasing.</review_text>
while i am not a big fan of john mcLaughlin or mahvishnu orchestra - i cannot deny that they really had something with this album.. It is something new - not just an extension of miles davis - they were breaking new territory...  There is a cohesiveness amongst the band members - of course abounding with improvisational talent - this is fushion but first of all it is music</review_text>
I bought this CD before going to see MMW (with John Scofield) for the first time at First Avenue in Minneapolis Dec 7, 2006.  I had never heard of them before and liked the clip on the venue's website.  So I bought a ticket and wanted to get "Out Louder", which I knew they were going to play, to familiarize myself, but the store I was at was out of it.  So I bought "End of the World" instead.  While some of it was a little too spacey for my liking at first, I still liked the overall funkiness of it all.THEN....I saw them PLAY.  You MUST see them PLAY!!  I didn't ever want it to end! I immediately wanted to see them again!  It's less than a week later and I have 2 more CD's ("Out Louder" and Scofield's "A-Go-Go" which they "back" him on) and 4 more on the way from amazon as I'm writing this.  I'm like an ADDICT now!  I HAVE to have them on in the car and in the house.  I get back in the car after having been in a store or whatever and they're on and all is right with my world again.I must say I like "Out Louder" and even "A-Go-Go" better than "End of the World", but only slightly.  It IS trippy with the synth and the other guest players, and I do like it better after a few listens.  I just prefer MMW with less guest musicians</review_text>
I cannot stop listening to the song I Saved The World Today.  The CD is worth the price for this song alone.  The whole CD is great though ... classic Eurythmics that sounds as great today as their earlier work.  Annie Lennox gets all the attention ... and she deserves every bit, but Dave Stewart certainly deserves as much.  They make a great team and this CD should have been given much more attention in the USA.  I hope they don't take so long to do another one</review_text>
Hell Rell did his job, I wasn't expecting anything as good as this. Hell Rell OUTDID himself.</review_text>
As a former piano major I can assure those who would purchase this dusc that it is well worth it. Reminiscent (dare I say it?) of Horowitz</review_text>
as with all of Zucchero's CD's, this is also wonderful.  I listen to it all the time, it's sensual and sexy and great</review_text>
Trip hop and lounge lovers need to have this CD at home. Bajo Fondo Tango Club is not as pure tango as Piazzola's nor as chill out percolated as Gotan Project's, which makes them a band for all publics. Nor even one single person in my office couldn't help download at least one song of this CD into their ipods. Three of them already bought their copy</review_text>
It was good.  There are so many albums like this.  This is one of the good ones</review_text>
This is an amazing EP - one of Boards of Canada's strongest to date. Honestly, I didn't enjoy Dayvan Cowboy that much on Campfire Headphase, but since it has been recontectualized on Trans Canada Highway, I'm a huge fan of the song. The new tracks are more like what one would typically expect from Boards of Canada. Warm, fuzzy, mellow, lush analogue synths and plenty of them! For those who weren't as taken with the newer BOC sound on Campfire Headphase, assuage your fears - this is definitely a return to the traditional sound. That's not to say though that this is a rehash of old material. One can hear bits and pieces of Geogaddi and such, but the overall feel is much closer to Music Has the Right to Children. To all Boards of Canada fans - buy this without hesitation. It doesn't matter what you thought of Campfire - this is quality.I have one question. The title, Trans Canada Highway, seems to be a fairly obvious reference to Kraftwerk's legendary Trans Europe Express and the album cover seems to point to Kraftwerk's Autobahn album cover, but I don't hear any explicit musical connection. Is Boards of Canada paying a simple titular tribute to Kraftwerk, or is there something else buried within? This calls for repeated listenings</review_text>
I thoroughly enjoy this collection of hits from The Mamas and the Papas. Every song is fun and the tunes will stay with you long after you're done listening.Like other selections from the 20th Century Masters series, this can't be called a complete collection. However, what is included is fantastic and I find myself popping it into my CD player much more often than many other CDs.My copy of this CD (which I bought new) includes an 8-page folder with two photos of the band (besides the cover photo), a short band biography written by Joseph F. Laredo, and a track listing with song writing and original release credits. Song lyrics are not included. The jewel case is fully transparent with another photo of the band on the inside of the back paper.As a side note, if you are a fan of the ABC television series "Lost" this CD includes the Mama Cass song "Make Your Own Kind Of Music" that is featured on Desmond's record player in the hatch.If you're just starting with The Mamas and the Papas, or simply want a brief overview of some of their better known songs, this is a great CD.For more The Mamas and the Papas, check out Criterion's phenomenal DVD release of Monterey Pop (or the box set The Complete Monterey Pop Festival). This concert DVD is absolutely brilliant, and includes several songs from The Mamas and the Papas.</review_text>
Those who liked Suede may be looking for more of the same from The Tears, but despite the obviously recognisable vocals from Brett, and the familiar wailing of Bernard's guitar, this marks a watershed in their repertoire. The most obvious difference is that all the songs seem to have been crafted as 'hits' (much more radio-friendly, and why not?). It's also a more mellow sound than Suede (there were fewer opportunities for vigorous bouncing and hand-clapping at the Tears concert I attended). Another important difference is the guitar work, with Bernard soaring off into sonic highs not experienced since Reeves Gabrels and Tin Machine. Among the better songs are Apollo 13, Brave New Century, Refugees and Co-Star. Though Brett and Bernard are capable of better, this is a shot in the arm for us disenfranchised Suede-heads, and I recommend you turn it up loud</review_text>
I was in Walmart's electronic area (which is where you can usually find me!) and I saw the album. I heard Unbelieveable and I was sold on that song but couldn't find the single. The album on first listen was not my favorite, but after a while I started liking it. It is a great album and I'm glad I bought it. Talent is a virtue!</review_text>
This is one of my favorites of 2004.  You got a seasoned vet of an MC rockin over some of the illest producers in underground hip hops beats(madlib, j-zone, dangermouse) and some pretty nice guest appearances.  I have a couple of complaints on this album though, like the song "Love Thang", the hook is wack and the beat is corny, another wack hook comes thru on the title track where you got Prince Po sounding Like Tonto from Lone Ranger chanting some indian ish, and on top of that in his rhyme he says some sh*t like "and if the girl farts then she's a pooter"??? thats dumb.  One last complaint then i'm done hatin, but the chorus on Bump Bump is terrible, and i'm embarrased to bump bump that ish when i'm in my car because it sounds so wack, but Raekwon's verse takes me back to when Wu Tang was the untouchable squad they were back in the mid 90's, which more than makes up for the lackluster chorus.  Aside from those complaints you got a dope album, J-Zone hit this up with some of best beats i've ever heard from him.  So pick this up its definitely a good purchase</review_text>
Sometimes I like to look up and see what I can find on some of my favorite bands from the 70's and Starz being one of them. I was lucky enough to see the band play a few times around 77 and 78. Another band that took time for their fans!!!!!!!I read through the many reviews of posted here on amazon and not sure if there is much that I can add, also great to see that there were so many out there that enjoyed the band and their music. I would recommend reading about each of the Starz cd's and listening to the sound files if available and deciding for yourself........ I remember I liked this cd so much and the logo as well, I even hand- made a stencil and made my own Starz shirt, I think I used some of that gold "glue on glitter" in a tube and had one of the first Starz shirts, before the band even had any if I remember right.Lots of good songs on this cd,  Pull the Plug being one of my favorites both on the LP/CD and live. All good rock songs from a band that deserved a lot more.........I could go on trying to describe the music.......... too bad there are no sound files for this cd....... so you may just have to order it and take a chance. The remaining members have played a few shows during the past year or so and guitar player Richie Ranno continues to be active in the music business, you may even want to go over to starzcentral to get updated	and see what Richie and the band are up to. Singer Michael Lee Smith also had a brother that had his own band and later ventured into Hollywood....... but this is about Starz!!!...So.... I highly recommend checking out the CD's and starzcentral. Not to be confused with the movie channel or another band from Europe that is using the name recently</review_text>
What an awesome cd... i bought a flogging molly cd as well but dropkick murphy's are better by FAR!</review_text>
No other compilation of Garland's work exemplifies her genius and versatility than this astounding compilation that shows why she was the entertainment phenomenon that took the world by storm.All her ORIGINAL soundtrack performances are here, sounding magnificent. Far superior to thin-sounding studio re-creations, this is the real deal, assembled with obvious skill, intelligence and dedication to the talented legend.In a sense, this should be the "soundtrack album" for that magnificent documentary about her that PBS produced a while back.Don't pass this up</review_text>
Many musicians release some sort of experimental album at some point in their career.  For Peter Gabriel, every album is an experiment.  Usually musicians experiment by deviating from the norm; however, on Gabriel's fifth experiment, SO, the ex-Genesis frontman does the exact opposite.  Gabriel, beloved for always doing something different, decided on this album to play it safe - and for Gabriel, that is an experiment.  Previously he was a sort of cult performer, but on SO, Gabriel finally made it into the spotlight.  Big time.  SO was an immense success, peaking at number one on the Billboard Top 100, receiving overwhelmingly-positive reviews (in 2003, So placed 187th on Rolling Stone's list of the 500 greatest albums of all time), and resulting in a sold-out tour.Which brings us to one nagging term: "sellout".Though most who loved Peter Gabriel's first four albums loved SO as well, there are still many who call SO Gabriel's sellout album.  To me, that's just foolishness.  Peter Gabriel has never "sold out" and I have no doubt that he never will.  It's clear that on SO he was trying to go in a more mainstream direction, but that's probably the biggest experiment Gabriel has ever undertaken, save for his subsequent release, PASSION.  One popular theory amongst Gabriel fans is that the album's title, SO, is in fact an acronym for "Sell Out" (hence the uppercase capital "S" and the lowercase italicized "o").  I wouldn't be surprised at all if it was.SO does sound very different from Gabriel's earlier albums (though then again, none of those sounded alike either).  If anything, it resembles Gabriel's third self-titled release, nicknamed MELT.  The thing that really separates those two - other than an obviously more commercial sound on SO - is a feeling of warmth on that album, unlike the harsh, gritty darkness of MELT.  Perhaps that's why listeners found SO so charming.What does SO have to offer?  Well, a lot.  For one thing, there's the atmospheric opening, "Red Rain", one of Gabriel's finest tracks.  Like many of the tracks on the album, it's dominated by ethereal guitar from David Rhodes and heavenly synthesizers, courtesy of Gabriel himself.  Then there's one of the biggest hits of 1980s (which also spawned what may be the best music video in history), "Sledgehammer," inspired by the motown music Gabriel listened to as a child.  With its pounding, industrial percussion, playful bass (by Gabriel's exclusive bass man, Tony Levin) and clever, sexually suggestive lyrics, it's no surprise that "Sledgehammer" was a hit.  After letting his silly side out, Gabriel tries to inspire with "Don't Give Up", a nice song made great by heavenly vocals from another popular 80s musician, Kate Bush.The subsequent track, "That Voice Again", is my personal favorite song from this album.  It features some excellent drumming from Manu Katche, an immensely-talented drummer who has also played with artists like Sting, along with misty guitars, delightful synthesizers, and fine lyrics hit home by Gabriel's pained singing.  Like the best tracks on SO, "That Voice Again" manages to be fun, moody, uplifting, powerful, warm, and inspirational, all at once.Gabriel winds down a little for the dreamy, powerful "Mercy Street", a song inspired by and written about Anne Sexton, an American mental patient who relieved her depression through writing.  As on his previous albums, Gabriel proves that he knows when to lighten up by whipping out "Big Time", a silly but fun track which also spawned an innovative music video.  "Big Time" features heavy drumming from Stewart Copeland, the former drummer of The Police, as well as some awesome CMI by Simon Clark.  "We Do What We're Told (Miligram's 37)" is about the experiments of Yale professor Stanley Milgram.  Milgram would have his subjects administer shocks to actors, who would scream in pain as the shocks became more and more horrible.  Milgram observed that his subjects would do what he told them to do, despite the immense pain they appeared to be inflicting on the actors.  He follows that rather cold song with "This Is The Picture (Excellent Birds)", a tensely surreal tune.The album closes with one of Gabriel's most famous songs, "In Your Eyes".  Most people are familiar with the song from its usage in Cameron Crowe's romantic comedy masterpiece ... SAY ANYTHING, where the song was used in what has become one of the most famous scenes in movie history.  It's one of Gabriel's warmest and most romantic compositions, and also one of his best.  On the original LP version of SO, "We Do What We're Told" closed out the album.  That's a fine way to end it, but it's also a rather cold way to end such a warm album.  When the album was re-released remastered on CD in 2002, Gabriel placed "In Your Eyes" at the end of the album as he originally intended.  Now that is the way to end it!So - how does SO rank among the many other brilliant works of Peter Gabriel?  Well, it ranks quite highly, actually.  It's one of the pinnacles of Gabriel's career, though whether it truly is the peak or not is hard to say.  After all, how can one compare Gabriel's albums when they are all so vastly different?  Certainly, though, SO is one of the finest Gabriel masterpieces.  This is fun, well-crafted, emotional music.  SO is SO wonderful.</review_text>
The Fisrt cd is alot better than this one, but this one is still okay. I only Liked one song on this disc and it is. Track 4. Will The Circle Be Unbroken/I'll Fly Away/ Jesus Loves Me. Don't get me wrong the music is beautiful, but i think the first one is alot better</review_text>
Unless you frequented jazz clubs in Baltimore or Philly in the fall of 1955, this would have been your first exposure to the Miles Davis-John Coltrane collaboration (a few tracks recorded for Columbia, the label Miles would soon be joining exclusively, a few weeks before this session weren't issued until much later). Davis settled on Coltrane as his replacement for the departing Sonny Rollins almost by default - no one else fit the bill or new the book. That they would stay together long seemed unlikely because their temperaments differed so much (Davis was a hands-off leader, Coltrane wanted constant  input from Miles on his playing and music in general).STABLEMATES (a Benny Golson tune) is the track that seems to draw the most attention. It's an excellent composition, and although Coltrane sounds somewhat tentative (nervous?), the performance is attractive. But my favorite side is THERE IS NO GREATER LOVE, even though Coltrane sits this one out: Miles plays beautifully, and I love the emotion he wrings from the tune.True, this is an early effort by the group that would transform modern jazz, but it's a very good session nonetheless. The group plays well, the rhythm section is rock solid, and they are all off and running. Full speed ahead</review_text>
all I want to know is when is the next album going to be released?  I can't wait!  This album is fantastic</review_text>
This is the best album/band noones ever heard of.This is the most underrated bands EVER ( Including FM Static. ) And they deserve some appreciation. This CD is a great rock CD and it has a bit of seemingly Hip-Hop bits here and there in just about every song. Almost every song on this CD rocks, so BUY IT</review_text>
EXCELLENT SONGWRITING, GUITAR PLAYING AND OVERDUBBING. ANOTHER LIVE ALBUM FOLLOWING HIS FIRST WITH PREVIOUSLY RECORDED SONGS NOT ON FRAMPTON COMES ALIVE WOULD HAVE BEEN JUST AS SUCCESSFUL AS COMES ALIVE.  DAYS DAWNING, CRYING CLOWN, FANFARE ARE A FEW SUCH SONGS. A FEW SONGS FROM WIND OF CHANGE, SOMETHING'S HAPPENING, AND EVEN A COUPLE FROM HIS EARLY DAYS WITH THE HERD WOULD HAVE CONTRIBUTED TO A SECOND SUCCESSFUL LIVE ALBUM RATHER THAN THE I'M IN YOU ALBUM WHICH WAS A TERRIBLE DISAPPOINTMENT</review_text>
Martina McBride's "Emotion" album contains many pop country elements, but is still nonetheless a great album. Here's how I rate each song. (out of a 5 star scale)1) Do What You Do- good song, but takes a little to get used to.(4 stars)2) Anything's Better than Feeling the Blues- good songs, good lyrics. (4 stars)3) I Love You- great song, Martina's most successful song on the country charts, spending 5 weeks in the top spot. (5 stars)4) Make Me Believe- great song about whether one's love is true or not.... i love the lyric "but it's hard to start a fire without a spark (5 stars)5) Love's the Only House- this song will draw a strong connection to your heart. The song is spectacular and speaks the truth... love is TRULY the only house big enough for all the world's pain. The video to this song is very touching as well. Go Martina! (5 stars)6) There You Are- a perfect wedding song... She hold the "are" note for at least 12+ seconds near the end. (5 stars) If you hear this song LIVE, she holds the note 15 seconds!!!! (so LIVE this song will be 6 stars/5 stars!!!!)7) It's My Time- the first song that I ever heard Martina perform live in the AMA awards... she rocked the house down with this song... She also holds a 10 second note at this song. Love that range of hers. (5 stars)8) I Ain't Goin' Nowhere- I like this song and its message about being there for a significant other. (5 stars)9) Anything and Everything- the lyrics and Martina's gentle vocal performance on this song are perfection. (5 stars)10)From the Ashes- another standout song on this album. She holds some high notes in this one too. (5 stars)11) Goodbye- a solid performance, I llike how Martina goes lower and softer in some parts of the song. (4 stars)12) This Uncivil War- the best song on the album!!!! AMAZING!!!! Written by Gretchen, the writer of Martina's career hit "Indepedence Day." A very emotional song, which defines the title of the album. The ending is a real treat as well. (6 stars!)This album is definitely worth purchasing!!! It helps complete my collection of Martina's albums</review_text>
The title says it all, Im so happy I bought it and I listen to it all the time :</review_text>
I bought this cd since my sister had stolen my original copy, lol. Need I say more</review_text>
Sweet brazillian jazz piano combined with Guaraldi's 1960's hit &quot;Cast Your Fate to the Wind.&quot; Throw in a coupla classics like &quot;Since I Fell For You&quot; and &quot;Moon River&quot; masterfully interpreted by Vince and you have the perfect album for unwinding, loving, or waking up</review_text>
ALways loved this group....own several of their CD's and this is by far my favorite.  Darryl Hall's phrasing of his songs are superb.</review_text>
I agree with everyone else; the music on this album is completely magical. Two masters at work with a great rhythm section, very spontaneous-sounding contrapuntal harmonies, unbounded joy in every tune, and some interesting arrangements.This is also the worst-sounding CD (or LP, for that matter) that I have ever heard. It sounds worse than lo-res MP3s played over the Web; I have recordings of 78s that sound better. I cannot believe that even Laserlight would release this. I have other Laserlight Cds and none of them sound this bad. If they remastered this and made it sound better, I would buy it again. That's the only reason for 4 stars rather than 5.Still, it's worth getting if you can listen past the horrible sound quality</review_text>
I am a latecomer to the works of Chopin, unqualified to comment on Dinu Lipatti's technique and interpretation, but this recording gives an interesting framework to explore the waltzes. They are numbered 1 through 14 in order of opus publication, but on this disc Lipatti shuffles them to form a cycle of his own devising. There are four waltzes in the key of A flat and it seems one challenge was to space them across the recital. Contrast this to Alexandre Thaurad's CD where he clumps like-key waltzes into groups. (He also adds five more posthumous works.)Most of Chopin's waltzes start on the dominant, meaning either the fifth note of the home key (the tonic, the I), or a dominant seventh chord (V7) which leads to the tonic. Lipatti uses this feature to string together his cycle. If, for instance, there were a waltz that ended on a C natural it could easily bring us to Waltz No 4, which starts on an insistent C7 chord before rising to the home key of F major. I will use this as the starting point for tracing the harmonic relationships of the tracks on this CD.Track 1: Waltz No 4 in F, "Grande Valse brillante" - as noted starts on the V7 and finishes on F in octaves.Track 2: No 5 in A flat - begins on a trilling dominant Eb, but the note it trills up to is an F (which ended the previous track). Finishes with a parting shot, a turn in the bass ending on Ab.Track 3: No 6 in D flat, "Minute Waltz" - starts on Ab; the contour of the opening phrase echoes the gesture of the previous parting shot as well. Ends in Db.Track 4: No 9 in A flat - has two pick up notes then hits a Db on the downbeat of the first measure. The right hand ends on the Ab above middle C.Track 5: No 7 in C sharp minor - starts on a G sharp above middle C, which is the same black key (enharmonic equivalent) of the previous Ab. Ends in C# minor.Track 6: No 11 in G flat - starts with a pick-up turn then hits the downbeat with a Db (enharmonic C#). Ends on a Gb in the treble clef.Track 7: No 10 in B minor - starts quietly on the same note, an F# (enharmonic Gb). Ends with a soft B in the bass clef.Track 8: No 14 in E minor - first note is the exact same B in the bass. Ends in E minor.Track 9: No 3 in A minor - starts on an E in the bass melody. Ends in A minor; keep in mind that minor third of this key is a C natural -- you can hear it in the melody of the third to last measure.Track 10: No 8 in A flat - this is a side-stepping change of keys, but there is an harmonic link to the previous waltz. Instead of starting on the dominant, this one begins on the major third -- C natural.Track 11: No 12 in F minor - starts on the dominant -- C again. Toggle back and forth between tracks 10 and 11 and you will hear that these two waltzes start on the exact same pitch. Instead of ending in F minor this waltz closes in the relative major of Ab. The last three notes are a rise and fall, Bb-C-Ab.Track 12: No 13 in D flat - there is a leading note before the dominant. The first three notes (Bb-Ab-F) fall and rise in a mirroring gesture to the final phrase of the previous. Ends quietly in Db.Track 13: No 1 in E flat, "Valse brillante" - another side-stepping key change but there is a connection. If you toggle between tracks 12 and 13 you will hear the same initial note, a Bb -- quietly in the former, boldly here. Finishes resoundingly in the tonic Eb.Track 14: No 2 in A flat, "Grande Valse brillante" - introduction in the dominant chord, Eb7. Closes in Ab. From here you could loop around to the beginning of the cycle again, linking the major third (C natural) to the V7 that starts the F major waltz</review_text>
Live Alive is good enough to buy in my standered's.....I really think this was recorded poorly but the songs on it are really good if you play it in your car, or on bigger speakers so you can really hear everything much better. Their are many good songs included on this complination of live performence's spanning from performences from Montreux Jazz Festival, Austin Opera House,and the Dallas Starfest. This recordings are all from 85-through 86. Jimmie Vaughan appears on Willie The Wimp, Love Struck Baby, Look At Little Sister, and Change It playing guitar, and string bass. I think the worst song on the entire complination is Voodoo Chile(slight return) which is kind of weird for me to say because I think that was truely the best song Stevie Ray played live but in this case its not. Other than that I really think for what it is it's a average live performence.</review_text>
Just wanted to answer Reviewer:"homedecaramel" and his question as to who Melissa refers to from the song titled' "Melissa's Garden".Melissa was the daughter of close friends of Steve Vai.She passed away 5 years ago at a fairly young age due to ovarian cancer.  Melissa's parents built a beautiful garden as a remembrance of her.  Melissa had a wonderful spirit and her spirit lives on as is apparent in Steve's beautiful tribute and in Melissa's Garden.</review_text>
From the manic whirlwind Prelude to the shocking Cake and Sodomy, Portrait of an American family is an album that stands on its own two feet as being catchy and memorable. Cake and Sodomy dishes out the obscene gestures, Lunchbox is told with a twist of humor, Organ Grinder is pleasing vocally, Cyclops is addictingly wild, Get your gunn is catchy (if not overly insulting), Dope Hat is great and fierce, and My Monkey is hysterically enjoyable. Snake Eyes and Sissies is another winner, easy to get lost in. The rest all work to varying degrees, though not as appealing. Every song on this album is worth listening to, from fast paced and rock style to techno overload.</review_text>
i love to working with this soundtrack in the back ground.the music is fun, whimsical, and out of the ordinary.i like pop and rock, but sometimes you just need good music without the lame lyrics</review_text>
This album was released in the summer of '86 when Queen's radio airplay was at a rather low point in the U.S. and at a very high point in Europe.By now,the band had adventured into pop genres beyond rock,yet colouring their songs with their distinctive style of interpretation and playing.Here we find the gorgeous ballad ONE YEAR OF LOVE and the catchy FRIENDS WILL BE FRIENDS.The ominous anthem WHO WANTS TO LIVE FOREVER and the Highlander themed PRINCES OF THE UNIVERSE are gems in this crown.The first two USA singles, the rocker ONE VISION (from Iron Eagle)and the danceable A KIND OF MAGIC barely cracked the US Top 40 in a decade when alternative music was preferred and classics were often overlooke</review_text>
If you want a feel good,come home from work and forget your day CD you found it her</review_text>
Paul Hardcastle is a member of a select groupof Smooth Jazz artists that makes the format "work".I was in radio and that format and also a MusicDirector for a former Buffalo, NY FM Smooth JazzRadio Station. (WSJZ 92.9</review_text>
Bought this CD for my daughter, a new Bill Withers fan and she loved the whole collection! It's a great compilation of classic Bill Withers music</review_text>
stephen stills "for what it's worth" is, of course, a classic song. "burned," neil young's strongest effort for this album, is another classic song. the rest of it is all very good. i would say that it does sound a bit dated, however;, and that this one is mostly for fanatics of 60's music. your average "artic monkeys" fan is not going to find this a good match for their musical sensiblities. better was on the way from buffalo springfield. their next album, "buffalo springfield again" is an all out rock masterpiece that everybody should own, whatever your age or inclinations.</review_text>
Another great album by Firehouse. My favorites are Reach for the sky, When I look into your eyes, and hold your fire. I have other favorites, but there are my top 3. I have a story to go along with this album, ladies and gentlemen.See, I was heading to Cross-Country one day, for the huge "Group 2" meet. (There's a section, and 5 groups from every section make it, and there were four sections, so you can make the calculations). I listened to this album, having a bad day before, and having a bad night of rest. Listening to this album, I got a river of positivity, and I had a great start and a great finish. I ended up smashing my last personal best in Cross-Country. Basically ladies and gentlemen, this cd has alot of effect. Get it.I love to review things. Have a great day</review_text>
The Dead were primarily a live road band, but on this and the other great album from 1970 (American Beauty)the band proved their mettle in the studio, moving into less spacey territory. The music reflects their range, from country and bluegrass to folk, blues and rock. Superb.ps. their early studio effortsAnthem..., Aoxomoxoa) were also noteworthy experiments, but the music wasn't as powerful as the live interpretations</review_text>
Sing of Mary is a work of art! The beauty of the music is only surpassed by the Woman it praises...Mary! God Bless this CD..</review_text>
but not the only one you should get.  Make this a purchase, but get live/dead also because it has all different songs, and then look at other live releases.  The dead have a lot of good recordings, just pick and choose among them.  This one has become a staple of great dead songs in my collection.  It is amazing how many good songs they have, and how intimidating it seems to get their best stuff, but you can't go wrong with this release even though some people feel it isn't up to scratch</review_text>
Engelbert Humperdinck `s name has remained for almost five decades in the great musical stages. In Spain there is a term that fits so well to describe his magnetism: Duende.He shone with radiant intensity in the Age of the great crooners, the most difficult, indeed: Frankie, Tony Bennet, Andy Williams, Dean Martin, Matt Monroe, Bobby Vinton, Booby Goldsboro, Glenn Campbell, O.C. Smith, Otis Reading, Pat Boone, Kenny Rogers,  Paul Anka and Neil Diamond (from time to time) among the most remarkable ones.His peculiar style has deserved him the best acknowledgments all over the world. His multifacetic repertoire and elegant voice confers him presence and conviction every time he appears on stage.His name is now a legend. Go for this admirable collection, you will enjoy it over and over</review_text>
We are using this series of CDs in our homeschool music program - they are fantastic!   We especially love this one about Bach - what an awesome man!   The story of his life is told in a way that is very interesting and holds the children's attention while also using various pieces of his music in the narration.  It is done VERY well!   My children are gaining a tremendous amount of knowlege and appreciation for music through this CD and so are my husband and I</review_text>
I got the LP version of this album as a Christmas present in 1988. I immediately fell in love with it. She sings about issues such as unemployment and poverty which were rampant during the Reagan years ("Talkin about a Revolution", "Fast Car"). But she offered hope that things would get better as we approached the 90s, which they did. "Mountains O Things" was about the materialsim of the 80s. Other issues she covers are racism ("Across the Lines") and domestic abuse ("Behind the Wall"). Even though this album is almost 20 years old it does not sound dated, as the messages are just as relavent today as they were in 1988.I bought the CD version in 1992 and I never get tired of listening to it. All of the songs are good but my favorite ones are "Talking about a Revolution", "Fast Car", "Baby Can I Hold You", "Mountains of Things", "Why" and "For My Lover".</review_text>
This is the type of music to sit down, relax, put on a pair of headphones and let it absorb your concious. From spacey sounding electronics to soft vocals over piano to heart pounding rhythms to skittering percussion...this is just a taste of what is Supersilent, and from what I hear it is all improvised which blows my head clean off. All this coming from someone who has never heard them before...talk about a great buy! Highly, highly recommended, I close my eyes, to awaken among the cosmos traveling without a tangible body, drunk with the infinite beauty, I sigh without a mouth and think..</review_text>
Really, this is only worth 4 stars if you can appreciate all things cheesy. This is, of course, funny stuff. Really, it's the kind of music where you don't want other people to know you're listening to it, but oh my is it fun!This one has all the ingredients of your typical yngwie-inspired power metal-album: soaring guitars, high-pitched vocals, double-bass drumming, a lot of neoclassical stuff (essentially the sound of Mozart, Bach and Beethoven, just way less complex) both on the keyboards and the guitars. And of course, trumpets and brass. Oh, how I loathe and love the sound of trumpets and brass on a keyboard. Cheese, cheese, cheese all the way!If you've heard ANY rhapsody-material before, a song-by-song breakdown is pretty unnecessary as you'll know exactly what to expect. They really did benefit from the better production on their next album (not to mention their latest opus!) but Legendary Tales doesn't sound bad by any means, and the songwriting is solid and pretty diverse. It's just cheesy, REAL cheesy! And truth be told, since it's a metal album the guitars could use a little more 'oomph' here and there. This is more happy metal than heavy metal, but then again, they're singing about mystical lands and holy creatures, so Behemoth-like heavy guitars wouldn't really fit. We don't wanna scare our Warrior of Ice now, do we</review_text>
There have been innumerable Motorhead collections over the years, but this is one of the few that attempts to mix old with the new. On this collection, all the classics are present, and some newer material is thrown in as well. Unfortunately, there are some throw-away tracks, mainly the Girlscool and Headgirl tracks. (To be honest, these tracks are pretty much worthless.) Some live tracks are meshed in and fit well, and the newer songs help to add some variety to the old-scool stuff.I would recommend this collection to listeners looking to get a nice, cheap collection of some of Motorhead's best just for the sake of getting into the band. But if you're wanting the prime collection of older material, save up some extra dough and buy "No Remorse" or "Stone Deaf Forever.</review_text>
Aretha's voice, her style, delivery and interpretation of her music is incomparable. These songs are more than just classics; they're a songbook to millions of people's lives who grew up listening to her in the 60's and 70's as I did. They evolk memories of times that changed our world, and showed just how powerful and influential music could be for generations to come. There is not much that came before, and very little that came after these golden years for Aretha, that can compare to this treasury of her music. Sadly the Aretha Frankiln of 2007 pales in comparison to the Aretha Franklin of this time, who was truly and rightfully The Queen of Soul.</review_text>
This 1989 debut album from this Texas sleaze metal outfit is chocked full of great vocals from Jason McMaster,catchy guitar riffs,and generally a collection of feel good tunes about getting drunk and having a good time.It fits quite nicely in my CD collection in the " D" column next to the Dirty Looks CD.I thought "Scared" was the best song on here along with the opener,"Teasin Pleasin" and "Queen of the Nile" but I liked all of them.The best way to describe Dangerous Toys is that it has a heavy Guns N Roses sound with a poppier edge to it.It's too bad they never made a good album after this one and Dangerous Toys would never get to this level again.If you want late 80's hard rock/metal without the spandex and the makeup,this debut album is highly recommended.Nothing fancy,just good old fashioned rock and roll</review_text>
In Temporary Secretary theres a great melody struggling to escape from the Space Invaders backing.Memo to Paul-turn this into a ballad for your next albumBogey Music,inspired by a book,is quite interesting.Waterfalls is the standout song and Comin'Up was the hit.The rest you just get used toWhat more could you ask</review_text>
This CD is well worth buying. But to you blues aficionado's who rely on Shaq's recommendations, let me put it in terms you'll understand. Coco is no SRV, or an Albert, or a Buddy. He's definitely a large step below them. But he is also not a lounge singer type like Smokin Joe Kubek, Lil Ed and the Blue Imperials, etc. Coco, is a large step above them. This CD seems to pick up steam with each song.  He shows his flexibility with different types of guitar playing on a number of songs. He performs a great ballad, with a Johnny Copeland, song (#6), that's 5 minutes and 59 seconds long. (I could have said 6 minutes, but Shaq don't fool around when it comes to da blues!) NEW, GOOD BLUES IS HARD TO FIND, and till "Jumping Joe" Bonamassa dedicates more of his recordings to true electric blues, this is one of the best of the last year, along with Walter Trout's "Full Circle"</review_text>
Beres has done it again. This is a great CD. I can actually say that enjoyed all 19 tracks</review_text>
i do not own this CD, but i recently saw the doctor at a local jazz club and was blown away. He had a good sense of humor and was very worldly. He would ascend and spiral upwords untill every one in the club's heart rate had spead up 100 notches... and BOOM... he was back to being relaxed old lonnie. at the break i met him, and got an autograph. He was very insightful musical and with spoken words.I would reccomend seeing him live, aswell as buying his album</review_text>
I've always liked Tevin Campbell, he had a beautiful voice and really did it on "Break it Down". I particularly like Break it Down, Shhh, Brown Eyed Girl among others.. Excellent CD overall.</review_text>
I don't own this CD. I don't have to own it to review it, because this music is the soundtrack of my high school years. I lived this music. I listened to it while cruising the local shopping center indulging in - er - various activities. Half of the bands on this CD I had the privilege of seeing perform live in the 70s. THIS is what FM radio sounded like back then. Every single song on this CD was well known to me and my friends. Yes, even Black Oak Arkansas (hot and nasty!), Nazareth (get Hair of the Dog CD for more), and the Runaways (hot babes!). Oh, and I love the movie too. Party on, dudes</review_text>
the willie dixon chess set is a window into the early bluesthat was the basis for some of the most well known rock androll songs of all time. from led zeppelin to the kinks willie dixon and his music was a source of inspiration and musical reinvention. sometimes you have to stay true to your roots. itsan incredible journey into the heart of original blues</review_text>
No collection of blues/rock is complete without &quot;A Piece of Your Soul&quot;.  There very simply is not a weak track on the entire disc.  From the raunchy (&quot;Bitter Rain&quot;) to the uplifting (&quot;Good Day For The Blues&quot;) to the bittersweet (&quot;Cynical&quot;) to the soft (&quot;Share That Smile&quot;) Storyville encompasses the entire range of musical expression with a style that is as provocative as it is unique.  Put this disc on your list of music to have on a deserted island</review_text>
This is tha best master p album this and the movie this came out when I was and the 6 grade to lisen to this it's emosional to me it reminds me of back n da day friends I knew all that my favrite song is mama raised me it gots bone,snoop,e-40 all no limit all them it's a great album you can lisen to it most the way though it's a great album gansta classic you gotta get this</review_text>
I had this album for many years when I was younger. I had looked for alongtime to try and find it on CD with no luck.  I finally found it on Amazon. This is my favorite christmas album,  I even have my teenage daughter hooked on it now. The caroling medely is awesome and My daugher loves the Pinecones and Hollyberries song.  No one should be without thisCD in their Christmas Collection.</review_text>
Since Sunset Boulevard is one of my favorite films, I bought the London cast album long before the musical came to America.  Patti LaPone is the ultimate Broadway star, having created the role of Evita. Her soaring versions of "As If We Never Said Goodbye", and "With One Look" are unmatched. Her power and vocal range soar! All of Norma's songs had to be drastically reduced in vocal range to accomodate Glen Close's lack of, (or nonexistent) singing ability. In fact, this DVD was unavailabe to the American market during the American run of the musical and was literally pulled from the shelves. Perhaps ALW didn't want the American audience to hear the masterwork of this production.  Kevin Anderson, a brilliant actor, does not have the operatic quality of Alan Cambell in the U.S. cast, but he portrayed Joe Gillis with far more guts and passion.  This is not for the lover's of Oklahoma of Showboat, but for lovers of more contemporary musicals, this one is perfect</review_text>
Jock Rock is a must for anyone in the fitness business.  Nothing gets a crowd hopping like a little James Brown!  Not much for listening to, but a good collection when your looking for just the right song to play for a certain event</review_text>
this album was by far the bands most daring ablum. they went away from the classic INXS sound that made them superstars (Kick, X) and instead updated their sound to fit the time. like a previous reviewer noted, this was when grunge was becoming very popular in the US, and unfortunately, caused this album to go unnoticed for the most part. its sad too, cuz there are many solid tracks, inlcuding Heaven Sent (my favorite), Not Enough Time, Baby Dont Cry and Beautiful Girl. I have recently become a big fan of INXS and have purchased all of their albums. I like this one in particular because it is different from all their other albums. I recommend "Welcome" to any INXS fan and any other fan of great music</review_text>
This is a great CD!  Each track fades up to full volume at the start and fades down to silence at the end.  This makes it nice to just play the entire CD or to loop one track since there are no sharp changes from one noise to another.  So far the Car and Washing machine tracks seem to be our baby's favorites.  When she outgrows the need for this white noise CD, we'll transition her to lullaby or classical music.  For now though, this CD helps us keep her on a schedule and well rested by helping keep her relaxed and usually asleep during her nap times.  As a bonus, the Waves and Rain on the Roof tracks are soothing for grown-ups needing to drown out noise while they sleep</review_text>
As a band, The Byrds are one of the greatest and certainly one of the most influential bands in rock and roll history.  Adding to that legacy, "Mr. Tamborine Man's" status as one of the greatest debut albums in rock history is almost without question.  This band could do it all; country, folk, rock, jam, psychedelica, etc, etc.  And this debut was perhaps the pinnacle of their achievements.  Though they would venture into much more adventurous territory ("Notorious Byrd Brothers"), this was where the band was the most solid, the most tight collectively.Dylan's influence is everywhere from the get-go; 4 of his songs span the album, including the title track which the Byrd's turned into his only #1 hit.  Elsewhere, there are two other covers, but the songs with the best longevity are originals, mostly penned by Gene Clark.  Witness the tortured romance of "I'll Feel a Whole lot Better" and "Here Without You" and tell me he wasn't a great songwriter.  Roger McGuinn (or Jim, if you like) was quick about finding his signature nasally croon that would go on to influence Tom Petty, among others.  Obviously, not everyone had found their place; songs by Chris Hillman and David Crosby are nowhere to be found.  But "Mr. Tamborine Man" stand today every bit as tall as the early works of Dylan and the Beatles.  This is the album that set the standard for folk-rock from then on, from Buffalo Springfield to REM to Toad the Wet Sprocket to the most current emo bands.Overall:  10 out of 10</review_text>
While Volume 1 of the DREAM BABES series is more accessible with its very girly girl group pop, sun-shiney vocals - Volume 2 offers a little bit of everything - from pop r&b, girl group vocals, pop, swinging pop & even some very early school grrl rock 'n roll - they might be a little more lyrically serious (hence the subtitle REFLECTIONS) but if anything, that's a good thing. It's nice to hear that women were trying different styles and genres and not just singing about about boys ...And also know - these are not just timepieces to be admired from a distant - these are all still fun, interesting and downright cool to hear again or for the first time.If you're a collector, this whole series should be on your checklist</review_text>
What can be said about this album?This is one of those albums that re-invigorates your faith/enthusiasm in music (those who listen to a lot of albums know what I mean).Some tracks from here were most famously covered by Nirvana on their unplugged album, although pained I don't think Cobain quite got the feel that Kirkwood gives to these songs.It has a perfect blend of songs that make you want to almost hoe-down and those that you can just reflect on and chill out.Particular stand outs on this album are Split Myself In Two, Magic Toy Missing, Aurora Borealis and The Whistling Song.This album does take some growing as Kirkwood's voice is abrasive, but this is an album that will truly make you love music.Do try it, you won't be disappointed.</review_text>
This is a wondrful CD and quite a bargin. Two discs and the very best of Nancy Wilson. I liked so much, I bought two and gave one to a friend</review_text>
I remember listning to this album over and over again when I was young. To this day I still can't get these awesome songs out of my head! A must get album for you Old School folks or anyone that enjoys great music</review_text>
very interesting CD. Some of the vocals are distracting, but the music is driving modern psychadelia. As I said, think Syd Barrett's Floyd mixed w/ Melt Bannana. I highly recommend</review_text>
Pablo is definitely the Babe Ruth/Moses of these pieces.However, tempo, cadence, clarity, consistency and emotional projection are much better here.Starker is at least the Michael Jordan of the Bach Suites. -And compared to Pablo (I heard the Naxos one) the sound quality on this disc is The Right Hand Of God.Starker is the dog's balls; big ones, like a Great Dane.</review_text>
As always, opinions vary in terms of who is the master at recording timeless pieces of music such as these Bach cello suites.  Starker himself pronounced in the sleeves of this CD that this edition, the 4th recordings of these music by himself is not "technically perfect", but in many ways, his most mature interpretation. You can spend hundreds trying to find a Mercury copy of "the perfect" rendition; or you can appreciate the little imperfections of an aged artist, at the height of his humanistic understanding of music, and of life.</review_text>
This is a wonderful Vangelis album and is fairly energetic, with enough experimental flourishes to keep the listener fully engaged.   Released in 1975, Heaven and Hell incorporates a full choir into the Vangelis sound.Vangelis played all of the instruments on this album including synthesizers, electric piano, acoustic piano, a full drum kit, and percussion.  Vangelis is joined by the English Chamber Choir (conducted by Guy Protheroe) with Vana Veroutis as the lead female vocal, in addition to Jon Anderson (vocals/lyrics on Heaven and Hell (Part 1 So Long Ago, So Clear).  Vangelis is quite a good musician and really shines on the acoustic piano. As a huge Yes fan, I was delighted to hear Jon's excellent voice and cosmic lyrics.  As far as the inclusion of the choir goes, I did not mind it that much and felt that it added a very interesting textural element to the recording.The Heaven and Hell suite is divided into two lengthy movements including Part I (21'58") and Part II (21'16").  In general, the first part is more orchestral in nature and features the choir and excellent acoustic piano playing by Vangelis.  Another general observation is that the first movement mixes vigorous sections that feature drums with spacey and haunting synth-dominated passages.  Of course, my favorite part comes at the end of Part I, which is the 4'58" section with Jon on vocals.  This short "song" is quite moving and uplifting.  Movement II is a little darker and more experimental than the first movement and is my favorite of the two.  The choir is featured on the second movement, along with a beautiful wordless vocal by the very talented Vana Veroutis.  Part II closes with a very spacey and quiet synthesizer section, which provides excellent contrast with the preceding thunderous percussion section.All in all, this is a good Vangelis album and is recommended along with Albedo 0.39 (1976); Spiral (1977); and the excellent Opera Sauvage (1979)</review_text>
Coming from a listener with a broad scope of musical preferences, Blues has always been a multi-faceted genre which can be broken down into the categories:Soulful Blues, Drinking Blues and Guitar Blues. "B.B King - Live At The Regal" is one of those recordings that just happens to capture all three.This recording is dear to my heart as I can remember far back as first or second grade when my grandmother (God Bless) used to play this on 8-track. She used to love herself some Riley "Blues Brother" King. This recording ALWAYS seemed to be in the player when my cousins and I would come over to visit and rest assured, You WILL hear it before you left to go home.At that time, Being the young naive kid that I was, I remember saying that I hated it and that it was old folks music. All grown up now, In an age where real music is practically unheard of in terms of what these young artists of today release on CDs, I have a newfound respect for real stuff like this. So instead of sitting around burning your brain cells trying to understand what this new generation is calling itself creating, You have decided to come to one of the first sources for good old fasioned real music....The Blues.In my opinion, "BB King Live At The Regal" is one of Mr. King's best recordings and with myself not being a big fan of live albums, This is one of those rare live pieces that captures the essence of what a live recording should sound like. Maybe not so much in terms of the musicianship but the overall performance of those involved. The arrangements were put together nicely & the musicians were all in a very tight vibe on this album and whoever was on the mixing board did an excellent job of capturing this essence. BB's pickin' and crooning mixed with the superb playing by the band make this a wonderful place to start for the blues or BB King enthusiast.It sounds as if it was made in a tasteful nightclub full of grown people who wanted to hear good music while having a good time. The ladies were screaming and the gentlemen were cheering and BB was playing at his best. The only gripe I have about this disc is that it is very short; which was typical considering the age and time that it was made but still essential and a solid lesson for anyone interested in Blues (especially Blues Guitar). I recommend getting this and BB's "Live In Cook County Jail". They both are live albums and both have some of the same songs on them but they were done in a different way and should still be heard.Good choice if you get this one.</review_text>
Nobody captures the spirit and essence of a city at night like New York City's own Ultrablue. The group is the brainchild of keyboardist/producer John Smatla and jazz guitarist Dave Stryker, who bring in an NYC all-star cast of players in addition to their impressive band ensemble to create a sophisticated and evocative musical mood. ULTRABLUE is the latest outing for Ultrablue, and the first release on 215 Records. The project drips of chill, smooth jazz, and rich, rhythmic textures that will keep the project in replay mode for a good while in your car and home players and on your iPod. Special guests include singer/saxophonist Pete Belasco, trumpet/flugelhorn player Randy Brecker, female vocal group, Allure, flutist Nestor Torres and Brazilian vocalist Gabriella Anders. From the sexy saunter, "Guilty Pleasures" and the spicy and sultry, "Indiscretions," to the scintillating "Soul Candy," ULTRABLUE provides such a cool groove and flow that it really does lend itself to be the perfect soundtrack to a night out or in (for that matter). Pete Belasco is featured on the sensual cover "The Summer Knows" while Nestor Torres livens things up on the groove, "Jungle Fever," and the delicious Gabriela Anders delivers an alluring vocal on "Destiny." The project's first single, "Shiver," is already attracting radio airplay from coast to coast... We expect big things from Ultrablue on this and all of their future releases. This is the new standard of Smooth Jazz. ~SANDY SHOR</review_text>
I bought this Cd yesterday and I immediatly knew it was going to rock! After hearing the title track,Go!, I knew this Cd was going to be different then the Spice Girls Cds. It is better. My favorite songs are Never Be The Same Again,Ga Ga,and Goin Down.</review_text>
I have listened to the cuts from this CD and was amazed at how quickly it  transported me back to the time.  There were several tracks that I was  delighted to see since the artists were not popular enough to have an  entire album re-released.  If you are in a mood for a good dose of  nostalgia, this is the set for you!</review_text>
Studio album released in 1971, by the original band-a real band with Alice Cooper, Neal Smith, Dennis Dunaway, Michael Bruce, and Glen Buxton. I think the other band members (apart from Cooper), got the short end of the stick. This album, along with these 'Love it to death', 'Billion dollar babies', and 'Love it to death' are so vastly superior to 'his' other albums. The band plays and writes really well together as a 'real' band. Case in point, listen to 'Dada' from a few years later-dreadful! Just wish he had kept a proper band together, even if he fealt that they were not as musically good as some of the late session musicians. Rock is about feel, more than technique in my opinion. I can't even listen to 'Dada' or</review_text>
I'm not sure about all that other nonsense the reviewer before me is talking about (sounds like someone with an axe to grind)but this album is a stunning piece of workmanship. The music is inspired, the melodies transcending, and the emotion - deep and meaningful. As far as "copying Yanni" goes, well - I don't agree, in fact, Yanni is far more generic and less inspired. The sound samples the cranky reviewer alludes to are in fact NOT the same nor, are they Yanni's creation. I write this review to commend mr farish on his work, and to take to task the idiot who misinformed others and couldn't resist his own urge to see his "critique" in print. Ryans music is distinctly his own, no question - and any similarities are tonal, and not compositional - which the reveiwer would be well advised to take note of. As far as I'm concerned, you be the judge - and let cranky wannabe music critics continue to wallow in their own self hate as they surf store shelve's and websites for music to criticize - and well, make themselves feel a little better. Personally, I would recommend this album to anyone who likes strong songs with great production and uplifting energy. All the other stuff is for hacks! enjoy this music! I do.</review_text>
An outstanding compilation of a wide variety of popular and regional styles from across Mexico.  This set examines both traditional and contemporary music, including a brilliant ska-banda mix by the popular &quot;rock en espanol&quot; band, Cafe Tacuba.  Rancheras, corridos, boleros, indie rock and various stylistic fusions are represented, and even a few sones from Veracruz -- one of my favorite musical genres!  If you are curious about the rich musical heritage of this large but often slighted nation, then check this collection out... It might open more than a few new musical doors</review_text>
Now I know what you're thinking, why are there two releases of "XX"?  Well after they switched from Eclipse to Universal records they re-released the album "XX" but they also re-recorded all the songs with less hard core vocals (BIG MISTAKE!)  The original album is by far much better than the Universal release in December of 2001.  If you're not sure which one to go with GO WITH THIS ONE!</review_text>
Anybody know the name of the song played at the very end of the movie, when the brother and the sister are saying goodbye to each other, when she is crying and asking him what he is going to do with his life? Right before he enters the bus... I would LOVE to listen to it again but I can't find it anywhere..</review_text>
This is a CD that one can listen to countless times. The virtuoso playing and beautiful tone produced by Michael aptly display the characteristics of the euphonium. The selections are for college and graduate level players,  as well as the occasionally &quot;gifted&quot; highschooler. A must hear,  and a must buy</review_text>
Robbie's flow corses through your veins causing a feeling of total ecstacy and rejuvination. To have a CD that has the power to lift your spirit and your soul is something I feel so honored to have in my possesion. Hats off to Robbie</review_text>
Much improved voice, same great guitar. Slow album, especially on his two remakes. Country sound on No Reason To Cry (beautiful solo). This CD would have been a 6 stars had he mixed in a thunderstorm to the background of Gonna Rain Today</review_text>
'Live Etc' is an absolute must-have compilation for all true Gong fans.It features a total of fifteen live tracks of tunes that originally appeared on the band's key albums 'Camembert Electrique','Flying Teapot','Angel's Egg' and 'You'.Taken from unreleased live soundboard tapes(I assume)from shows between 1973-75.Absolute best cut here is "Where Have All The Flowers Gone?" along with "6/8 Tune",that are the disc's only unreleased material.Other cosmic gems include "Dynamite/I Am Your Animal","Isle Of Everywhere","Oily Way" and "Master Builder".Duration is 78:33.Heard they wanted to add the 16th cut that was originally on the 2-lp record,but the CD simply wouldn't hold it.Talk about wanting to give your fans their money's worth.Long live the mother Gong ship!Recommended</review_text>
I just love lynch mixed with dooms production. It is what real is</review_text>
This CD reminds me once again why Russian liturgical music is one of the treasures of the world: beautiful, profound, awe-inspiring, uplifting.For the most part, the pieces are well chosen and the performances excellent. I am delighted to see that many of the tracks are from the classic recording of the Rachmaninoff Vespers made in the early 1970s by the USSR Ministry of Culture Chamber Choir directed by Valery Polyansky, and released in the USA by Angel-Melodiya.  I wore out my copy of the LP years ago; although it has been reissued on CD, it's out of print and very hard to find. So it is wonderful to see a generous selection from that recording available on this disk.Listen to track 11, "Praise the Lord O My Soul", sung by the chamber choir and mezzo Irina Arkhipova. You would have to have a heart of stone not to be moved as she sings "Slava Ghospidin" (Praise to the Lord). And listen to how the basses descend to B-flat at end. It just doesn't get any better than this</review_text>
I saw the Outlaws live twice in the early eighties and had a great time at both shows.  This album is just plain fun to listen to and brings back some very fond memories</review_text>
I have been hankering after this great album on CD for a long time now. Imagine my surprise to suddenly find out that it is available. Surprise turned to shock when I saw the price. Does the company that produces this CD not realise that are people all around the world (including South Africa where I live) who are very keen on this album? At this stage though, it is only the very wealthy that can afford it.</review_text>
This is the first cd I've bought in the Liquid Mind series, but after hearing this one, I'll buy more.  The music is calming and soothing; great to fall asleep by which I often do.  It lulls you into a peaceful state of relaxation, letting your mind drift away from the cares of the day.  It makes me think of floating on a cloud.  I would highly recommend this cd for anyone with a busy, stressed-out life.</review_text>
Superior to the first Steppenwolf album in many ways, and including a song that tops even 'Born To Be Wild' itself, 'Magic Carpet Ride', is as essential as the group's first album, even to the casual rock fan.It opens with 'Faster Than The Speed Of Life', a perfect blend of Steppenwolfish hard rock & Airplanesque psychedelic rock (like 'She Has Funny Cars').'Tighten Up Your Wing' is an upbeat, bluesy track, that bounces well along, before being replaced with 'None Of Your Doing', a Steppenwolf-classic, that shifts gear between verse & chorus.'Spiritual Fantasy' is one of the strangest creations on the album, strangely touching, though appaling at first. But given a second chance, it comes across as one of the best tracks on the album.The marihuana-anthem 'Don't Step On The Grass, Sam' is pure heavy Steppenwolf, a timeless classic, that crunches slowly, but steadily along.'28' is a great rock song with just a hint of psychedelia in the melody. A neat little rocker that is followed by the ultimate psychedelic dance track.'Magic Carpet Ride' is simply Steppenwolf's best song ever, a fantastic blend of rhytm, melody & vision, that is worth the price of all Steppenwolf's classic albums on its own. It was also the only of their singles to almost replicate 'Born To Be Wild's US #2 placing, when it shot to #3 on the US chart.'Disappointment Number' is almost that, but then not again. It is an odd ode to/parody of old blues, complete with bird sounds in the background, as if it's an old blues singer sitting out in the open.'Lost And Found By Trial And Error' has a great tune, and rocks away well, as does 'Hodge, Podge, Strained Through A Leslie' and 'Resurrection'. Both employ the classic Steppenwolf sound in a great rocking way, to become, if not classics, then at least Steppenwolf-standards.The album closes with 'Reflections' a weird song, that seems like somebody trying to be visionary, before you realize that that is just what he is. Just in a very peculiar way.The album has some, if not weak, then not too powerful spots, but generally it is a more than worthy follow-up to the first Steppenwolf album, with a great blend of the band's traditional hard rock and a form of psychedelia that suits them perfectly. Even the least interesting tracks rock nicely, & no-one should have anything to complain about here..</review_text>
With all the 'Neuvo Flamenco' and its accompaning popularity. It is nice (and a relief) I might add, to hear the flamenco guitar in its purist form. Not only does this cd contain Sabicas and Nino Ricardo. It also contains four very rare perfomances by Manolo de Huelva. Which are difficult to find anywhere. Also included are Melchor de Marchena performing six pieces. This is truly Pure Flamenco at its best</review_text>
The ufo space travel theme of Astonomy domine is continued on Let there be more light Saucerful of secrets and Set the controls. Rick wrights two songs are real good Remember a day is one of the best on here. Seesaw has interesting percusson. Corporal Clegg floyds first ww2 song is upbeat Syds song Jugband blues is one of the best early Pink Floyd songs.Saucerful of secerets is a good early Pink Floyd cd it is an important part of Pink Floyds history.</review_text>
Este CD es excelente! Se los recomiendo a todos los que les guste la musica buena. Robi es un gran poeta y filosofo</review_text>
I was first touched by Pavarotti's voice as a teenager in the early 80's when I saw a PBS special of this concert on television.  The power of his voice and his personality are incomparable.  His rendition of Ave Maria is especially touching.  I would recommend this as a first buy for anyone who is new to the operatic experience, as I was so many years ago</review_text>
One of the great metal albums of our time. From the drumming to the guitar alls that can be said is amazing.</review_text>
I discovered Seal the same way that most people did: through his utterly beautiful song "Kiss From A Rose".  I heard it on the radio one day, and played it constantly for months after that until I finally decided to purchase the album the song was from.  As it happens, the song is from Seal's most revered album, his multi-platinum 1994 self-titled album.  (This is not to be confused with his other self-titled album, his debut, released in 1991.)  I didn't know what to expect when I bought the album, having heard only one song from it, but months after purchasing it I'm glad I made the gamble.I think that the sub-genre which best classifies SEAL is urban.  Urban music, according to All Music Guide, is smooth and polished, often romantic, sometimes uptempo and funky, and features soulful vocals.  SEAL has all of this and more.  It has techno beats, but they're not as overwhelming as one might expect.  They blend together with peaceful, occasionally ethereal guitars and Seal's incredibly soothing singing.  This is, no doubt, stylish music, but first and foremost it's a collection of warm, encouraging songs penned by a very talented musician.  There's nothing that comes close to being a bad song here; there's not even a slightly weak composition.  Thus it's a little harder to pick highlights than usual.  Some highlights include the strong opening track, "Bring It On"; the emotional hit "Prayer For The Dying"; the shimmering "Dreaming In Metaphors"; the upbeat "Newborn Friend"; and, needless to say, the absolutely wonderful "Kiss From A Rose".  The closing track, "Bring It On (Reprise)" is another beautiful song, but "Kiss From A Rose" is possibly the most lovely song I've ever heard.  Listening to it in the warmth of one's home during a snowy December afternoon is an incredibly powerful experience.The message of the album, if there is one, is "Keep on going - life is beautiful!"  It could fail under any other popular artist, but Seal succeeds marvelously.  This is some of the most heartfelt, inspirational singing I've ever heard.  There's a delightful optimism in Seal's singing that sounds strong rather than naiive.  It's hard to feel down after listening to such an uplifting album as this.  Seal is certainly one of the most talented musicians of R&B (or rock - you decide).  These songs have clear, strong messages, warm, inspirational lyrics, heartfelt, soothing singing, danceable beats, and a whole lot of emotion.Once you've heard "Kiss From A Rose", I guarantee you'll want to pick up the album.  If you're already thinking of doing so, then I encourage you to go forward and buy it; you won't regret it.  It's become one of my favorite albums.  When you're feeling disillusioned or depressed with the state of your life or just life in general, look no further than SEAL to make you cherish it once again.</review_text>
They may have a new name, but their sound remains the same as before. Mixed with club-friendly beats and laid back drunken-style, the Liks have crafted the perfect party CD. Tracks like &quot;Run Wild&quot; (possibly the best track on the CD, certainly the most fun to listen to), &quot;Sickness&quot; (with Butch Cassidy providing some very tight vocals on he hook), and the Neptunes-produced &quot;Best U Can&quot; showcase The Liks' party appeal, while head-nodders like &quot;Bully Foot&quot; (with Busta Rhymes) and &quot;Another Round&quot; create a more relaxed vibe for the listener. The Liks also get outside help from artists like fellow Likwit-Crewmember Defari (&quot;My Dear&quot;) and Kurupt (the cleverly-titled &quot;Promote Violins&quot;). Of course, Xzibit holds it down on his two tracks, &quot;Bar Code&quot; and &quot;151&quot;. The only way this Cd differs from their last releases is the instruments, varying from violins (&quot;Promote Violins&quot;), trumpets (&quot;L-I-K-S&quot;), and even 40 ounce bottles (&quot;40 oz. Quartet&quot; skits). The thing you shouldn't expect to find is deep lyrics or dark productions (go grab Mobb Deep). However, copping &quot;X.O. Experience&quot; could be the best refreshment for this summer's heat. If you like &quot;X.O. Experience&quot;, check out: &quot;Xzibit - Restless&quot;, &quot;Alkaholiks - Likwidation&quot;, &quot;Kurupt - Space Boogie&quot;, &quot;Eastsidaz - Ducez &amp; Trayz&quot</review_text>
Bireli is not only one of the best living guitar players in gypsy jazz - he is also one of the most creative.  On this album, he gives us a new take on Django's music that is simply stunning.  "Move" has a smaller, more focused sound that it's predecessors, and the addition of the saxophone brings a really fresh twist to this great old music.Bireli is one of the hottest jazzmen around - this disc is all the evidence you'll need to draw the same conclusion.  Bravo!</review_text>
This album is just non-stop funky.  I originally got it just because I loved Living In America when I first heard it- but I was pleasantly surprised to find the rest of the cd just as good.  Check out Turn Me Loose  I'm Dr. Feelgood, Let's Get Personal, and Gravity- they're among the best  on the cd</review_text>
What's more to say about what may be the best "rock" album ever (especially if you consider the "My Kingdom" EP to be the second disc in a two disc set)?  The most emotionally wide-ranging album from one of the best bands ever.  Who else has ever made music like FSOL?  The Beatles and Fripp&Crimson are the only possible contenders.  I've never heard anything that does a better job of juxtaposing the terrifying and the unbearably beautiful.  If I could pinpoint the one disinguishing feature of all FSOL/AA releases, it would be (as a line in "The Isness" goes) "...[a longing for] inexhaustible ecstasy." It's all the more poignant on this album because of its being interwoven with themes of terror, paranoia and a sense of unrecoverable loss of something without which life isn't worth living.  It sounds hokey, but just opening up the booklet while listening to "Her Face Forms in Summertime" and reading the scrawled message "things are getting f*&ked up round here" makes my eyes a little watery.  My CD developed a 2 second glitch and I just ordered another one--this is so incredible that nothing less than perfection will do.Just a few points of note: if you're wondering why you spent all that money on your two channel stereo and you haven't heard this album yet, pick it up and turn it up.  I've heard recordings with more bottom end and slam, but none with more depth, nuance and musicality.  I've also found that one of the true tests of a Masterpiece is whether it's possible to really enjoy listening to anything else after its over.  Play Coltrane's "Ascension," Beethoven's String Quartet in A Minor Op. 132, or Bruckner's Ninth and see what I mean.  I played Dead Cities last night and everything to which  I tried to listen sounded hopelessly trivial afterwards.  In the early 80s, a lot of my friends used to speak of The Clash as "the only band that mattered."  At the time, I didn't think any band had mattered all that much since '72.  To my now-much-older ears, FSOL fits that description more accurately than any band to the last 35 years, and this is probably their best work (every single one of them is a desert island disc, however).  One of the very few utterly timeless classics of modern music, and a record that belongs in the collection of anyone with ears.</review_text>
Quem no gosta de samba, bom sujeito no ,  ruim da cabea ou doente do p...essa letra desse samba serve para definir melhor o cd da marisa monte. Quem no gostar dele,  doente da cabea, do ouvido, do corpo, etc.  um trabalho dedicado, na medida certa para esta cantora, verdadeira diva da mpb. Recomendo a todos.</review_text>
I received "The Piano" promptly, and in pristine, excellent condition.</review_text>
a lot of people seem to snub their noses at Let's Talk About Love because it wasn't the career-defining album as the album that preceded it, but all in all, it's still a fantastic snapshot for Celine's career in 1997.Celine shocked almost everyone by releasing a follow-up so shortly (Falling Into You was still in the top 40 on the charts at the time) but it was very worthy.Among my faves on the album include "The Reason", "Immortality" with The Bee Gees (for a "Celine-less" version of the song, check out The Bee Gees' 2-disc hits collection from 2001), "Love Is On The Way", the very funky "Treat Her Like A Lady", "To Love You More" and the beautiful singalong title track.   This album also housed "My Heart Will Go On" which certainly helped push this album to sales over 9 million.   While it was a song that you wanted to smash the stereo at the time because it was being played every five minutes, I'd say enough time has passed that once again you can enjoy and appreciate this beautiful, powerful ballad.With "Falling Into You" and this album, Celine was the #1 female artist for a period, becoming a superstar right as Mariah was abandoning AC for r&b, as Alanis was going on hiatus for awhile, and when Shania was taking off but hadn't yet exploded into major-superstardom.  Love her or malign her (it seems fashionable to do the latter), she became one of the premier voices in Adult Contemporary and won over a large audience.  I haven't been a fan at all of her last few albums, but if she ever comes back with an album like these two, I'd snatch it up in a heartbeat</review_text>
This album grabbed my attention from the first measure. Thick and heavy,  this is not like any blues album I've ever heard. Very atypical for Hidalgo  as well. This one is probably an acquired taste- one for the truly hard  core blues fan. The sheer uniqueness grabbed me from the start, and the  more I listen to it, the more I like it. I can only hope there's a Houndog  2 in the works..</review_text>
I heard The Chairman Dances and went right to Amazon to order this. This ia a lovely little gem of a CD, and it is so pleasing to find John Adams, another great modern American composer. I'm also a fan of composers such as Christopher Rouse, for example, and Joe Leniado Chira is my cousin. Modern composers are a precious resource that we should explore, demand more of and nurture. We afficianados would like to see symphony orchestras and ensembles giving more attention to the modern genre. Meanwhile, John Adams has impressed me with this disc. The Chairman Dances is my favorite. I can just see Chairman Mao doing a vigorous foxtrot to this, and Tricky Dick feeling jealous. This might be the music that opened China to the West</review_text>
although each track is beautiful in it's own way, it's their sum that makes this such an incredible album in my mind. where felt mountain remained rather mellow and etheral thruought the entire album, black cherry offers more in the way of diverse melodies and tempo.  the tracks seem to be placed specifically in a way that makes the album feel like a journey, and, personally, like a lay's potato chip, not able to listen to just one....yeah, i need the whole thing..</review_text>
MY HUSBAND AND I PLAY THIS CD ALL THE TIME.  WE BOTH LOVE IT</review_text>
Listen, did I hear someone say "lack of energy?"Get this album, as my lovely wife did for me last Christmas, from Amazon, BTW, and listen to this lineup: Fire & Water, Mr. Big, I'm A Mover, Woman,  All Right Now, Oh I Wept, Stealer, Walk in My Shadow... Oh, get up off the floor, amigo... see, it's you that's having a lack of energy... I know, this music is like a workout, emotionally, aurally, and in the old pleasure zone too. Rodgers & the late great Paul Kossoff surely knew how to sell a song, didn't they? Perhaps these fellows were near the best, not only at the time, but in any century of Rock/blues/git-down-kick in-the-mud blooz music. Yowzah</review_text>
I have been a fan for Jaci Velasquez for the past eight years and enjoy hearing her voice in both languages.  I do not speak Spanish but enjoy her artistic abilities none the less.  This album lived up to the Velasquez name in my book- My family and I only really enjoy the traditional sounding Christmas carols and tend to not enjoy the revised versions.  Jaci's album not only made sure the carols were sung traditionally but she has given us a gift a couple new songs that will be added to my Christmas traditions!  Overall I LOVE this album and the only reason I did not give it a full five stars was that I am done with that Chipmunk Song.  Sorry everybody.</review_text>
I think his debut had the best lyrics. This joint gets off to a good start with We Still Party and pretty much bangs till the end. His production on here is best described as "Late 90's Roger Troutman-esque G-Funk".Geust Stars like 2nd II NOne, AMG, Suga Free and El Debarge get their shine on.Top Joints:We Still Party 	(Peter Gunz and Quik on the track) Quik jacks the VERB song from School House Rock. (The Jam)So Many WayzHand In HandYou'z A Ganxta 	(Quik refutes rumors that he was involved in Biggie's demise. Also denounces reference to death in rap songs.)I Useta Know Her (Should be called I Useta Hit That)SpeedMedley for a 'V' (The P***y Medley)Get 2Getha Again (Class of 91, 2nd II None, AMG and Quik triple team on this track.)Reprise (Medley For A 'V)</review_text>
I bought this for my kids because I knew they would love these songs just as I did.  Forget them!  I love it!  There is NOTHING like the Chipmunks and never will be again.  The Christmas song is worth the price alone.  Don't think about it.  Just get it</review_text>
For those who have watched the movie Jaws (ask yourself, who hasn't) will know that one of many key elements that made the movie a huge success was the fantastic score John Williams did for it. This cd captures all the music from the movie perfectly, with some new elements thrown in that are not found in the film.The linear notes are bright and colourful and provide some interesting information, which gives the overall package a nice touch. The overall cd package is certainly not a rushed effort and is worth every cent. A highly recommended purchase for those who love their soundtracks or anyone who wants to relive the film through the music</review_text>
I have just purchased this CD (the day it came out!) and from what I've heard, it is amazing, surpassing (but not replacing) Boulez's earlier recording. If you are a fan of Boulez, 20th century music, or music in general, this is a must get</review_text>
Their 4th album as a complete group (not counting the few album Havoc & Prode'je put out) is my least favorite of the 4 SCC albums I have (I don't have the one from 1992 or 2005), but it still gets itself a 4 star rating.  Out of the 13 songs on here none are vclassics or worth skipping; 4 are ok and the other 9 are good.  Like all their albums, guests are minimal and are on are on 2 of the 13 songs.  Production is mostly handled by Prode'je (as with all their albums) he does get a little help from Robert "Fonksta" Bacon & Tomie Mundie.  A good album to have for SCC fans but not their best work.#1 - 8#2 - 8#3 - 7.5#4 - 7.5#5 - 7#6 - 8#7 - 8.5 (f/ C-Bo, Spice 1, Prophet ---- also on their "Gangsta Conversation" album)#8 - 9 (f/ Daz Dillinger --- good beat)#9 - 8#10 - 9 (good beat, deeper song -- my favorite on here)#11 - 8#12 - 8 (another deeper song)#13 - 7.5SCC is --- Havikk, Prode'je, Havoc, L.V., DJ Gripp, DJ KaosCheck all my review</review_text>
This CD provides a fantastic overview of Rypdal, who has been recording for ECM for 30+ years now.  The tracks range from pieces with an &quot;electric Miles&quot; sound to an orchestrated track.  While very diverse, the tracks work well together and are unified by his unique,atmospheric tone and excellent compositions.  The infamous ECM sound quality is even better due to 24 bit mastering.  Informative liner notes as well.  Highly recommended</review_text>
What has happened to the song "Lives in the balance" on this set?  If you go to his website it sounds really great!!!  On this set it sounds awfull!!  It sounds as if he was in a really big hurry to get the song over with.  The packaging if you could call it that is really lame.  Foam dots for holders?  What do you do when those fall off?  I suppose you put the cd's in jewel cases or else they will get really scratched up.  Not to mention it is missing some of his greatest work!  True you do get alot of songs for the money but, there should have been more time planning this set out before actually producing it.  If you own an I-pod I suggest you go to apples I-tunes web page and import the great songs this set is missing as well as the others you really like off of this set and you will probably have spent the same amount of money if not less</review_text>
The Coltrane soundscapes that this CD is infused flies to the mountain and back again, that's the truth, but one troubling question for me remains; no matter how much I enjoy this fusion incarnation by masters (new & old) - Where in the world is Alan Holdsworth?If any fusion guitar player has the rightful title claim to the Coltrane moniker - it's Holdsworth. For years he's been building the bridge between the good old philosophies and the new world order.Including Holdsworth would have just been the jazziest thing to do.</review_text>
It was my full belief that the next time we would hear from Buju Banton on an album would be on the now 2 years anticipated `Rasta Got Soul' album. The album which has still yet to arrive (and may never) was said to be along Buju's best and might actually rival his seminal classic `Til Shiloh. He even tipped his hand 2 years ago by releasing the album's first single, the `magical' Magic City. So the world was waiting to see just how much Soul the album had.However. Between then and now Buju has been going through so many events that this album, Too Bad, almost seems like a smack in the face to his critics. Forever, it seems that he is still living in the `Boom Bye Bye Curse', and having some legal matters which prevented him traveling, he apparently has been angered by all the unwanted attention and the result is Too Bad. The album has a severe kick to it, it can actually sit not too far away from his `stablemate' Assassin's Infiltrate from `05, in terms of style.The attraction here is actually the subject of  `confusion'. While we were waiting for a massive roots album to come down the pipe, Buju hasn't made a pure dancehall album in a very very long time. Thus, the DJ who was once the dancehall's main attraction stepping back into the fray isn't at all a bad thing. So fans who sit longing for the days of Stamina Daddy and Batty Rider are the one's who'll be happy and I can fit into that camp as well! But at the same time, Buju's concentration for the last decade or so has been the roots, so now it is there where he will ultimately excel. However, with the current trend in dancehall to revive older riddims, you may find yourself feeling like 1991 all over again.The best tune here is probably  the hard hard `Til It Bend. Til it Bend is serious serious rudey dancehall. The song might sound like the rest to the untrained ear, but I guarantee that is the song most Jamaican will pull up, Til it Bend is nice! Also check the wicked wicked Nothing, Who Have It?, the ultra clever Better Day and the nice Hey Boy over the Petty Thief riddim.However, my second favorite song here I would have to say would be the combination Don & Dupes with underrated dancehall singer Pinchers who has been making a very very nice return to the scene recently, largely due to his connection with Madhouse head, Dave Kelly. Buju makes an attempt (for some reason) at the useless Wipeout riddim on Me & Unu and actually makes it work a little. Also check when things slow down on nice tunes such as Driver, which is easily one of the best tunes on the album.Overall, the thought alone, Buju doing another dancehall album may have some salivating and some wondering where the roots is, this one may appeal to both group of hardcore fans. While there is nothing here that I would call definitive roots reggae, this album has such an old school vibes to it that anyone who has ever been a fan of Buju's will find something they like. I would have like to have seen Buju have at least one Lenky riddim on the album, a Wayne Wonder combination (although Pinchers subs just fine) and definitely the massive song Beauty Queen from the Twice Again riddim would have fit just fine here, but nevertheless, what you do have: High quality dancehall from one of the greatest architects of that skill is just fine and Too Bad, over both what Beenie and Baby Cham have done, is the best pure dancehall album of 2006 to date, and a boomshot in the arm for the genre</review_text>
I ordered mine from here (Amazon Marketplace) a couple weeks ago, and I'm a very happy camper. This is one of the best online purchases I've made in a long, long time! First of all, there are songs I've never heard before, so by owning this compilation, it helps me get to know the band's material, or Siobhan's own solo stuff much better. All the songs are very well-written and catchy. Thanks to my best friend, he drew me toward's SS's music back in the 90's with the "HORMONALLY YOURS" CD. SS's music was always something I pushed to the "back burner" because I didn't know what to make of it. But in the past 2 years, I've focused on the new material from the "Shakespears Sister #3" album...and it blew me away! Siobhan is a true musical genius!"I DON'T CARE" seems to be a differnt version. It's much brighter & fresher-sounding than the album version. Wow!"HELLO (TURN YOUR RADIO ON) is my favorite "SS" song of all time & also appears to be a different version. Just hearing the first notes from it, my eyes got all teary. It's just the way I am, regarding this song. The Clock ticking at the end reminds me of a heartbeat or something. Dark songs like this draw me near. LOL The compilation is missing one song "BITTER PILL". I wanted & hoped for this song to be released on the CD, but unfortunately it didn't make it. Awwww!The liner notes booklet is packed with all lyrics, cool photos and a fine page of background regarding the recordings of their albums. Siobhan is one cool gal! I love the front & back artwork, for it is both amusing, colorful & dramatic. I'm a sucker for dramatic stuff like this. Hopefully, Siobhan will continue recording lots of new material, using the "Shakespears Sister" title. I despise the crap we hear on the radio nowadays. Hopefully now that SF has released this package, the music will get more airplay. I like the nostalgic aspect of music from a decade ago, because it reminds us of how the music industry used to be non-commercial and fun. Yes...it's too bad that Siobhan and Marcella broke up, because their 2 uniquely different voices complimented one another. There hasn't been a duo like them since!My Thoughts on the DVD...I love it! The first & only video clip I've ever seen from "SS" is "STAY". Totaly blew me away since the first time I saw it. I've always loved seeing Siobhan as "Death", in her starry crown & black "Glitzy" outfit. She makes the perfect female version of "Death". I could never understand the video until now, because I never had the chance to see the entire thing on TV. The other videos are equally great and draw me closer each time.I appreciate the "Chaptered" Menu for the videos. At least I know what's from where. The DVD was put together very well, and is packed with great stuff.Fortunately, my DVD player on the Computer and the TV can play this All-Region PAL DVD. I haven't experienced any difficulties (skipping tracks or anything). It all plays fine. Actually, when i purchased this Item online, the item description said "NTSC Format (USA & CANADA)...so that's why I bought it. It may not apply to everyone's purchase, though.DISC ONE (CD):01- You're History02- Heroine03- Break My Heart (You Really)04- Dirty Mind05- Waiting06- Goodbye Cruel World07- Stay08- I Don't Care09- Hello (Turn Your Radio On)10- I Can Drive11- Excuse Me John12- Can U Wait That Long?13- Do I Scare You?14- White Rabbit15- Was It Something I Said?DISC TWO (DVD):01- Break My Heart (You Really)02- Heroine03- Run Silent, Run Deep04- You're History05- Dirty Mind (Remix)06- The Russian Film (Featuring Dirty Mind & Heroine Live in Leningrad 1988)07- Goodbye Cruel World08- Stay09- I Don't Care10- Catwoman (Live)11- My 16th Apology (Edit)12- Hello (Turn Your Radio On)13- I Can DriveAdditional Features/Info:- Biography (Same as on 1st page of Linernotes booklet)- Photo Gallery With Audio (Music)- Credits (for Videos)- CD Total Playing Time (62:03)If you're an "SS" fan, this item is a MUST HAVE! Regardless the price, it's definitely worth owning! Thank You, Amazon, for making this item available through your Marketplace</review_text>
The previous review has a few inaccuracies I thought I'd correct. First off, the beats on all of Atmosphere's albums, including this one, are produced and created by Ant, not DJ Abilities. Ant does not perform live, and so Slug often used to perform with DJ Abilities (and others). This may change in the next album as Atmosphere now includes a band soon to tour, but it's extermely likely Ant will be included in the production.Slug has never been 1/3 of Atmosphere, he has and always will be the main driving force and only consistent member of the group. Even when Spawn was a member of Atmosphere, Slug was still clearly the leader and brains beyond the operation, as evidenced by the tracks on Overcast!, all of which were dominated by Slug.Yes, this album is quite different from the newer stuff, and represents a critical moment in Atmosphere's evolution. Of course, anyone can listen to it. Even those silly "fan boys." It's a ridiculous notion to suggest that because something has changed, people won't like earlier incantations of the same group. It's that elitist old school b.s. and it's annoying. Some may not like it, but most hip-hop fans will probably enjoy it.What makes this album so interesting is how raw it is, and, as Slug says in the liner notes, how it's representative of his transformation as an MC. Recorded between Overcast! and Lucy Ford, you can witness Slug move from being a whitty, well-versed thug to something deeper and more innovative. Both elements are present. "The Abusing of the Rib" is one of the more evolved tracks on the album, while "@ It Again" is about sleeping with all sorts of girls in the Twin Cities, including yours of course. Note that I say "evolved" not in the sense that one song is better than another, but rather more representative of Slug's later work (Lucy Ford).This album represents a critical moment in the history of what I believe is the best hip hop group (individual) out there. While it doesn't have the catchiest melodies (the beats are great, just not catchy), it has some amazing rhymes and showcases Slug's ability to flow quickly and rap prolifically. Check it out</review_text>
This CD is a must for anyone who enjoys great guitar music. Its packed full of amazing pieces and inspiring playing. My favorite track is Isn't it Romantic because it successfully makes a classic out of this song. BUY IT NOW!!</review_text>
Although this sports new remastering, unless you have either the Golden Hits CD available here at Amazon and your local CD shop, the now out of print Golden Celebration boxed set or the 2 volume "Patti Page Collection" series (Volume 2 is also out of print), this is unnecessary as it duplicates every track on Golden Hits except for Let Me Go Lover instead of With My Eyes Wide Open I'm Dreaming and the songs are arranged in a different order.  Fans are better off looking for the 2 previous out of print collections with Let Me Go Lover to obtain this track and for the rest of this stuff, either buy Golden Hits, the boxed set and the 2 volume Patti Page Collection series, and BTW, Vol. 1 is still in print so you can order it right here at Amazon</review_text>
As a pretty big comedy fan thanks to XM radio, i have listened to a lot of comics and I own a lot of comic CD's (Mitch Hedberg, Bill Hicks, Emo Philips, Lewis Black, Steven Wright, Pablo Francisco etc.) and my absolute favorite is Unprotected.  There is not a slow part on this CD and it never fails to bring everyone to tears on a long car ride.  His quick and merciless wit is better than any other comic in the US.  His family must be very understanding since he doesn't hesitate to include every detail of their personal lives in his act, but it all serves to create a punchline that we can all relate to.  The highlights of this CD are his daughter's boyfriend and guidelines for resuming sex after a heart attack.  I highly highly reccomend this</review_text>
If you want some Classical music to sleep to, don't buy this CD.  If you want some high energy symphonies, however, I highly recommend it.  From Bach to Vivaldi, the pure energy of this CD will give you a new understanding of the joys of Classical music.  Just don't listen to Track 25, because I have no idea why John Philip Sousa is included with Tchaichovsky</review_text>
This is one of the most beautiful, restorative collections of Celtic music I have ever heard.  Haunting, sublime harp, cello, guitar, flute, and soundscapes create an atomosphere of serenity for meditation, prayer, or simply unwinding the mind and emotions.  The poetry which originated each selection is included and provides a meditation in itself.  Highly recommended</review_text>
Juice Newton is one of the best counry-pop singers of all times. A great energetic voice and some real unforgettable songs.My personal favourites include the beautiful Angel Of The Morning, the rollicking Queen of Hearts and the strong and sorrowful  It's A HeartacheAfter all these years, her work is unforgettable, catchy and full of energy and vibe</review_text>
I like this album.  Its got a nice mix of old and new material.  Along with some live material.  Great to see PE still at it in this ever changing rap game</review_text>
This is a great album. Two of their biggest hits, "Another One Bites The Dust," and "Crazy Little Thing Called Love," are here. My favorites are "Need Your Loving Tonight, " and "Prime Jive." Most of the other songs are top notch, too. None of the later Queen albums matched this one. Definitely in the class of Night At The Opera, Day At The Races and News Of The World</review_text>
The band is excellent and this album is just shy of the high quality of the first.  However, the encroachment of our free use rights as legal consumers by the major record companies will not stop until they see a negative financial impact from pushing these copy crippled products. Don't support these products</review_text>
David Foster, who wrote a few tunes on Yes's "Time and a Word" is here on bass with Tony Kaye on the B3 and it's the performance of their lives captured live at the Rainbow. A brave but good way to record a debut album, album was produced by Jon Anderson and the cover drawn by Roger Dean, just like Yes. It gives you feeling that Tony left Yes on good terms when Rick Wakeman stepped in</review_text>
I was looking for some nice background nature sounds to have playing while I work throughout the day. This collection hits the spot. Great sounds, great variety, great price</review_text>
I have listened to this CD for the last several years before going to sleep at night.  I love classical music, and this is great music to help make my soul feel at peace and unwind after a taxing day.</review_text>
Forget the nit-picky comments you may read here, if you are a fan of any of the artists on this album, buy it!  The recording is of very high quality, and I agree with another review, vacuum tube amplification makes the vocals even better.  The banter between the artists in between the  musical numbers is a real treat for fans too young to experience these  shows live.  One other observation, if you buy this not having a HUGE  appreciation for Sammy already, you will be blown away by his talent.  ..thanks to  Sinatra family for releasing this disc.  Hopefully many more are  forthcoming</review_text>
If you really into French Baroque That is......</review_text>
I was very young to really appreciate the in-s and outs of this band and the members between SAMMY, Roth and EVH!  I honestly can consider myself a newbie to this time-tested rockers.  I just downloaded this off of iTunes and i can tell u folks, every track is amazing! its like when Lars (Metallica) said once: "i was always amazed with G&R"...if i may borrow this line, i had always heard of the great EVH vs. Hagar vs Roth but honestly never appreciated this Guitar work before today! EVH is an amazing talent and it will continue to influence i am sure allot of new artists. My brother in Law was debating with us about Slash, Sammy, EVH, and Edge (U2), Clapton  and apparently they all chose EVH.  I didn't believe it till i heard it!  EVH is an inspiration. Anyone interested even remotely in any of these guys in EVH's history, should get this album because it is truly harnesses from almost all the worlds EVH has been to and in!</review_text>
This is part 2 of a set titled SAY IT RIGHT. The CD has a blue and white style vs. the part 1 that has a yellow and white style on disc and cover. Also in a slim-line jewel case with the title track, non-album track, but an added dance remix plus video. If you enjoyed the first 2-track CD then this is a must. Dance lovers will definitely find this to be a totally spectacular production.SAY IT RIGHT [Radio Edit] has the catchy dance beats, nice vocals, excellent drums, and chorus. The lyrics are fun to sing along and strong in meaning. Apparently, it's about not giving a lover power to control, destroy, or make you loose sleep. The melody has great rhythm, chorus, dance styles, and energetic beats. "You don't mean nothing at all to me" is repeated showing a strong message that life doesn't end with someone who isn't right.WHAT I WANTED brings Nelly to a slower tempo displaying depth of emotion. It's a slow ballad with true sincerity and humility. It's about going for something you wanted but never got. The outcome doesn't matter because the reality is you gave it your all. As she sings about her dream and what she wanted it's apparent love can be hard to let go yet comforting to do so. The melody is soothing, pleasant in sound, and refreshing for the soul.SAY IT RIGHT [Peter Rauhofer Remix Part 1] is a hot club remix sure to get you dancing off your feet. The song takes a dive to faster paced trance like effects, different introduction, pumping jamming dance styles with techno flairs, up and down tempos as well as plenty of percussion and synthesizers. Straying from the original song the vocals are still vastly heard yet filled with echoes, swirls of sounds, and much club ambiance. It's dreamy, fantasy filled, and definitely highly paced for the dance floor. If anything is certain it is this: The Remix in this CD is much better than many of her past singles. There is true DJ styles incorporation more instrumentations, effects, and vast production much more geared to club hoppers and dance fans. Quite sticky, infectious, and groove like this remix will get you dancing up a storm feeling like wanting to shake your body non-stop. Club lovers don't pass this out. Nelly's vocals are echoed often and electronic-a effects are vastly hard.SAY IT RIGHT VIDEO [Enhanced CD] is the video many have already seen as Timbaland and Nelly dance face to face and get very close as the message behind the music is reinforced. This is an excellent video with much dance styles, highly energetic beats, and flairs for control and getting the message across.Overall, from all of Nelly's singles I find this to be on the top of my favorite. The combination of 2 highly emotional yet different songs plus a dance track and video makes this remarkable. Definitely buy this if you are a Nelly fan, club hopper, or a lover of music to enjoy for the depth of emotion, different styles displayed, and the themes. It's definitely a top sensation. Before it sells out be sure to buy it. The part 1 is also an excellent addition for those days you don't want to listen to the remix. This is highly recommended for sure!</review_text>
If you like post modern lounge music, you will like the tracks on this disc.</review_text>
Almost a classic in my book.  We bumped this on the southside of Chicago when this dropped. These two were like a west coast EPMD because they blended perfectly. U could tell them apart easily because Gangsta D had the eazy-e voice with the hard lyrics. While KK had a gruff voice and was a str8 clown. KK would say anything.Once again the whole crew is on this one also: Quik, Hi-C, and AMG. They had a tight click that just seemed to from Voltron how they worked together. My favorites on this album are: If u Want it, Be True 2 yourself, Let the Rhythm,and Just Ain't Me (KK solo). I still take hoodrats on "Triple MMM Shots".....Listen to the album to find the meaning. Hotep!!</review_text>
These tunes may not immediately remind you of Steve Miller but his talent is not belied.  It's some really peaceful music.  Great to turn on just at bedtime and drift off to la la land</review_text>
This record is a fine example of earnest juju music.  Other artits have tricked it up some with synths and keyboards.  Chief Commander Obe has always managed to offer more traditional representation of juju as it evolved from highlife.  Keep in mind, this means amazing percussion work, intertwining guitar lines, loving vocals and long well developed instrumentals.  If you're interested, you should buy it.  It will make you happy, no matter how you were feeling, and what you're doing</review_text>
Sensational is a word I'd use to describe Singer Jesse McCartney. Good looks and powerful vocals. He's talented and sweet. If you haven't gotten a copy of his latest CD 'Right Where You Want Me', buy it today</review_text>
This EP is so good, that words cannot do it justice. They thought so too and exercised restraint (no lyrics) on this album. It is a departure from the previous album From the Vapor of Gasoline (which is also a very good album) in other ways, too, however; it features a more delicate production and more intricate interplay between the instruments. The production is such that it highlights the timbre of each instrument and, thus, their interdependency, whereas the previous album seemed content to let everything settle into a murky consistency at various points (usually when things started to rock). FTVOG also had the problem of being a bit monotonous (of course: in the end, you grew to enjoy it for all its shortcomings). All the Suits Began to Fall OFf seems to be flawless, however - a well-rounded tour; very beautiful, bold and particular. Try if you like: John Fahey, Tortoise, June of 44, Sea Tiger, etc</review_text>
Some musicians, like fine chefs, make it look so easy.  David Grisman is one of them.  On the CD, &quot;I'm Beginning to See the Light,&quot; the prolific mandolinist extraordinaire is joined by Scottish guitar virtuoso  Martin Taylor and veteran Grisman Quintet members Jim Kerwin and George  Marsh (on bass and drums/percussion, respectively) for one hot little  album.  While the song list is comprised of many well-loved standards, such  as &quot;Autumn Leaves,&quot; &quot;Makin' Whoopee,&quot; &quot;Lover  Man,&quot; and &quot;Cheek to Cheek,&quot; the Taylor/Grisman Quartet seems  to have so much fun preparing its stew and adds enough incredible  seasonings to the pot to make Emeril shout, &quot;Bam!&quot;  As Don  Stierberg, who penned the liner notes, says:  &quot;Music need not be  trendy to be great.&quot;  I wholeheartedly agree.  (C.A. Carlino</review_text>
This is an amazing CD - I cannot believe that more people have not discovered Charlie Sexton.  The songs are personal and beautifully written.   The music rocks, and yet it's different than any of Sexton's other music.   He is a brilliant artist and this is a brilliant wor</review_text>
Good CD, but where is his recent hit &quot;I Wanna Feel That Way Again&quot; and his classic hit &quot;Walkin' To Jeruselum&quot;</review_text>
i have been into vaisnava spirituality a long time, and they really got it, perfect and professional</review_text>
Imagine yourself sitting in a bistro on the Champs Elysees, sipping a nice glass of bordeux as your glance pulls you toward an alluring .... You get the picture. Now buy the CD and thank me later! Highly recommended from  someone who thought they heard it all! Bravo Senor Douglas</review_text>
Modern dub stylings from an assortment of recording artists, ranging from the bizarre and brilliant (check The Lost Scrolls of Hamarik's darkly deranged How To Find Royal Jelly), to the utterly unforgiveable (namely, Luciano's appaling attempt at Police &amp; Thieves). Luckily for us, most of the tunes here fall into or around the former category, with great contributions from St. Germain (bouncing dub-disco on A Dub Experience), Grant Phabao (updated roots righteousness on Andub Head Yudu) and Boozoo Bajou (with the wonderfully cheesey Divers). And let's not overlook Cottonbelly's 90's classic Tempest Dub, which resurrects an old Scientist tune to spine-tingling effect. Only the fairly plain Seven Dub and the aforementioned Luciano really fail to ignite...All in all then, a worthwhile collection which works very nicely as a whole - providing you program the CD player to skip the occassional duffer</review_text>
this ancient jazz classic never sounded better.Rudy Van Gelder did an excellent job remastering this one with the 24- bit.He proves that it does matter who takes up the task of remastering this wonderful jazz classic. just keep them coming Rudy</review_text>
Once she has won your heart, you will want this collection to hear how she developed as a performer -- and came to be a great symbol of France in the 20th Centur</review_text>
Incredible follow up to Rated R which I didn't think could be equaled and they did.  Flat out incredible songwriting, amazing vocal identity and muscianship at its best.  If you grew up in the 70's as I did and miss those albums that you would play constantly from beginning to end then this album is for you. "Go With The Flow" is one of the greatest rock singles of all time but you won't be skipping any songs on this disc. Baby Boomers rejoice, rock is back</review_text>
I bought this the year it came out, after seeing George in concert and it is great! Most of these were big hit songs and I found that I really loved the others too especially Hard Day</review_text>
This album has morse code on it, what more can you say......well some of that morse code actually sounds like that UA6 you just worked on 40 metres, complete with T6 buzz and slow drift.And the music is pretty good too.</review_text>
My one complaint is that after I listen to this CD, the catchy tunes get stuck in my head!  And then I want to keep listening to it more and more.  I love the selections on this CD, the fact that the songs are in English (I always wondered what the "Figaro, Figaro, Figaro" song was about!), and that a little background is given to each piece as well</review_text>
ANother hot release, top 5 in 2005 so far. No one even metions track 7 produced by one and only El-Producto and track 8 by belief. Hot cd recommend to those who don't listin to bull</review_text>
I recently acquired this cd from my local indepedent record store.  This is a wonderful cd.  There is not much I can say.  I am a pianist myself, and it is enlightening to see how this brilliant composer/player plays the piano.  His style is completely unique.  Thelonius Monk is one of my favourite jazz artists.  I recommend this to anybody who has any interest in jazz</review_text>
Ethereal, rhythmic, haunting, eclectic.  Wake: Best of Dead Can Dance is a collection of songs that will move your soul and spirit. The haunting combination of modern and ancient tunes, combined with phenomenal  vocals and instrumentals make this album one to cherish and listen to over and over.  Each time you hear it will lead to new discoveries and emotions.</review_text>
This is their best album.Easily better than anything the likes of Oasis ever managed.Richard III,Going Out,Late In The Day and the title track are all top quality.If you rated Blurs 3 &quot;Britpop&quot;(horrible term really) albums from the 90s then get this.Its up there with them.Simple as that</review_text>
This is a must have for anyone with an R&B "oldies" collection. You won't be disappointed</review_text>
I Dug The Soundtrack better than the film.The Music Sounds Good Through out.if the film had have just focused on The Music it would have been Incredible.The Musicianship is Solid Here</review_text>
I have been following gospel since the early 80s.  I am a big fan of contemporary gospel and Shei Atkins defines how R&P gospel should sound.  Trinitee 5:7 along with Dawkins & Dawkins have done a great job so far, but Shei Atkins covers it all--Relationships (cheating, divorce, pre-marital sex); worship; hymns; enocuragement; you name it and she has a song for it.  I just bought the CD and I can't take it out of my CD player!!Her voice is so annointed and unique! She can easily give Beyonce, Erykah Badu and Mary Blige a run for their money!She can easily be played on mainstream radio and everyone would be bobbin' their heads to it--yet she has no problem mentioning Jesus in any of her songs!For those Christians who are looking for something that they can groove and relax too (with some anointing) PLEASE buy this CD--I promise you that you won't be disappointed!  I can literally listen to every song on this CD over and over again</review_text>
Great CD for young and old alike.  The music puts a smile on your face each time you listen to it.  I have it on in my car and it keeps me in a good mood at all times</review_text>
Its  just realy sad that hip-hop dont sound like  hard to earn anymore... Gang starr still gets daily airplay on my stereo and im glad i support these guys</review_text>
Alvin Lee is a genius with a guitar.  Nowhere is this more evident than in his mastery of the Blues.  He was and is a great rocker, but his true calling is as a bluesman.  This is a great album</review_text>
This is from the days when you had to be good to grab a mic. Lyrical wizardry was the order of the day, if you had no skillz you stayed away from the mic. The production is as tight as the lyrics on this album both were made for each other. BUY THIS!!!!!!!</review_text>
Both the Italian version (Io Canto) and the Spanish version (Yo Canto) are excellent, and amongst the best albums that I have heard this past year. The music is absolutely beautiful, fresh, and very well paced, and Laura's voice is soaring! The quality of this album is exceptional....the production of the songs lends to Laura's very passionate approach to them. Without understanding a word of either version, I cannot get enough of them! Listening to Laura on this latest release of hers over and over again, each song continues to grow on me and I find myself completely absorbed in this album! Do yourself a favor and get this one....especially if you live in the United States. It will give you an opportunity to experience the power of what music can be if done right. You'll find yourself relating to words you don't even understand!</review_text>
In this CD Laura Pausini performs songs from a variety of Italian singer-songwriters.  She ads her personal touch to all of them, of course.  The results are lovely and inspired.  A lot of the songs already had versions in castellano, but Laura and her team have written new Spanish lyrics to some of them.  All of these songs were made famous by their creators.  Most of the songs are ballads, but there are some midtempo tracks in the title track, "Dos" (Due, by Raf) and "Estrella gemela" (by Eros Ramazzotti), and danceable pop in "Mi banda toca rock."  I don't know about the comment from the reviewers below about "Mi banda toca rock" as Menudo song (a horrible thought to some of us!), but the original Italian version was fun.  It's not a bubblegum song, but about the combination of traditional Latin music (Latin in the original sense, all the musical varieties of romance-language speakers) and rock music, something that was starting to happen when the song was written.  This reminds me that someone was commenting that one of the songs had some sections in English.  I believe they are wrong about the song.  "Estrella gemela" has some sections in English, but that is the way it was originally written and performed by Eros Ramazzotti (in Italian and Spanish), to emphasize the influence of African-American gospel music in the song.  Laura also references this influence by using gospel chords at the start of the song.  All in all, this is a great album, so give it a shot.  Whether you speak the language or not, the Italian version of the album is even better.  Laura just keeps getting better with time!  Laura sei bravissima</review_text>
Nothing deep, by any means, but simply a light, airy listen, with a compilation of quirky tropical tunes. Even though the songs (most of them) weren't in the movie, they remind me of it, of the whole Hawaiian atmosphere. My favorite tracks, excluding the ones included on the previous CD, are Blue Hawai'i (by Elvis), My Little Grass Shack, Coconut (it's just bizarre, but addicting, making you smile with absurdity), Island in the Sun, Pineapple Princess, and Love Me Tender. Again, it's nothing dramatic or swirling, but it you adored Lilo &amp; Stitch (And how can you not?) and all it stood for, this CD might just bring some warmth into a cold day. Don't think about it. Listen and pretend you're there</review_text>
I borrowed this CD from a public library, having liked the track "Crazy Life" on the Empire Records Soundtrack, and I was immediately blown away by how consistently good Coil is the whole way through. It is their most mature album, full of gentle emotion and idealism, and puts the listener in a good mood. Glen Phillip's voice is unique, confident, and beautiful. I fell in love immediately with "Rings" and "Dam Would Break". The haunting and beautiful harmonies captivate. "Little Buddha" is so different but so good as well.After I got Coil, I bought two of Toad's older albums: Fear and Dulcinea. Both are really good, but something keeps drawing me back to Coil. It is achingly beautiful, vibrant, thoughtful, and pleasurable. It is hearing Toad at their best.</review_text>
The original Jack johnson LP was my favourite Miles record. I also had an expensive Japanese CD but all this would not prepare me for what I discover here. Over these CDs one discovers the original sessions from which the record was made. This is simply wonderful. Ok sometimes it takes quite a bit of patience to sit trhough all this but it is worth the time</review_text>
I love it so.  I bought it after seeing the video for "Make You Feel That Way" and I haven't been disappointed.  Love the vibe of the CD...it just flows and the mix is well done, as you go from a "head-nodder" to a smooth groove so seamlessly.  I just put it in and let it play!  My absolute favorite jam is "Nowhere Fast," which comments on what we were, what we are and what we hope to be "tomorrow."  I love this CD so much, I went and bought their other two full play CD's.  I make my girls sick with how much I play this CD.  I guess I'll eventually take it out the rotation, maybe "tomorrow!"  A must for anyone who loves great HIP HOP</review_text>
Anais is one of the best cingers.I have seen her since objetivo fama, and she is just great.Don't listen to people who say this cd is bad because the are just hating.This cd is just great</review_text>
This was the first Queen album that I ever had so getting it on CD is great.  "Sheer Heart Attack" is an overlooked Queen gem</review_text>
I first heard Joe playing in that urgent style of his, on Horace Silvers' &quot;song for my father&quot; album. The thing about him is that his playing has always sounded mature and developed, like he was born to play.  On this CD, Felicidade in particuliar, he simmers, builds to a rolling  boil, and simmers again so nicely as he takes you to Brasil. Also the  straight ahead playing on Triste' is nothing short of marvelous playing by  the group!  The whole is CD is great. Go 'head Joe</review_text>
This album is the shyit, cougnut and c-fresh deliver, the only problem you might have with this album is figuring out which one is cougnut and which one is c-fresh, but as you listen you will tell differences. &quot;Back in the days&quot; is real old album, so audio can be bad for a couple of the tracks but there isnt a weak track on this album. The beats don't get too bass heavy untill &quot;Hillary&quot; after that song the next 4 tracks or so are very bass heavy, but the flows are tops. These guys are the definition of gangsta, and is a must for anybody who likes gangsta rap. All guests are sick to, Dre Dog,Cellski,Chewy,R.b.l,2.2 and Mack and Al Kapone. Definetly a classic</review_text>
I got the pleasure of seeing Albert open for bb king. Unfortunately for BB king, because once Albert started playing his Flying V, with blues power, he demoralized anybody that came after him. He had the entire Universal amphitheater standing. and stayed standing for most of his show. blues power is one of his best. Get, listen, and then really listen. Because you can feel your skin crawl with extacy from those notes..</review_text>
The Bloodshot Gang knows how to have a good time!  If you're into the whole Alt.Country thing, you know that some of it is very sincere and serious (ie, Uncle Tupelo, Jayhawks).  Now I love "No  Depression," and "Blue Earth," but this is an altogether  different quadrant of alternative country known as Militant Honky Tonk, or  just Insurgent Country.  Truth be told, this incredible anniversary  compilation does have some poignant, serious numbers (Rico Bell's  "Money to Burn," the Texas Rubies' "Blue Diamond Mine,"  Mike Ireland's "I'd Like To"), but for the most part these  maniacs are not taking themselves or the world that seriously.  You've got  Andre Williams and Sally Timms singing "I'll stick to you like  glue...", in mock romantic seriousness with background singers going  "G-L-E-U, GLUE!"  You've got a song with a man and a woman  serenading each other saying with deep country feeling how much they miss  each other's bodies.  You've got Kim Docter and Moonshine Willy belting out  "Turn the Lights Down Low," which really ought to be a hit it's  so catchy.  And you've got some great deadpan covers -- the Waco Brothers  do a country rave-up of the Who's Baba O'Riley," Red Star Belgrade  does it to AC/DC's "Highway to Hell," and best of all, the Unholy  Trio turns Public Enemy's "Bring the Noise" into an understated  redneck anthem.  I'm only scratching the surface here, with 40 tracks over  2 discs.  This is a great introduction to the rowdier side of that  sprawling beast that has not a name that can be agreed on...And don't miss the fantastic earlier Bloodshot compilation, HELL-BENT (Insurgent Country, Volume II) -- see my 9/5/04 review</review_text>
Any one of the first 4 cuts on this album are worth the price of admission.  These pieces, each melodically rich and honed like a fine gem, remind me more of classical romanticism than what normally passes for &quot;New Age&quot;.  Sit back in a cosy armchair with a glass of wine and let this beautifully-crafted music weave its web...it's &quot;feel good&quot; music that also has an intellectually satisfying bittersweet flavor</review_text>
I consider this the first album in the second half of the career of Oasis. Following the departure of Bonehead and Guigsy, this album is basically all the Gallagher brothers. Having learnt lessons from Be Here Now, Oasis have gone back to a more basic style of production as opposed to the over the top production from Be Here Now. While the songs are not as good on here, they sound better and the whole album sounds as if it wasn't as rushed. This signifies a big change of direction for the band, with little less ego's and a more sober approach to their music, it is only the songwriting that lets this album down. My least favourite of all Oasis albums, it features two really good songs, 6 mediocre and 2 dreadful ones. It is missing another two songs to make it complete, I think it should have included the B'sides 'lets all make believe' and 'carry us all'. It still includes a few Beatle-esque songs 'who feels love' and 'roll it over' and Noel once again takes over lead vocal duties, this time on two tracks, 'where did it all go wrong' and 'sunday morning call'.This is a very important album, it grounded the band again after their ego's had taken off. This helped relaunch the career and because of it they sound at their best today</review_text>
Herb Alpert has done what few artists can do. He's taken his seminal masterwork and transformed it into another entity that is equal to or may even surpass the original.I love the original "Whipped Cream", but this CD is a masterstroke. Combining Alpert's traditionally peppy music with downbeat electronica transforms it into a soothing, but never boring mix that continues to enchant the listener from beginning to end.Unlike some of the purists, I loved this CD and you will too</review_text>
I found this CD by browsing Amazon and decided to give it a try.  I am happy with all of the tracks.  Some tracks remind me of Beatles a little, but not all, so the band does have a unique sound.  Even though from the 90s, the sound is like many bands making it today.  I like it.</review_text>
What I love most about Scofield's recent guitar playing is the subtlety in his style. He is careful not to over do it, while still demonstrating skill and precision. His riffs are practically perfect and are very well placed.  The only problem with this is that with no vocals and many similar sounding  songs, I rarely make it to the end of this CD. Still for those who enjoyed  &quot;A Go-Go&quot;, this one is quite similar, so make sure to pick it up.  This quality funk CD with jazz undertones may not being groundbraking, but  is a great casual listen. (Guitarist can definitely pick up a few ideas  here!</review_text>
DJ Quik (the best producer ever) did all the tracks in this one with help from Robert Bacon on some tracks. This album is just CLASSIC nuthin more to it!</review_text>
3rd Force's new CD &quot;Force Field&quot; is their first new CD in a few years.  The track &quot;Revelation of the Heart&quot; sets the tone for this wonderful recording.  A must have to add to your collection</review_text>
A ridiculously good album. This is as good an introduction to Jawbox as you're going to find. It's got most of their really great songs, plus some live songs which are great. Another good thing is that Desoto Records (the label that was started by the band) has re-released the CD, so it shouldn't be as hard to find</review_text>
I gotta be honest, when I first listened to this album I was dissapointed. But like any truly amazing album, it just took some decoding, listening to the songs multiple times reaaaallly helps to appreciate what these guys are doing. Essentially, GaT are four people who are amazing at what they do, and we should feel lucky that they have found a way to mesh together perfectly. Their first album, emphasizer, blew me away, but I felt it lost steam around halfway through. This album does no such thing, and what is more impressive is that this is an all acoustic album, which means skerik is using the natural sound of his sax as opposed to the various effects that he is known for. This gives the album a much more natural feel and it shows that these four are able to make amazing music without any wizardry in the production department. But dont get me wrong, this cd SOUNDS amazing. Anyway, I saw them live last night in NYC, and they blew my mind... I recommend this CD to ANYONE, and see them live if you get the RARE opportunity!</review_text>
Two of the greatest names in show business at their zenith. There are so many good tracks on this set that it's hard to pick out some over the others. A couple of superb standouts are Jolson's "Swanee" and "Rock-A-Bye," although every track is just excellent. The sound quality on the set is outstandingly great. I hope the people that put this set together will do the same incredible job with other classic recordings by Jolson and Crosby</review_text>
This is the best "cover" album I have ever seen or heard in my life.  A wonderful selection of material and a reflection of Agnetha's great judgment of how best to pay tribute to her favorite, and most influential, musical artists. Her voice is absolutely flawless and just as powerful (and pure) as her days of old with ABBA.  It would have sold well with the right kind of promotion such as touring which I read she had planned at one point. Unfortunately, she had to cancel any such ideas.  I would travel anywhere in the world to see her live just once in my life, whether it be to listen to any of the catchy tunes from this album or anything previous.  We can only hope the day will come that she will do a live show again for us adoring and anxious fans.  It's certainly not out of the realm of possibility.  It is neither an impossibility that Agnetha record subsequent material in the not too distant future as this album without a doubt indicates she has so much great music left in her soul to share with the world</review_text>
A true musical genius. Take a blow get a ZyR voduski and snapple lemonade and let the music cover you up. PowerPLUS from the 70's and 80's. Tight lyrics and pop masterpiece arangements. go todd go</review_text>
Disappear Fear's music is both calming and uplifting at the same time.  I especially enjoyed "Laws of Nature" because of it lyrics.  (It has a gay-rights lyrics)  Does anyone know which one of the singers is gay?I would be quite greatful for the answer.  If anyone knows, would you mind posting it under the reviews here? Thanx that would be great!</review_text>
I don't see how they can compare these guys to The Mars Volta or Coheed and Cambria. I can hear the prog elements but it's more of a Rush kind of prog rock,shorter 3 minute songs compared to 12 minute epics. They are missing the one thing that would make them a true prog rock band: the songs just aren't as epic as a TMV or a C&amp;C song. I think reviewers liken Brazil to these other bands because their singer has a high pitched singing voice. This is still an amazing album that is well worth your time. Go into it expecting Sparta rather than The Mars Volta and you won't be disappointed</review_text>
When this album first came out, I felt jilted. But I recently had an oppertunity to listen to it for what it is and I think its a great album. Make no mistake, if you're a die-hard 80's rocker, you'll hate this album. The production is raw, and the songwriting is lean and mean as opposed to elaberate and detailed. But that doesn't mean that the musicianship is lacking on this record. If you can keep an open mind, I think this ablum is one that you'll love</review_text>
Dream is a great album where Keller coloboarates with many of his favorite musicians including Bob Wier, Bella Fleck, Victor Wooten and String Cheese Incident. All the songs are unique and great to sing too while driving or anytime!</review_text>
whoa... this CD rocks, one of my favorite anti-flag albums for sure. This CD may not be what some of the harder punk fans want from anti-flag but i think it also shows they're growth as a band. They can play more than just really loud hard punk (though they play that awesome too!!). Some of the songs on this album incredibly powerful, and some are really catchy too. War Sucks Lets Party is a great anarchist anthem, and One Trillion Dollars is amazingly moving (i mean, seriously! 1 Trillion $ spent on weapons around the world in 2004!) Every track is good and has its own message! They seem to have no problem coming up w/ new songs... there are so many things to ridicule in our gov. I just wish that more people would listen to this band's message.PEACE and LOV</review_text>
I bought this for my wife, a huge fan of Patrick O'Brian (she's read the books twice in the past two years alone). Ironically, it now sits in my car's CD shuffler where it undoubtedly gets the most airtime.I love this music! As another reviewer mentioned, with some cofee (Killick, there!), this music and Desolation Island in your hand, you feel transported to a life of long ago. When men sang to rouse the soul, brighten the spirit, damn the enemy and win the heart of their Colleen (sorry...Nancy) - all with spine, mind and muscle fully intact. The harmonies are rich, the voices deep.And yet, the last reviewer's questions have the faint ring of truth. My first hearing rang a bit flat, the music sounding just this side of stale. But, in the end, it just don't signify. Even on that first run, by the end of the CD I was clumsily, but merrily joining in with the crew. I suppose I have come to imbue the songs with a life of my own, belting them out at full volume down the highway. I hope you enjoy them as much as I do</review_text>
NIGHTRAGE - Descent into Chaos-Thomas Lindberg's latest offering to the music community is the Swedish and Greek mix called Nightrage.  This album actually being my first offering to the band I was unsure what to expect.  Like most I am a big fan of ATG and Lindberg's harsh vocal styles.... Nightrage however came as a pleasant surprise. (As in it wasn't, yet another, ATG Clone) They seem to have more Melody than Thrash but definitely embody aspects of both genres....  The Haunted, where the former ATG Guitar Players are now located, seemed have gone with more Thrash then Melody. (Which is odd since they actually have ATG's Guitar Players?)Anyway, Enough Comparisons!  Nightrage is really decent for a newer band in an over saturated scene... Amazing guitar work and one of the genres best Vocalist makes this CD well worth a couple of listens.  Also I've only given this album 2 spins at the current time and stuff like this usually grows on repeated listens.Favorite Songs:  Being Nothing, Phantasma, Omen, and Descent into Chaos.-4 StarsIF YOU LIKED, AGREED, OR APPRECIATED THIS PLEASE CLICK YES FOR:"Was this review helpful?"</review_text>
Well, this isn't At the Gates.  Nightrage reminds me of many old Arch Enemy guitar tunes that were so melodic.  Of course, that leads into Gus G. substituting Chris on concerts being an excellent choice, as they make very similar melodies.  Some people say this album is heavy, which it is in some parts.  But its melodic death, there are no signs of thrash or anything.  Just great melodies, great headbanging music.  Add this to your collection, I think its better than Sweet Vengeance</review_text>
Chris Joss delivers some serious blaxploitation inspired grooves that will wisk you back to the times of bell bottoms, afros and platform shoes!  Joss' "You've Been Spiked" is a retrospective piece of marvellously produced tracks that pays true homage to an era that gave us some of the funkiest music ever!  In fact, this music sounds so authentic you would think they came straight out of the 70's...but it's all circa the 21st century.  It's good to know that there are still modern cats (especially on the ESL Record label)who know how to recapture music from days gone by.</review_text>
This is a really great follow up to Allison Moorer's debut album ALABAMA SONG. THE HARDEST PART, her sophomore CD, was released two years after her debut in September 2000. It builds on the sound presented on her first, and the songs are nothing short of great. My favorite track, though not her own, is her emotional reading of the Rolling Stones' &quot;Bring Me All Your Lovin&quot;. She makes this song into her own. &quot;No Next Time&quot; is another favorite, the lyrics are excellent, a great breakup song. The title track is a nice midtempo country number. &quot;Send Down An Angel&quot; is very sad but touching at the same time. Other highlights include &quot;It's Time That I Tried&quot;, &quot;Day You Said Goodbye&quot;, &quot;Is It Worth It&quot; and &quot;Feeling That Feeling Again&quot;. Overall, to me this is her best album. You can't go wrong with any of them but this is an artistic acheivement, and one of her best albums yet</review_text>
I have been a fan since Valotte. and I like the other reviewers here, can't believe why this cd didn't receive the airplay it deserves!There must have been some politics in there, with Sean's cd coming out on the same day ( Yoko?) It is one of those cds that you just leave on and you don't feel like you have to go and skip over songs that you don't like! I love every song!! Especially "Day after Day"," I should have known", "I don't want to know" and my fav right now "Cold".. I hope that what I have heard is true that he is working on his latest now. Can't wait! Buy this cd.. you won't regret it</review_text>
Every singer ends up attempting Sinatra eventually, but few manage so well....John Pizzarelli has been playing jazz guitar with his legendary father, Bucky, since he was 6 years old.John's latest album is Dear Mr. Sinatra, on which he plays songs written for Ol' Blue Eyes....The crooner is noted for his sensitive phrasing and powerful interpretative voice, which recall the relaxed stylings of Nat "King" Cole and Chet Baker, as well as for his fluid, inventive guitar playing.On this album of covers of songs made famous by Frank Sinatra, John Pizzarelli wisely avoids the pitfalls of Ol' Blue Eyes imitations in favor of his own intimate approach, best heard on the set's more relaxed arrangements.My highlights are the tracks "I've Got You Under My Skin", "Nice and Easy" and "You Make Me Feel So Young".Both attention-grabbing and supportive, his expertly arranged big band accompaniment likewise evokes the ring-a-ding-ding of the Rat Pack era while steering clear of mere pastiche.With a total time just under 40 minutes, the program is a little short by CD standards, but the performances by John Pizzarelli and the Clayton-Hamilton Jazz Orchestra in this warm tribute to Frank Sinatra are consistently of high caliber and hit the mark every time.</review_text>
No use thumbing the pages of Cale's elegant scrapbook of an autobiography, 'What's Welsh For Zen?, to glean hard data on this one melodic gem. Coming after the heady, if problematic days of the Velvets, there's barely an acknowledgement of it as he strides into his rock format. The abrasive thrashing rock of 'McBeth'(while indicating his imminent direction) serves the one discordant note. Throughout,Cale namedrops to effect learnedness without destroying the mood of a distant past. Language had been severed from lineal meaning, in rock, since Bob went electric. Pete Brown writing for Jack Bruce's towering masterpieces, 'Songs For a Sailor', & 'Harmony Row'; Keith Reid with Procul Harum, were mixing up the lyric medicine, presumably with other pharmacuticals & making sumptuous music on a par with 'Paris 1919'. That date? The birth of Surrealism,(and similar writing to Cale's efforts herein) perhaps? The Russian Revolution? Cale's singing on 1919 had a world weary distance to it, which suited the reflective jabberwocky of the songs; stretched out vowells on,'planing lakes', 'elephants that sing','looking out from here at half past France.' It was far from banal music, however saccharine the orchestral moves from strings, viola & piano Cale painted. These lyrics were baffling but made perfect poetic sense when sung. 'Locusts' was something of a revisiting to this pastoral mood but lacks the roundedness. 'Fragments of a Rainy Season' is a good retrospective concert. And some of the fuge written around the hommage to Andy Warhol is very moving stuff. Go John</review_text>
This is a fabulous CD and exactly what I was looking for.  I'm also thrilled that it has an accompanying book with all the sheet music.  I am leading a seder this year for a church group who has never heard any of the  songs before, so I wanted the traditional melodies, easy to follow sheet  music, and easy guitar chords.  This is perfect!  I'm so pleased</review_text>
This is a difficult album to review. People either embrace it or pass it off as an overproduced, overblown waste of their time. However, I can say that this is my favorite Oasis album. Why? That's a very good question...maybe because Be Here Now was my introduction to Oasis, and I could tell that this band had a lot to offer, even through the drug-addled, overproduced songs that seemed to last forever. Each one is very catchy and has an overall feel-good quality to it, two characteristics of most Oasis songs.It's no use comparing Be Here Now to Morning Glory or Def. Maybe, because it's in a whole other ballpark. This is Oasis going totally over the top and pushing their music to the limit. No doubt that all the coke helped with that. It's my firm belief that Morning Glory and Def. Maybe were and still are great albums in their own rights. Be Here Now is just something else, you either love it or hate it. It has it's own little Oasis category. I can see why it never really lived up to its two famous predecessors.There are some valid complaints about this album, though. One, it is very very overproduced, filled to the top with snarling buzzing guitars and who knows what else. Unfortunately, this makes it hard to listen to with earphones for very long. Two, the songs are astonishingly long at times. All Around the World, while an excellent song, clocks in at around 9:20. I believe that the shortest song is I Hope, I Think, I Know, coming in at 4:23. So you know you're in for a long, wild ride.However, only Oasis could pull this off - making ridiculously long songs that are almost ear-numbing to listen to - and every minute is made enjoyable. All the arrogance, coke, and swagger in these songs is perhaps what makes it so appealing to some people. And of course, there's that small note on the upper left-hand corner of pages 7 and 8 in the booklet that proclaims : "The Beatles are quite good, but Oasis is much better."And so a resounding yes to all of these: overproduced, arrogant, drug-induced, staggering, amazing, excellent. I don't care about the negative things, though, because that's what makes Be Here Now a sucess in its own right.</review_text>
I have been listening to this album for at least 12 years and it rarely leaves my CD changer.  I played the cassette version until it literally would not play any more, and it was one of the first CDs I bought.  A relative first introduced me to this album and of course &quot;Coming Up Close&quot; was the reason I bought my own copy. But I came to love each song and appreciate Aimee Mann as an exceptionally gifted songwriter.   It is a great &quot;Road Trip&quot; album and &quot;On Sunday&quot; makes the perfect &quot;Summer Song&quot;.  The mix is not mainstream pop/rock.  It is not a 1980's anthem, but it is one of the defining moments, for me.  The lyrics have meaning, which sometimes defies what the '80's were about.  The only other thing I can say is Listen to this CD!  I am sure you will find Mann's unique voice as captivating as I do. It is a definite must have for one's CD library</review_text>
...and if you're fortunate enough to find it, I recommend buying the version with the bonus DVD, which chronicles the making of Yellow Brick Road.  When I bought it, it cost the same as the 2 SACD set without the DVD, so it was still a great deal.My only complaint--and it's really minor--is that it would have been nice if they could have fit the original album onto a single SACD.  A second disc could have included the bonus tracks that are included in this package, plus any extra--maybe even audio-only interviews--still remaining in the vaults.  No matter.  The important thing, if you are able, is to make sure you have an SACD-compatible player (like the Pioneer DV-563A, or one of the really expensive players if you've got the cash and love audiophile formats in both your hardware and your CDs).  Even if you don't, the stereo CD layer still sounds truly excellent</review_text>
Did you lose interest in new rock in the past several years because all those loud songs on the FM station sound about the same?  Maybe you noticed one song in there somewhere that had memorable hooks and interesting lyrics among the crunching guitars?  The Libertines are - or at least were - one of those diamonds in the rough.Their raw, loud style is closer to punk than any other genre, but most of their songs are more well-developed than that suggests and might even appeal to classic rock fans.  Make no mistake, though, this is a loud album.  With the exception of the oddly balladish "Radio America," it's a pretty steady sonic assault, and the lyrics are mostly somewhere between "Louie Louie" and live Dylan on the intelligibility scale.  What can be understood is more erudite than you'd expect, though.  "What a Waster" is a frighteningly vivid look at drug addiction, "Boys in the Band" is the best groupie song I've heard in a long time, and "The Good Old Days" actually reveals a touch of sentimentality just under the power chords.  Decipherable or not, most of the other songs are at least very catchy.  The whole collection is a nice balance between aggressive style and memorable songs that has been all too lacking for a long time now.</review_text>
About the Band:Dead Can Dance is considered the seminal example of the ethereal or heavenly voices genre.  In fact, the name of the label, 4AD, which carried many of the 1990s DCD releases, is sometimes also used to describe this genre of music, which is a fusion of subtle electronics, vocals, drums, world music, and a near limitless count of instruments.  Brendan Perry sometimes has been described as a gothic Frank Sinatra.  Lisa Gerrard's enchanting vocals are often sung in a language only known to Lisa.  I count myself among the many that hold these two musicians in the highest esteem.About the Album:Compared to more recent albums that are loaded with bonus tracks, the 50-minutes of Into the Labyrinth would seem short, if it weren't for the fact that I like to listen to this album over and over again.  I count this album as one of my all time favorites, and certainly my most prized Dead Can Dance CD.One of the nicest things about this album is that it features nearly equal amounts of both Lisa's and Brendan's ghostly vocals.  On some tracks they accompany each other, while others feature only one of the artist's chilling or mystical sounding vocals.  Simply put, this is beautiful music to relax to.  I honestly give this album my highest recommendations!Two tracks I'd recommend sampling: "Towards the Within" (featuring Lisa's vox w/ Brendan backing) and "Tell Me About the Forest" (featuring Brendan's vox).  I believe they best represent the range of songs you can expect with this album.  Please note that while all the tracks feature vocals, the lyrics for only those sung in English are included in the liner notes.Similar Artists:Chances are if you aren't yet familiar with Dead Can Dance, that you've not yet discovered some of these other bands, but I highly recommend them as well: Das Zeichen, Impressions of Winter, Love is Colder Than Death, Qntal, Corvus Corax, or Helium Vola.  There is a rather large (and somewhat underappreciated) range of artists still producing heavenly voices music that is similar in quality to Dead Can Dance.  Please check some of them out as well.</review_text>
This is by far the best psychopathic album ever released. Riddlebox is now in second place. Madrox schools ever other artist on psychopathic with this album. Beats are bangin' and lyrics are flawless! Great flows and he mixes funny with wicked. Best songs are This B*tch and Hey Phatty. Great album by the best rapper of our time. Madrox is so under rated. I wish for his sake he would blow up huge but not lose his soul in the process. Buy this album, best rap album ever made</review_text>
Percy Grainger was a man of spectacular gifts. He was one of the most original composer/arrangers in the early part of this century. He was also a spectacular pianist in an age of spectacular pianists. This amazing CD  documents Grainger's formidible gifts. It cannot be over-praised. Both the  music and the performances are well worthy of any piano lover's attention.  Don't miss this one</review_text>
I own a lot of Waylon Jennings albums but I have to say, I find myself playing this one on 9 out of 10 times. If you want to buy just one Waylon album this is the one to own, the recording quality is brilliant for a live album and the music IS alive.  Simply great, I can't say enough good things about this CD</review_text>
Considered one of Coltrane's 'searching' periods, this CD has a lot to offer in the way of understanding Trane's restless nature. Never one to stand on laurels, Coltrane does indeed continue to set the bar 'higher' every time out. This one is mostly ballad and blues based, with the exeption of 2 tracks in particular which stand out - on both ends of the Trane spectrum. Track #2, "I Love You" finds him playing furious, cerebral runs on the instrument, and , frankly, not as 'listenable' as one may like; whereas the track with Donald Byrd is as 'in the pocket' as you'll ever hear. All in all, a very realistic look at a genius in motion</review_text>
I consider this to be one of the finest live Coltrane recordings out there.  It was also one of the first Coltrane albums I picked up, and it was a fantastic gateway to some of his more abstract live recordings on followup releases like LIVE AT THE VILLAGE VANGUARD AGAIN and LIVE IN JAPAN.  This is much more similar to AFRO BLUE IMPRESSIONS which is another overlooked release.  By this point in time, Trane had already done some work with Eric Dolphy and his playing was growing in a much more abstract direction as we would hear on A LOVE SUPREME just one year later.One of the reasons why this disc is overlooked is because Elvin Jones is replaced by Roy Haynes, while Jones was serving some jail time.  The absence of Jones is noticeable but I still think this is worthy of five stars.  The first 3 tracks are from the Newport Jazz Festival and in addition to Haynes and Trane, we have the remaining quartet members, McCoy Tyner (piano) and Jimmy Garrison (bass).  Tyner is especially amazing on 'My Favorite Things' which I consider the best version of that piece in Trane's entire catalogue.  I consider it to be a bridge to some of his later recordings.  This is because we get Trane's two sides.  First of all there is great tone and lyricism in the first part of the piece.  However, the song still goes on for 17 minutes and the interplay between Tyner and Haynes for much of it is amazing.Rounding out the performance is Billy Eckstine's 'I Want to Talk About You' with a mesmerizing credenza which is a staple of Trane's technique, followed by a 15 minute version of 'Impressions.'  Again we hear Trane's two sides.  On one hand we hear where he is COMING from. which is the confines of other jazz gods like Miles Davis and Thelonius Monk.  On the the other hand we can see where he is GOING, which is a much more abstract/free-jazz approach.  Once you can begin to understand Trane's more abstract side, you will find later recordings less challenging, such as INTERSTELLAR SPACE, MEDITATIONS, or A LOVE SUPREME.In addition to the three Newport recordings, there is an extra track from November of 1961 from the Village Vanguard.  'Chasin' Another Trane' is played by Haynes and Trane as well as Dolphy on alto sax and Reggie Workman on bass.  The presence of Dolphy and the removal of piano makes this the most avant-garde piece on the record, almost reminiscent of early Ornette Coleman.Coltrane really cooks on this record, and the sound quality is also pretty decent.  It's not as crystal clear as his Carnegie Hall concert with Monk, but nevertheless, I consider it a great place to start for Trane fans who are reluctant to embrace his later music.</review_text>
This is a compilation, but the original Incense and Peppermints album was really revolutinary for the time. I will date myself now, but I remember hearing this song on the radio in our car and was mesmerized by it. It was the first Lp I had ever bought. I actually wore out the groves on the Lp and came across another a few years ago. To this day, almost 40 years after I first heard the Strawberry Alarm Clock, I still like Incense and Peppermints as well as their other songs. Their style ranges from acid rock to jazz. The musicians are all very talented and the band works as a team as opposed to many of the bands of the era. Their recordings are really high quality and certainly not over processed like a lot of today's music is. SAC was in an era where 60's music was in transition from the early Beatles and old time R&R sound to a more acid rock sound. Lyrics like 'tune in, turn on, turn your eyes around.. look at yourself' were typical of SAC's lyrical style as well as the thinking of the times. It was an odd time. On one side, we had Woodstock, mini-skirts, muscle cars and fun fun fun, But, on the dark side, there were civil rights problems and the Viet Nam war. This transitional period was a kind of awakening for the country and for music. Although not as popular as names like the Doors, Jefferson Airplane and Steppenwolf, the Strawberry Alarm Clock still had a huge following. My only regret is that I didn't get a chance to see them (or the Doors!) when they came to the city where I lived during the late 60's. This album is a nice compilation of  SAC's hits. The songs are as fresh and original sounding as they were almost 40 years ago.</review_text>
The CD is truly the very best of Bobby Vee's works.  A delightful CD.  Even my college age children enjoy the music. Really worth the money</review_text>
This album is ridiculous.  I almost want to say part of SRV's soul is in this guy...he is that good.  Honestly I think this album rips apart his previous two.  My hope is that Jimmy, DT and APO will bring out a 4th release...as good as this album or better!THIS IS ONE OF THOSE GREAT ALBUMS WHERE EVERY SONG IS GOOD. BUY IT.YOU LIKE SRV, BUY IT.Double Trouble must have brought part of SRV back, because this album is just plain sweet</review_text>
I am not sure about my baby, but I love this CD ! Actually baby loves it too but probably not to that great extent. :-</review_text>
Purchased this album because of the great Album cover, was I surprised when I popped it into my CD player. I hadn't heard of Rick Braun before but  after listening to this CD, I ran out and purchased everything he has ever  recorded. Never have I heard a trumpet sound so beautiful. Share this music  with someone you love</review_text>
The first time you play this CD you're just gonna hate it. Promise Ring's third album is the opposite of this. Very Emergency is super catchy and tight but you get sick of it quick, there's just not much there. That understood, this album will rock you for years. It grows on you. At first listen it sounds like really bad emo demos. Like the faceless band you saw open for Fugazi the last time they hobbled into town. No hooks, no choruses, lots of really bad singing and sloppy guitar [with the drums mixed way too loud, an emo thing]. On the 100th listen, if you make it that far, it will sound like an old friend yammerin' on about the good old days. Trust me, it's a desert island disc in the making, I envy those of you just discovering this Cd</review_text>
If this album didn't come out at its destinated time, 2006 would have been one of the worst years for gospel music.  Outside of Kurt Carr's cd, this album makes singing gospel music worthwhile.  Donald Lawrence knows how to send out a group and bring in a new era of singers.  That's basically what this finale does, it brings into the forefront the future of the gospel music scene.  We have new artists emerging in Blanche (McAlister-not sure if she is going to just do the first name like MaDonna, Cher, Mandisa, ummmmm, think about it!!!!!!!!), DeWayne Woods (thanks for the testimony and great Sunday morning rocking song - this is hint to all church musicians sing this song when church is a lil dead and pick it up), The Murrills, LaJeune Thompson (sang girl), and Sheri from the duo of Ted & Sheri.  There are so many hits on the whole cd from God Is, God, You Are An Heir, Giants, Blessing from Abraham, Encourage Yourself, of course all of the older stuff.  One thing missing is Kelly Price should have guested on I Walk With God or bring back Stephanie Mills.</review_text>
The best place to start with the best is at the beginning.  Enya's The Celts (identical to the original 1980s release simply called Enya) is a beautiful collection of music.  Enya is not an artist where you just get the "Best of" album.  Every CD is a best of in itself</review_text>
Never mind the fact that Jay introduced the jazz world to Charlie Parker. His band rocked! After Basie,nobody swung like McShann. this 2 dis set covers the big band sides and the later 40's small band jump blues sides. Anything by this man is worth listening to. Another great disc by the Proper label, who release wonderful compilations with informative booklets at a bargain price. Highly recommended</review_text>
Unbelievably and indubitably a bona fide, and fortified roots reggae album! If you don't have Firehouse Rock in your CD collection and you consider yourself a reggae fan, you may need to re-evaluate what you think you know about Jamaican music. The Roots Radics, especially the rythym section, utilize (with supreme efficacy, I might add) and epitomize the manipulation of space and time so often associated with reggae "riddims." On top of the Radics, the Wailing Souls add ethereal vocals, while staying masterfully conscious. Firehouse Rock is a beautifully recorded piece of audible Jamaican history and an absolute must have</review_text>
okay!!!after their debut album,i was like okay,they are sad over the revolution being disbanded.well!!!!fruit at the bottom was like,okay ,we're over it,let's jam!!!i saw the video for &quot;are you my baby &quot; on BET!!!THEY WERE JUST TOO FUNKY FOR MTV BACK IN THE DAY!!!!!!!THE ALBUM WAS LIKE A CUP OF YOGURT !!!!!the cream was at the top!!!&quot;lolly lolly&quot;was like the princest cut-they stormed out of the box with the distorted helium vocals,then &quot;are you...baby?&quot;,man,hold up!!!!you didn't see it comin'!!!!you knew this is what they were capable of!!!!corey glover of living colour said this was one of his favorite albums!then after the &quot;satisfaction&quot;blast with jesse johnson,formerly of the time and his own solo work,they slow it down for &quot;always in my dreams&quot;this was the jammm!!!!so melodic and works that just have you thinking about writing you own quiet storm!wendy has always seem to sing from the heart!she believes in the words and on this song,she's showing the listener that love stilland always will exists.&quot;form now on,we're one&quot;is my favorite track and i tell you why,lisa!LISA!LISA!SHE'S SO QUIET!WHEN HER VOCALS LEAD,YOU JUST LISTEN!!!!The lyrics and the music are so uplifting,you just soar from the start to the end!this is a special album because they sound like they had fun making it!!!!  you'll have fun listening to it!!!!</review_text>
You won't stop bobbin yo head until its over.  I bought this when it first  came out and we still bump this at every party we go to and everyone is  happy to hear it, Cougnut is easily as good as biggie ever was, he just  never got the exposure that biggie did</review_text>
If you enjoyed Explosions In The Sky's last album "The Earth Is Not A Cold Dead Place", and the songs by the group on the "friday night lights soundtrack", then surely, you shall find love for their newest record "All of a Sudden I Miss Everyone". If you are new to Explosions In The Sky, I can only personally describe their music to you as lush, captivating, graceful, energetic, and highly inspirational art rock instrumentations. Please ignore reviewers who rate this album negatively because they don't like it as much as their last album(yet). "All of a Sudden I Miss Everyone" is different than previous records; It is alot darker, but at the same time hopeful and promising, best listened to on a rainy day or a cold dark night(again, personal description). What more can I say... this is about as beautiful as three guitars and a drum set can sound. My favorite album of 2007 so far.</review_text>
I first heard Dan singing background vocals on the Jackson Browne album "Late for the Sky".  I was 16.  I went out and bought this album (which I STILL have!!) even though I had never heard it.  I had the pleasure of seeing Dan open for the Eagles at the Spectrum in support of this album in Phila, in 1974; I was a junior in high school.  They all joined in on "Best of My Love" and it just blew mw away. He had this really interesting piece of cloth on his piano.  Few people had heard of him prior to this album. This is by far his BEST album.  It is more rock and roll than the rest of his sappy later work in the 80's and a true songwriting gem.  I can remember singing "Morning Sky" in my friend's Ford on the way to school. You have to listen to it over and over.. "Someone's Been Tellin' You Stories" had a sly sexual rhyme in it that was not played on radio at that time. The musicianship on this album only serve to enhance the quality of the songwriting.  This was the most raw of Dan's albums, and by ar, the most superior.  Sadly, Dan is now fighting advanced prostate cancer (check out his website).  Let's hope he will make a full recovery and record and tour again soon.  This is a must have for anyone who is a fan of any 1970's rock and roll.</review_text>
Top to bottom this album has it all - makes you laugh , makes you think , makes you want to dance. I can't wait till mainstream finally catches up and the music industry finally recognizes what a gift Todd Snider is and the talent he posseses. His music  will inspire you to move something whether it's your brain or your bottom! Check him out</review_text>
I bought this album when it was first released in the 70's. Heaven and Hell was hot item and passed through my senior school from ear to ear amongst 'those kids in the know' in much the same way that a joint would these days. The movements build on a theme throughout the work and reflect the care that went into creating some classical overtures. Only later in life could I get the similarities to Carl Orf and Khachaturian. This is a real masterpiece and a snapshot in time of when Prog really was prog. Listen to it in full and then catalogue alongside Camel's 'The Snow Goose', the original 'Tubular Bells' by MIke Oldfield, 'Brain Salad Surgery' by ELP and finally ' Snowflakes are dancing' by Tomita.  Please dont compare this work to the keybored pop, I chose my spelling, of the 1980's If you enjoy Vangelis, as I do, you might also want to listen to the compositions of Ennio Morricone, he is the man who wrote that great music that follows Clint Eastwood in the Sergio Leone spaghetti westerns.</review_text>
This CD has all of the cuts that you remember from back in the day...you will love it...it is always in my car</review_text>
Jigga is incredibly hot on this albumBeanie is good to great.Memphis Bleek, is really good on this album, but is overshadowed. His "534" shows how good he is, this album does not.Overall as an album it does a good job of showing off Roc A Fella, but not to much about the Dynasty</review_text>
The music contained Trout Mask Replica is some of the most unique, acid-drenched art to ever be pressed. The songs on the album are mainly divided into folkish a capella tunes and the crazed jams the Captain and his band are known for. Several strange, unconventional themes are visited and revisted throughout the track list, such as bulbs, gingham, trout, and a variety of other surreal, sensously described wildlife. However, if there's any reason to buy Captain Beefheart's Trout Mask Replica, it's to listen to the album as a whole. I find it difficult to listen to any other way. While I find this to be true, I do have favorites that I go to when introducing friends to the Captain, or simply jamming out to without dedicating myself to the full experience: "Ella Guru", "Dachaus Blues", "Dust Blows Forward", "Neone Meat Dream", and "Old Fart at Play" stick out</review_text>
....and secured their musical legacy.  The Real Thing was a solid rock/rap mixture with newly hired Mike Patton providing vocals.  On Angel Dust, Patton had a lot more creative input, providing his wonderful vocal stylings and schizophrenic persona to Faith No More.  It's a joyous ride that after a less than stellar performance initially, has become something of a cult classic and favorite among many newer acts - and with good reason.  This album is all over the board.  Land of Sunshine reads like a list of fortune cookies (which is the supposed inspiration), while Caffeine is an anthem for Patton's drug of choice, and one of FNM's most energetic recordings.  Then there is the occaisonal oddball track showing Patton's range and sense of fun, like RV, which is like a melancholic rant from the stereotypical figure you might find living in an RV.  Not exactly bilboard material, but fun.Adding to the record were the internal tensions of the band.  Jim Martin was having creative differences, yet pumps out some of his best work here.  Tensions may have fueld a more agressive record, and FNM would never sound better than they do on this album.  It's the bands chemistry - both good and bad - that make this album work.  Commercially, this might have not been the hit the record company wanted, but its legacy can still be heard today and it's still a great record to crank up for a drive, barely showing its 15 year old age</review_text>
One reviewer remarked that Morten Veland had &quot;done it again.&quot;  Yup, he shot himself in the foot again, just like he did on Tristania's &quot;Beyond the Veil.&quot;  Veland has an obvious talent in songwriting and building arrangements, and he definitely has a knack for surrounding himself with quality musicians.  His problem is that rather than using his death metal growling for proper effect, where it's appropriate, he just plasters it everywhere, and again lessens what would otherwise have been an incredible CD.  With all of the talent that is present in this band, it would certainly have been better to let them come out of the background a little more.  The songs where Veland does that (which are all too few), like &quot;On the Wane,&quot; are easily the CD's best moments.  To the band's credit, the songs are more varied than on BOTV, with some of the guitar parts sounding like more traditional heavy metal riffs (especially at the beginning of the opening track).  It's definitely still melodic goth-metal, but shows some new directions for Veland, which I find promising.  Now, if he would just cut back on the growling...say to 50% of the CD...Sirenia's next CD will be a sure winner</review_text>
If you have never heard Book Of Shadows by Zakk Wylde, then you may be suprised by this album. The two albums are similiar in that they contain a lot more acoustic guitar, and although I'm not saying that past releases have not contained emotion, HM VI contains more.For example, take 'She Deserves a free ride' and the ballad 'Fear'. The piano on this album is superb, haunting at one point and almost relaxing at another. However, there is just enough of past 'metal' BLS in this album - 'Crazy or High' and 'House Of Doom'. Personal favourites are 'Damage is Done', 'Layne' and 'Queen Of Sorrow'. There is something more in the solo's - they come in at just the right time and as usual are perfectly executed - check out 'Stepping Stone' for an example. The musicianship has got even better on this album, with the dodgy drums on 1919 Eternal Gone, and the bass that was pushed to the background in The Blessed Hellride is up there with Zakk's playing.This album is deep, moving piece that is the perfect successor to the blistering Blessed Hellride. Can't wait for the new Mafia CD to be released.</review_text>
i just purchased this album, my first misfits album and every song on it rocks (i especially like where eagles dare).  i just bought two more albums, walk among us and static age and i wish they would hurry up and get here in the mail because i cant wait.  my only complain is the sound quality.  it sounds like they put a dollar store tape recorder in the corner and started rocking...but i guess that makes it sound more real too.  metallica covered a couple of their albums on their garage album but it just isnt the same.</review_text>
I usually don't do album reviews but I gotta say this was tight from beginning to end and I was shook that this was given a low reading by a magazine I call &quot;The Sauce&quot; So many of yall need to stop reading magazine ratings and come to sites likes this and read your own peers ratings.  Word of mouth is bliss. A-G-2-A-KE who came out on Rap-A-Lot hasn't come out with a cd since this classic.  I'm salty they didn't &quot;make it&quot; because this was heavily slept on</review_text>
"Vangelis: Themes" is a collection of some rare and some more popular theatrical theme music from movies including "Blade Runner" and "Mutiny On the Bounty." It's an extraordinary album and I highly recommend it</review_text>
For the past few years it has been very difficult to locate Candid jazz CDs, the label that critic Nat Hentoff created over forty years ago. This was a real shame because some classic recordings, including Booker Little's "Out Front" and Max Roach's "We Insist!: Freedom Now Suite," were on this label. I am happy to report that it was not because all of the albums were being deleted, but because they were (slowly) being remastered. Now some of the seminal early recordings of iconoclastic pianist Cecil Taylor are resurfacing, like "Jumpin' Punkins" and now "The World of Cecil Taylor." It is my opinion that Taylor's currently unavailable (at least domestically) "New York City R&B" and "World of C.T." are two of the great new jazz recordings of the early 60s. "World," recorded over two successive days in October 1960, is basically a trio date, with Buell Neidlinger on bass and Dennis Charles on drums, and Archie Shepp joining on tenor sax for two tracks, "Air" and the standard "Lazy Afternoon." This disc is one of Shepp's first recorded performances and the saxman apparently had trouble with Taylor's music -- I recall the now out of print Mosaic set of this material collecting some 15 plus outtakes of "Air." But the master takes are truly masterful, and I am delighted that with this CD available once again, we can all return to "The World of Cecil Taylor.</review_text>
If you are looking for true HIP-HOP, this is a MUST for your collection. Four of the Best lyrist in the game is all on one CD. Quit buying those fake ass HIP-POP albums and get the real deal. From the production to mcing its all there.  Matter facts get 2 albums so when the first one is used up you'll have a fresh one in the stacks.</review_text>
I Never Loved A Man The Way I Love You, what more can you say about the greates soul album of all time. This album released all of the music in Aretha that was screaming to be released. It displayed a very mature Aretha with complex emotions, very everyday lyrics, ones that make you say, oh yeah girl, lol. but also a delivery that the average person couldn't lay down and dream about pulling off. This is just testiment that, even at such a young age, she was THE QUEEN</review_text>
Dj Shadow is in my honest opinion one of the most overlooked artists in music today. Threading the thin line between commercial and underground, and finding his niche somewhere in between (as UNKLE says, the middle ground between light and shadow) DJ Shadow continues to impress with every release he puts forth. I was fortunate enough to pick this album up right after its release, and actually purchased it before I bought Endtroducing, which is by far DJ Shadow's best album, and one of the best albums ever made. By sampling elements from just about anywhere Shadow combines elements from our pop culture to create mini-movies of his songs which few artists can touch in terms of sheer production value, and the emotional effect that is created while listening to his music. I am actually glad I bought this album before Endtroducing as it has given me the time to truly appreciate this album for what it is; a work of art, and a continual growing of Shadow's talents. Had I bought Endtroducing before this and writtwn a review I'm sure I would have garnered it with a 4 star review, but that is simply not the case here. While Endtroducing is always going to be leaques above and beyond this album, Josh Davis has found a way here to go above and beyond what should be expected of an album, and given us an album that I'm sure years from now I will still find elements in it that will grow even more on me with time. Best enjoyed while driving or relaxing at home (possibly with a little mary in tow, if you know what I mean), the songs fluctuate with peaks and valleys of highs and lows, and the beats are flawless, especially when compared to a lot of the mainstream garbage that is put out in the record industry on a regular basis. See the thing is that Shadow bases his music upon how he feels, and artists that do this correctly achieve an emotional reaction from their music that the true artists of our world truly achieve. Radiohead for example has a way of doing this, and it is not surprising then that one of DJ Shadows favorite artists is Radiohead, they both fuse these elements into their music, and achieve monumental status in my opinion. The package design is equally well done as well showing an artists eye for presentation, and a graffiti influenced design to the overall package. If you enjoy this album then I highly recommend any of Shadows works: Endtroducing, Preemptive Strike, The Private Press, and In Tune and On Time, which is a live set recorded in support of this album. UNKLE is also a well thought out album which bridges the gap between hip-hop, rock and techno, with guest appearences by Mike D of the Beastie Boys, Thom Yorke from Radiohead, and others from throughout the music industry. If you've never heard of DJ Shadow before, then I must say that you are missing out, if you are at all interested in underground music, do yourself a favor and pick up any of Shadow's albums or collaborations, I guarantee you will extremely impressed, as with any good album the songs have a way of growing on you over time. Peace out</review_text>
Though I own alot of Paul Desmond recordings, this one as been in the CD changer for weeks now.  There's great, gentle interplay with Jim Hall, and a total sound that is most enjoyable.  Warm and round notes make this  perfect evening music which I have found pleases most everyone</review_text>
This music is undefinable ultimately. Oh yes, one can say parts sound like hard rock or progressive. One can say many things about it. For me, this, along with "Up the Downstairs" are probably their two best and they are both as different as night and day. I've become a collector of PT's stuff and like most of it very much indeed. Check out some of the side projects of the members in the band--like Blackfield and No-Man. They are worth good listenings too. But, you know, this wouldn't be a bad album to start your PT experience with. No, not at all</review_text>
Jeff Beck is far from the typical rock guitarist. He never took the easy path of showing how fast or virtuoso he is. Instead, he is full of intriguing and explosive ideas that make you want to listen  to this CD over and over again. That's what musicianship is all about, and Jeff has plenty of it</review_text>
This cd is the funniest cd i own.  The first half of the cd is pure comedy and super funny.  The second half is a little hard to understand, and it louds like is was recorded poorly, that is why i gave it four stars.  Track 2 is worth the money spent on the cd because that track is 8 mins of pure comedy.  Eddie makes fun of Stevie Wonder and boxer Larry Holmes, and he does it well</review_text>
This collection of Italian Cello Sonatas by the great Janos Starker is one of the most delightful chamber albums I own.  The world renowned cellist was joined on this 1966 recording by pianist Stephen Swedish on five of the selections, and by his frequent collaborator Gyorgy Sebok on the Bach Sonata in G minor, which was recorded in 1963 and added to this collection to increase its length (it is a welcome addition musically too).  The selections here range from famous composers like Bach, Boccherini and Vivaldi, to the lesser known Corelli, Locatelli and Valentini.  For me, the common thread of this recording is the passionate performances of Starker.  Whether it is the happy bounce of the Vivaldi Allegro, the sublime rendering of the Boccherini Adagio, or the precise interplay with Sebok on the Bach Sonata, Starker plays masterfully and his cello is captured in rich, full sound by the Mercury Living Presence recording technique.  This is an excellent purchase for all cello enthusiasts</review_text>
Another solid 70's band that faded into obscurity. The nice thing about living in Canada was that we got to see all of the minor as well as the major acts. Edward Bear fell between the two. The original members got together in the late sixties and took their name from a more famous bear named Winnie. All of their hits are here as well as a cover of "Freedom for the Stallion" , a song that was also covered by "The Hues Corporation" and popularized by "Three Dog Night". Its mostly the type of music that most will remember a favourite love by from "The Last Song" to "Close Your Eyes" (I'm back again). A good middle of the road pop album to melt back the years</review_text>
I love "Fool For The City" I have also always loved Savoy Brown "Looking In" and didn't know until recently that Lonesome Dave was the singer and most of the Savoy Brown band went on to form Foghat. If you are a Foghat fan you should check out "Looking In" by Savoy Brown. If you've heard other stuff by Savoy Brown and didn't like it, don't be discouraged because "Looking In" (and only "Looking In") is essentially Foghat. There were a lot of changes in Savoy Brown personnel through the years and the guys that did Looking In were the best.</review_text>
I drive alot commuting to and from my job. This music has served as the perfect backdrop to an lovely Indiana fall! I'm sure I'll recall those colorful images as I continue to listen to this CD through the colorless days of winter</review_text>
Joe Cocker has one of the most distinctive gravelly voices in R & B history.  He's always stuck to his roots and never gone with temporary fads or novelties.  This collection is another classic with great covers from the Beatles, Elton John and Gary Wright.  His interpretive voice has always been the focal point of his songs, but in DTS 5.1, you are surrounded (as if in concert) by his presence.   The completely adept and intuitive musicians that accompany him add more atmosphere without taking from his performance.  Imagine hearing him in live in a theater and you'll know what to expect from this warm and heartfelt album</review_text>
The Living In Oblivion series of CD compilations does something that many similar compilations do NOT do: they give us some great variety of "hits".There is no doubt that "Mickey" by Toni Basil was a huge hit. There's also no doubt that "Our Lips are Sealed" was a break out hit for the Go Go's, but the Funboy Three version wasn't. But what about "Living in a Box"? It only hit the Billboard top 100 at #89 in 1987. So why is it here? Why are a large number of these songs? They're not top 10 hits, right?Wrong!I'm sick to death of so many compilations relying on top 40 hits from the 80's. The U.S. music tastes are typically very different from those of Europe. Just because a song doesn't make the U.S. Billboard top 40 doesn't mean that it isn't a hit in other countries. And although I'm an American, my music tastes have always run more in line with those of Europe.I'm delighted that the Living in Oblivion series (and the Pop and Wave series) have incorporated a variety of hits from the U.S. and Europe.I also like that some of the more obscure groups and their songs are available on these compilations. There are several songs on these albums that never were released on CD (as they hadn't come into being at the time of the groups' albums initial releases), so albums such as these are the only place where you can find these hits. The Boys Don't Cry song "I Wanna Be a Cowboy" hit the Billboard charts at #12 in 1986, but the group disappeared soon thereafter. Then all of a sudden a dance version of that same song came out in the early 2000's and rocketed up the dance charts.Don't be misled, the Living in Oblivion series is one of the absolutely best series for a variety of music from the 80's. If you want to hear run of the mill, top 40 only hits from the 80's, well, then you'll just have to look elsewhere.Also, the liner notes and pictures of the groups included in the jewel box are really clever. You get to find out what the chart position was for the songs in the compilation and see what the groups looked like at the time of the song's release. My only issue with these liner notes is that the author of them seems to be disparaging the very music which these albums are espousing. Apparently many believe that the music from the 80's was vacuous and devoid of emotion. One need only listen to the song "The Promise" by the group "When in Rome"  (Living in Oblivion Volume 5) to know that such a statement is false. While that group only had this one hit and then faded into obscurity, "The Promise" made the Billboard Top 100 at #11 and the Billboard Dance Chart at #1.Anyway... I can't recommend this album and its entire series any more! It's simply awesome! Before believing those who would disparage this series of albums, please check the Billboard charts and you'll see that these songs were in fact hits.GET IT</review_text>
You have not heard his voice until to have heard Andras Schiff play the Well Tempered Clavie</review_text>
"The guitars aren't loud enough, and neither is the bass for that matter"Which is so true, but it's still a great album. Seeing them live, makes up for this CD no doubt.Stand out songs:-The City Sleeps In Flames-The World As We Know It-Just A Taste-My Darkest Hour-Empty Glasses-The Only Medicine'My Darkest Hour' & 'Empty Glasses' are my favorites. I know those songs by heart</review_text>
While not every song my be my favorite, they really did a great job compiling the popular and favorites from the great 80s hair band days!All the monster CDS I have bought have been real gems.</review_text>
First of all i'm a die hard UFO fan,i own EVERY UFO album not just the michael shenker cd's...some of you fools reviewing the ufo albums without michael ..1) do the band a disservice 2)are smokin crack, and 3) are very inept in your musical judgement. While i'm a huge shenker fan he is far from the greatest guitar god,and i hate to break the news to ya's but for overall sound/effect and appeal paul chapmans just good as michael on many a song. That bein said MAKING CONTACT is one of the top five UFO albums MADE!!!! the top five UFO albums any fan should get are (PHENOMENON,LIGHTS OUT,NO PLACE TO RUN,MAKING CONTACT,and WALK ON WATER) along with the two live cd's BBC,and strangers in the night. Misdemeaner has some cool 80's guitar and is an attempt at mainstream(and they deserve to be mainstream) so who can blame them,and some of these songs are pretty cool...IF,I might add if you have an open mind (so that excludes most of you shenker diehards)...........</review_text>
A truly glorious recording, just what I want in music, with brilliancy, sensitivity, and beauty. This is a must have for every music lover worth the name</review_text>
Her voice takes my breath away, I fell in love with her.I highly reccomend it</review_text>
This is truly one of the great jazz albums of all time. Surprisingly, Evans' introspective style and Cannonball's soulful approach meld together perfectly. Perhaps this is testament to just how hugely talented these men are. Both The technical skill and pure musicmanship displayed on this record is just amazing. I've owned this CD for over 10 years now and still find so much to listen to in these recordings. Highlights are the amazing &quot;Waltz For Debby&quot; and Earl Zindars' waltz &quot;Elsa&quot;, easily one of the most beautiful songs ever written, in my opinion. You simply cannot go wrong with this CD</review_text>
I remember thinking when this film came out that few things in life were as cool as Lloyd Dobler. This soundtrack is also one of those things. This album for me, as for many I'm sure, somewhat reflected my taste in music at the time, and even now actually. Of course the biggie here is "In Your Eyes" from Peter Gabriel. Who hasn't that track touched at some point? This also confirmed my love for the Red Hot Chili Peppers, and here we get a slightly extended version of their classic "Taste The Pain". Toss on a few from Fishbone, Living Colour, and The Replacements and you solidify this soundtrack as a must own for the late 80's alt-rock lover. Not to mention the goods from Depeche Mode and Nancy Wilson (Heart). In fact the only thing that could've made this album any better, is if it ended with a "ding"</review_text>
This era of Tangerine Dream (TD) was just great. The Virgin Years were truly a great period for TD. For me it deals with space and landscape. It's so close to repetitive music that would come much later. It's also the one group that used rythm to structure these flying melodies. You could fly with them and end up with more in the end. You can't say that for too many of these Electronic groups. After that period they would go on with this ambient music that wasn't up to the same standards. It seems they are back (with other musicians of course) with the same kind of concept. Great! They were an important link on the electronic scene. A great album! A great period</review_text>
Good Stuff! An excellent collection of original and classic gypsy jazz tunes, artfully performed by Jorgenson. I recommend it as an introduction to the virtuosity of John Jorgenson and the genius of Django Reinhardt</review_text>
I would like to point out that MTV rocks is funny and you guys are suckers. This album does rule, just not as much as top40 radio hits</review_text>
Let me the say that the vocals on this cd may be painful at first, yet you get over them very quickly, except for a few spots. Even so, they do not lower my score for the album, and at times are quite catchy.Savage - Good riffs, good solos, catchy, purely driven madness to start this insane album. 93/100Where My Fortune Lies - the intro is absolutely nuts, and the highlight of the song. Probably my least favorite after this, yet the solos are still out of this world. 87/100Ninja - what a great song! The intro is one of the greatest things I have heard in my life, and this song may actually have you humming along at points. NINJA! Very well laid out, and the solos at the end are the best so far on the album. Brilliance. 97/100Concerto - Amazing once again, and Becker the 17 year old prodigy showcases himself throughout. He proves he is the master of sweeping and arpreggios all over this album, and this song is an insane instrumental that captures melodies like none other. More notes played in 4 1/2 minutes than in George Harrison's entire career. 98/100Burn the Ground - fastest on the album solo wise in fact Becker is so fast it is hard to believe that its human. Very melodic too except when there are vocals, the song is kinda of disgusting. 87/100Desert Island -another amazing song very well laid out with great solos and great riffs.  The outro is the perfect intro to Speed Metal Symphony. The vocals are actually good on this song, like Ninja., an entertaining song. 97/100Speed Metal Symphony - nine minutes of shredding and arpreggios and all kinds of melodic madness that is beauty to any shredder's ears. Everything about this song is good. 97/100There isn't much to say about this album except Becker and Friedman show they are true masters of their instruments and are able to play in a melodic and listenable way. I would recommend this over Yngwie Malmsteen, who has not improved since his first album</review_text>
I'm not particularly familiar with Sonic Youth and the bits I've heard from their other albums haven't really grabbed me.  This does.  The rhythm section wouldn't be out of place in pseudo-tribal funk, the guitars are dissonant, jangling, sometimes hypnotically repetitive, and just plain weird, and the vocals are distant, airy, lazy.  Some of the best music I've heard in a good long while</review_text>
This is pure inspirational quintessential Oteil and the Peacemakers. It's Gospel, funk, jazz, rock... features his distinctive scatting and amazing bass, a wonderful blend of talent... glorious vocals...You will not regret this purchase... it's a joy all the way through from beginning to end..</review_text>
i've been waiting for this one.this disc and this group period was funky.movin was one of the baddest instrumental jams that i've ever heard period.can you see the light is a tight jam as well.one of the many bad  groups from back in the day</review_text>
This film came out in 1973 and I saw it in its original full length version (about 3hours and 15 min.) Executives from Columbia Pictures were there, it was the premeire, and they were groaning and at the intermission fights broke out(verbal) and ushers passed among them and myself and everyone else with soundtrack albums. The executives left the theatre and scaled the albums across Columbus Circle in Boston and I and a few friends retrieved them and had quite a few for free. We returned to the film and I have always loved this crazy redition of Lost Horizon, the miscasting, the terrible sets, the odd ball music for the story, the dubbed Liv Ullmann, the dance routines of Olivia Hussey..all of it. You cannot find a musical like it, or a soundtrack like it. Columbia execs were unimaginative; they should have believed in this film. The next day after this premeire in Boston, New York etc. (simultaneous I suppose) the film was cut, the posters were taken down..there was a ton of material to buy..T Shirts, dolls, posters of all sizes, bath towels with the poster on them, records of the sd tk of course, and small pop up sets of the entire film. It was to be a massive hit..In two days time all of the paraphanalia was removed, and the posters said, Last Two Weeks, and in two weeks the whole thing disappeared.But many people came to see it..lines of people, and, when they heard it had been cut, they gave up, and in two weeks everyone said farewell to this film.I have many treasures from that opening nite, and now I have the CD of the sound track. Anyone who loves movie magic or madness has to see and hear this film; it is unique.Enjoy this soundtrack and get your hands on a DVD ..they are out there</review_text>
Toad The Wet Sprocket have to be one of the most underated bands of the ninties. They wrote some brilliant material and a lot of the songs on this album are very enjoyable. BUT, there are some strange ones that are do not appeal to my taste. My fave song is 'Is It For Me'. It is hard to classify them though. It sort of deep and meaningful (at most times) pop rock. Other good tracks include Walk On The Ocean, Pray Your Gods and I Will Not Take...etc. I regard this album and 'Dulcinea' as their two best albums</review_text>
This is a glorious recording of one of the most lyrical, haunting scores ever composed for a film. Each succeeding track is a treat for the ears, refreshing and invigorating. Neeley and Varese Sarabande should be congratulated for recording and releasing this hirtherto neglected gem.In my opinion, though, the only part of the entire CD that doesn't work is the beginning of the "Waxworks" track - the score to this particular moment in the film (when Norma, watching herself onscreen, rises triumphantly to proclaim "I'll be up there again, so help me!") is one of the most powerful and recognizable images in filmdom. In the original, the music is strong, powerful and almost spine-tingling, but this moment on the CD is underwhelming and not fully realized. However, what is one misfire (totalling all of eight bars, at most) compared to the richness and texture of the rest of the recording?!In short, if you love film music, you most likely love the score to SUNSET BOULEVARD - and if you love SUNSET BOULEVARD, then you will most likely love this recording, too</review_text>
Maiden had evolved into a new metal standard in 1986. Not only did they lead the metal world with the greatest artwork on covers, but their music took a new form and justifed everything they had done in the past. Iron Maiden to Powerslave were just the stepping stones to this standard classic.The CD Starts out with CAUGHT SOMEWHERE IN TIME, a galloping bassline, and parallel guitar make it, not only a classic, but ahead of its time. The rest of the CD id in pure form. My favorite track, however, is ALEXANDER THE GREAT. The intro starts out with a whisper of that era, and slowly builds to the howl of, I feel, the battle cry of the great warrior of History.Iron Maiden did not dissapoint with this CD. It is very well mixed and produced, and remains a standard in my collection of CD's.</review_text>
I have been looking for a particular song for several years.  This album had it</review_text>
With Engines of Creation, Joe Satriani did what he has always done: make the most of the tools he chooses to use.Only this time, he uses electronic beats and soundscapes as the canvas on which to express his skill with the guitar. It would be easy to give this one listen and wonder where the guy who wrote "Satch Boogie," "War" and "Flying in a Blue Dream" went.Well, he's still here, only more than ever he's showing us his incredible command of his instrument by being able to create sounds that so perfecly reflect what they intend to convey.I've never heard robots having sex, but I'm willing to be "Borg Sex" isn't far off. And although his calmly passing, sometimes noodling melodies appear to have little structure, that's kinda how you'd expect to see "Clouds Race Across the Sky." The 'chorus' to "Devil's Slide" sounds as sinister as its name suggests and "Attack" is as close to a musical sci-fi battle as I've ever heard.To top it off, the album includes "Until We Say Goodbye," one of Satch's best ballads in his entire catalogue.If you're willing to put a little more mental energy into appreciating the work Satch put into this album than just waiting for the album to rock your socks off Surfing With The Alien-style, you'll find that there's an incredible amount of depth -- and musicianship -- to be found.It's not a Satriani masterpiece, but its a true testament to the man's enduring creativity</review_text>
His playing on this album reminds me of that of Bill Evans.  I am glad to see on reading all the reviews that someone else had that exact thought.  Comparison to Bill Evans is the best compliment I know how to give</review_text>
I owned this as an LP and played it over and over on my tiny, mono phonograph.  I loved it then and I love it now. Rainmaker, I'm On My Way Back Home and Love Is All That I Ever Needed would all have been sucessful singles. I Would Have Loved You Anyway is the only song I don't really like but the lyrics are unintentionally funny. All the lyrics seem more suggestive now than they did then but that's ok! The background singers get a tad tiring but Go David Cassidy! I don't care if it's the memories or not, I enjoy putting this on and turning it up</review_text>
